nadian film directed by John Guillermin and starring James Coburn. 
The film was shot in Vancouver. It was part of the boom in Canadian production due to tax concessions. An article later called 1980 " a year of national horror and shame" for the Canandian film industry, other efforts including Middle Aged Crazy and Circle for Two. Reportedly $500,000 came from the CFDC. 
It was one of five films Coburn made over an 18-month period. "Something happened between the first script and the final re-write," he says of Patman. "In being made clearer, the film lost a lot of its charm and character. But the idea of a guy who works in a psychiatric ward, ultimately choosing to live in the madness there rather than the madness in the outside world, really appealed to me." 
The film was never released theatrically in Canada. It was released theatrically in Europe then re-cut and sold to television in North America. 
Filmink later called it "a really terrible movie, dull and lacking in atmosphere, the first bad picture Guillermin made in over a decade." 
This article related to a Canadian film of the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 2016/17 kits were revealed on 29 June 2016 and was streamed live on QPR's official Facebook Channel. 
QPR agreed a 10-year multimillion-pound eight figure deal with Dryworld to replace Nike as the official technical kit suppliers from the 2016/17 season. 
The club confirmed a one-year deal with Smarkets as the new shirt sponsor for the 2016/17 season, the brand will be displayed on the home, away and third strips. 
On 20 May 2016, QPR confirmed that they would be touring the Netherlands and would be based in the town of Ermelo. During the nine-day training camp which was between the 3rd and 12 July 2016, they played two friendly fixtures, one against Dutch Champions, PSV Eindhoven and the other against FC Groningen. 
Last updated: 2 January 2017Source: MatchesOrdered by ,  and  = Number of bookings;  = Number of sending offs after a second yellow card;  = Number of sending offs by a direct red card. 
Claudio Giorgi (born in 1944) is an Italian actor and film director, active between the 1970s and the early 1980s. 
Born Claudio Giorgiutti in Tarcento, Udine, Giorgi was mainly active as a main actor in fotoromanzi, while he occasionally played supporting roles in several genre films. From the mid-1970s he also worked as a production secretary and then as a film director, often credited under the pseudonym Claudio de Molinis. For two of his films he also contributed the screenplay. 
This biographical article related to film in Italy is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The text exists in two versions, one attached to the Atharvaveda in many Sanskrit anthologies, and another attached to the Krishna Yajurveda in some anthologies such as the Telugu-language version. The two versions have some differences, but are essentially similar in meaning. 
Sarvasara Upanishad defines and explains 23 Upanishadic concepts, while Niralamba Upanishad covers 29. These two texts overlap in some concepts, both refer to older Principal Upanishads (dated to 1st millennium BCE), but offer independent explanations suggesting that accepting a diversity of views were a part of its tradition. 
The date and author of Sarvasara Upanishad is unknown, but it is likely a late medieval text like the Muktika Upanishad. 
The Atman (Self) is God. When, however, one  fancies the body etc which is not the Atman, to be Atman then this fancy is called bondage. 
The text begins by listing twenty three questions, such as what is Moksha, what is Avidya and what is Vidya? It then follows with twenty three answers. The manuscript version of the Sarvasara Upanishad in Atharvaveda discuss the last two questions differently than the manuscript of the same text attached to the Krishna Yajurveda. 
The glossary in manuscript versions, found in different parts of India, where the text is attached to Krishna Yajurveda include a more extensive discussion of the following concepts in the last two questions: Brahman (ultimate reality), Satya (truth), Jnana (wisdom), Ananta (eternal), Ananda (bliss), Mithya (illusion) and Maya (not Atman). The first 21 of 23 questions in both versions cover the same topics. 
Jnana is self-light. It is that which illuminates all. It is that Absolute Consciousness which is without any obscuration. 
Brahman, in the Sarvasara text, is Absolute Consciousness, without a second, a Be-ness, nondual, pure, the noumenal, the true and the unchanging. Satya, states the Upanishad, is Sat (Be-ness), what is not Asat (not-Be-ness), that which the Vedas aim at, that neither changes with time nor is affected by time, that which existed in past and exists now and will exist in future without change, that which is the fountainhead of all ideas and all causes. 
Veganuary is an annual challenge run by a UK nonprofit organisation that promotes and educates about veganism by encouraging people to follow a vegan lifestyle for the month of January. Since the event began in 2014, participation has more than doubled each year. 400,000 people signed up to the 2020 campaign. The campaign estimated this represented the carbon dioxide equivalent of 450,000 flights and the lives of more than a million animals. Veganuary can also refer to the event itself. 
Founded by Jane Land and Matthew Glover, the first event was during January 2014. In 2015 the project registered 12,800 sign-ups. From there the sign-ups grew to 513.663 in 2021. 
Gentleman's Quarterly noted "it's a clever way to introduce a new way of nutritional thinking at a time of year where our mind is hardwired to explore ways to better ourselves". 
Food businesses and restaurants in the UK have been introducing new vegan products in January to coincide with Veganuary. The supermarkets in the UK, including Tesco, have been seen to run advertisements advertising Veganuary. 
Participation in Veganuary has become increasingly popular, with the number of people signing up rising each year: 
Tripe was born Mary Elizabeth Richardson in Christchurch, New Zealand, the daughter of Edward Richardson, a Member of Parliament for Kaiapoi, and his second wife, Frances Mary Elizabeth (Corke) Richardson. She attended Christchurch Girls' High School. 
Tripe studied at the Canterbury School of Art and the new Wellington School of Design (WSD), then under the direction of its founder, Arthur Dewhurst Riley. She graduated from the WSD in 1890 with a teaching certificate and went on to get a master's certificate in 1894. She started teaching drawing at the WSD in 1889; among her colleagues were James Nairn and Mabel Hill. She left the school following her marriage but continued to give private lessons. 
From the 1880s onwards, Tripe exhibited in New Zealand, in London, at the Paris Salon, and elsewhere. She started out as an Impressionist painter but over time moved towards a more realistic style founded in strong draughtsmanship. She became known especially for her portraits of leading New Zealand citizens, including Sir Robert Stout, Sir Frederic Truby King, Sir Michael Myers, William Edward Sanders, and the painter Dolla Richmond. 
In 1893, she became the first woman appointed to the council of the New Zealand Academy of Fine Arts, and she also influenced the founding of the National Art Gallery of New Zealand and its portrait collection. 
She was awarded the Coronation Medal in 1937, and died at her home in Wellington on 21 September 1939. Her ashes were buried in Karori Cemetery. 
The University of Manitoba (U of M, UManitoba, or UM) is a non-denominational, public research university in the province of Manitoba, Canada. Founded in 1877, it is the first university of western Canada. 
The U of M is also a member of the U15 and of Universities Canada, while its global affiliations include the International Association of Universities and the Association of Commonwealth Universities. As such, with increased global outreach, the university holds one of the most internationally diverse student bodies in Canada. 
The Manitoba Bisons represent the team in athletics as a member of U Sports and Canada West Universities Athletic Association (CWUAA). 
In 1895, the University of Manitoba Act was amended to give the denominational colleges the power to confer degrees in divinity. It would be amended again two years later in order to allow the Manitoba government to grant up to $60,000 for the university and a normal school (i.e., a teaching college). 
In 1900, the university became a teaching institution by an act of the Legislative Assembly of Manitoba. Soon after, other colleges also received affiliated status: 
In 1938, Wesley College and Manitoba College merged to form United College. Three decades later, in 1967, United College became the University of Winnipeg, and Brandon College became Brandon University. 
In 1886, the U of M admitted its first woman student, Jessie Holmes, and in 1889, Holmes also became the university's first female graduate. In 1892, the Manitoba Medical College saw its first female graduate, Hattie Foxton, who passed her exams with first-class standing for Doctor of Medicine and Master of Surgery. 
In 1897, the University of Manitoba Act was amended in order to allow the Manitoba government to grant up to $60,000 for the university and a normal school (i.e., a teaching college). 
In the early part of the 20th century, professional education expanded beyond the traditional fields of theology, law, and medicine. Graduate training based on the German-inspired American model of specialized course work and the completion of a research thesis was introduced. 
In 1914, the Manitoba Law School was founded by the U of M and the Law Society of Manitoba as an affiliated college of the university. Officially opening on 3 October 1914, the School would have 123 students (including 5 women) and 21 academic staff in 1920. On 23 April 1915, a Baccalaureate Address was given at the end of the academic session for the first time in the university's history. In 1919, the U of Manitoba would found the first school of architecture in all of western Canada. 
In 1916, the Departments of Arts (including Mathematics) and Architecture, the Library, and the administrative offices of the university were moved into the former Law Courts Building. Also that year, Englishman Frank E. Nuttall became the first trained librarian for the university. 
In 1916, an Overseas Correspondence Club was established to write letters to UM students serving in England and France during the War, keeping them up-to-date in on University activities during their absence. At a March Faculty Council meeting in 1917, taking note of the Russian Revolution, the Faculty ordered the sending of a congratulatory telegram to the Provisional Government of Russia. The telegram was subsequently answered by Foreign Minister Pavel Milyukov. 
In 1918, the university's board of governors arranged for all men with a record of overseas service in the CEF, or who have served for a year or more in Canada, to receive full tuition remission in Arts and half tuition fees in Engineering, Architecture, Pharmacy, and Medicine. Also this year, the Spanish flu epidemic and the subsequent ban on public meetings closed the university for several weeks from October 11 to December 2. 
By the end of World War I on 11 November 1918, a total of 1160 students and 14 faculty/staff from the U of M enlisted; 123 were killed or died during the war; and 142 received military honors. 
Following the War, the university saw a large increase in enrolment, with 2,013 students enrolling in various degree and special courses in 1919. 
By 1920, the university would be the largest university in the Canadian Prairies and the fifth largest in Canada, with 1,654 male and 359 female students, as well as 184 academic staff (including 6 women). It had eight faculties: Arts, Science, Law, Medicine, Engineering, Architecture, Pharmacy, and Agriculture. 
From 1920 to 1921, the teaching faculty was reorganized, creating a General University Faculty Council and an individual Faculties in Arts & Science, Engineering, and Medicine. In 1921, William Tier was appointed as the first Dean of Arts & Science, and E.P. Fetherstonhaugh as the first Dean of Engineering. 
In 1924, the university officially merged with the Manitoba Agricultural College through an act of the Manitoba legislature. In the 1930s, the university moved its administrative offices to its Fort Garry campus, where the Arts Building is completed in 1931. Also that year, St. Paul's College became affiliated with the university. 
The Faculty of Education was established by the university in 1934. The university established an Evening Institute in 1936. 
In 1937, the university offers a Bachelor of Commerce, to be awarded through the Faculty of Arts and Science, for the first time. 
Between 1940 and 1941, the Canadian Army took over the Fort Garry residence; all fit 18-year-old male students were required to take 6 hours per week in military training; and students above 21 years old receive two weeks of practical military training in a camp. Moreover, 90% of women students enrolled in a variety of courses to aid in the war, with auto mechanics particularly proving to be a preferred course among the women. During this time, the Dean of Women was Ursulla Macdonnell. 
In 1943, the first degrees for Bachelor of Science in Pharmacy were conferred, replacing the diploma course for pharmacy. Also that year, the Senate established two new honorary degrees: Doctor of Science (D. Sc.) and Doctor of Letters (D. Litt.). Also around this time, the School of Social Work was established within the Faculty of Arts and Science. 
In the 1944/45 academic year, the University's new Department of Music began providing arts and science students with elective courses in theory and history at the Broadway location. 
In 1966, the Manitoba Law School would be fully incorporated into the university as the Faculty of Law. 
Responding to population pressure, the policy of university education would be initiated in the 1960s. As result, in 1967, two of the colleges that had originally been part of the University of Manitoba were given university status of their own by the provincial government: United College, which had been formed by the merging of Wesley College and Manitoba College, would become the University of Winnipeg; and Brandon College would become Brandon University. 
In 1968, the Manitoba Theatre Centre and the U of M English Department combined to offer theatre courses at the university. In 1970, the Faculty of Arts and Science separated to form the individual Faculties of Arts and of Science. 
On 28 January 1981, St. Andrew's College, which originally trained the ministry for the Ukrainian Orthodox Church of Canada, became an affiliated college and would be the first Ukrainian-language college opened by the Orthodox Church in North America. 
In 1993/94, the U of M became the first university in Canada to offer a master's degree in interior design. 
In 1999, the university launched Smartpark, a 100-acre research and technology park at the Fort Garry Campus. 
The administrative position of "Vice-President (Indigenous)" was established at the university in October 2019 to lead the development and implementation of Indigenous-focused initiatives, engagement, research, etc. 
The Act formed the university by the federation of three existing denominational colleges: St. Boniface College (Roman Catholic), St John's College (Anglican), and Manitoba College (Presbyterian). 
The Act also established the corporation for the university's government, consisting of a Chancellor and Vice-Chancellor with a Council. The Chancellor would be appointed by the Lieutenant-Governor in Council for a 3-year term, and the council would consist of 7 representatives from each of its three affiliated college, 3 from the Convocation, and 1 from each of the two sections of the Board of Education. 
In 1895, the Act was amended to give the denominational colleges the power to confer degrees in divinity. It would be amended again two years later in order to allow the Manitoba government to grant up to $60,000 for the university and a normal school (i.e., a teaching college). 
The main Fort Garry campus (66 Chancellors Circle, on the Red River in south Winnipeg) comprises over 60 major teaching and research buildings of the university and sits on over 280 hectares (690 acres) of land. Among these buildings, 33 are used for teaching, of which 4 are colleges: St. John's College, St. Paul's College, St. Andrew's College, and University College. The remaining buildings include laboratories, administrative and service offices, a research complex, and residences. 
The University of Manitoba Bannatyne Campus is a complex of ten buildings in central Winnipeg belonging to the university's health sciences branch. Located about 13 kilometers north of the Fort Garry site, this campus is adjoined to the west of Winnipeg's Health Sciences Centre (HSC), between McDermot and William Avenue. 
The Rady Faculty of Health Sciences was established to consolidate the university's health education community into a more unified body. The Rady Faculty consists of several health sciences departments, including the Max Rady College of Medicine, the Dr. Gerald Niznick College of Dentistry, the College of Rehabilitation Sciences, and the College of Pharmacy, as well as the College of Nursing, although it still remains on the Fort Garry campus. 
Also at this campus, the Manitoba Medical Alumni Association erected the Medical Corps Memorial, dedicated to the memory of the graduates and students of the University of Manitoba Medical College, who had laid down their lives during the North West Rebellion (1 name); 1900 South African War (1 name); and The Great War [i.e., World War I] (7 names). 
The Brodie Centre is the main building of the Bannatyne campus, which not only connects the various health education facilities but also the Neil John MacLean Health Sciences Library and the Joe Doupe Fitness Centre. 
The Dental Building is the westernmost building of the entire campus, housing the Dr. Gerald Niznick College of Dentistry. The College encompasses the entirety of dental education offered at the U of M, including the School of Dental Hygiene. 
Although the College of Nursing also belongs to the consolidated Rady Faculty of Health Sciences, it remains on the Fort Garry campus until additional facilities can be built at Bannatyne. 
The Max Rady College of Medicine has 27 academic departments found throughout the Bannatyne campus, the Health Sciences Centre, and other Winnipeg health sciences facilities. Each department is involved in teaching, research, service and clinical activities with an academic staff of approximately 1,630 faculty members. The college also consists of several centres, institutes, and research groups, often in partnership with other health sciences organizations. 
The university holds 48 Canada Research Chairs and is either home to or a partner in 37 different research centres, institutes, and shared facilities. These centres foster collaborative research and scholarship. 
The U of M is the network leader of Intelligent Sensing for Innovative Structures (ISIS) Canada, headquartered at the Faculty of Engineering. As a National Network of Centres of Excellence (NCE), ISIS Canada develops better ways to build, repair, and monitor civil structures. The university is also a member of 13 other NCEs. 
The Centre for Defence and Security Studies at the U of M has a research, teaching, and outreach program designed to advance knowledge, understanding and debate in Canada on defence and security issues. 
The first issue of Mosaic: A Journal for the Comparative Study of Literature & Ideas was published by the U of M in the fall of 1967. 
Incubators at the park are involved in the following broad research areas: information & communications technology, engineering & advanced materials, health & biotechnology, and agricultural & nutritional science. Currently, the park houses 18 tenants employing 1,200 people, many of whom are co-op students and graduates of the university. 
The mandate of the park is carried out by the Smartpark Development Corporation, a subsidiary corporation of the U of M with its own Board of Directors. 
The university has a total enrolment of approximately 26,000 students in 24 faculties. Most academic units offer graduate studies programs leading to master's or doctoral degrees. The University of Manitoba ranked 14th in Maclean's 2022 Medical/Doctoral university rankings. The Medical/Doctoral category ranks Canadian universities that are research-intensive. 
In 2015, the university dissolved its Faculty of Human Ecology, whose departments were then joined with those of other faculties. The Faculty began in 1910 as merely a diploma in Household Sciences at the Manitoba Agricultural College, eventually becoming the School of Home Economics in 1943. The School gained official faculty status in 1970, and changed its name to Human Ecology in 1981. 
The U of M Department of Native Studies is the oldest such unit in western Canada. Indigenous Elders are present on campus at Migizii Agamik (Bald Eagle Lounge), the university's Indigenous Centre, to provide social supports. On 2 June 2017, Indigenous knowledge and guidance became a formally-recognized part of the Rady Faculty of Health Sciences with the creation of Ongomiizwin, the largest Indigenous education and health unit in Canada in terms of scope and mandate. 
The Anthropology Laboratory Museum at the U of M collects, inventories, and displays artifacts including cartographic materials, prints, drawings, and textual records from the Manitoba Region. The Human History collection includes archaeological and ceremonial objects, and weapons. The Natural Sciences artifacts include biological, zooarchaeological, aquatic, Earth Science, Geological and Paleontological Collections. 
The main art gallery on campus is "School of Art Gallery." Other art galleries include: Arch II, Faculty of Architecture, Dr. Paul H. T. Thorlakson Gallery, Icelandic Collection, Elizabeth Dafoe Library, Gallery of Student Art (GOSA), and University Centre. 
As per the Act, the university is governed through a bicameral system, consisting of two separate governing bodies: the Senate, the academic body responsible for academic matters (including policy); and a Board of Governors, the governing body who exercises exclusive control over financial policy and have formal authority in all other matters. 
As the titular head of the university, the chancellor confers all degrees, is a member of both the Board of Governors and the Senate, and acts as a university ambassador when needed. 
Since its establishment, the U of Manitoba has had fourteen chancellors in total. However, following the first chancellor, between 1904 and 1908, no successor was appointed by the Government. 
The UM Board of Governors is the governing body of the university, overseeing the administrative and business affairs of the university. It exercises exclusive control over financial policy and have formal authority in all other matters, as well as having the authority to decide on all matters that are not reserved to Senate. 
It is required to make an annual report to Manitoba's Lieutenant Governor in Council and send it to the Minister of Education. The Board also has the power to appoint President, Vice-presidents, Deans, the Librarian, Comptroller, and members of academic staff. 
Senate, as per the University of Manitoba Act, is the University of Manitoba's senior academic governing body, and has authority over academic matters. The Senate was established in 1936 to replace the University council in order to provide more equal representation between faculties and the affiliated colleges. 
The President of the University of Manitoba is appointed by the university's Board of Governors and is ex officio Vice-Chancellor. The Office of the President was established as position that provides a link between the two bodies and to perform institutional leadership. 
The Provost and Vice-President (Academic) is the university's senior academic officer, with responsibility for providing academic vision at the university and leadership in all matters relating to students and academic staff. This office also oversees matters of human resource and immigration related to the University of Manitoba. The current Provost and Vice-President (Academic) is Dr. Janice Ristock, who was appointed in 2016. 
The Deputy Provost (Academic Planning and Programs) is responsible for the "processes by which new academic programs are introduced, current programs are modified or discontinued, and professional academic programs are assessed by accreditation agencies." 
Other Vice-Provosts include Health Sciences, Teaching and Learning, and Libraries, who is ex officio University Librarian. 
The academic staff are represented by two unions. The professors are represented by the University of Manitoba Faculty Association, who applied to the Manitoba Labor Relations Board for certification as a union on 1 February 1973. (Professors at the Faculty of Dentistry are represented by the University of Manitoba Dental Clinical Staff Association.) Sessional instructors and teaching assistants, on the other hand, are represented by the CUPE Local 3909. 
The support staff are divided among many unions. The support staff and the campus security are represented by the AESES, though the support staff at the Faculty of the Engineering are represented by CUPE Local 1482. All outside workers are represented by the CAW Local 3007. 
The administrative office that is officially charged with enhancing student life and the student experience at the U of M is the Vice-Provost (Students), who has senior leadership responsibility for units within Enrolment Services, the Registrar's Office, Student Engagement and Success, and Student Support. 
The school theme song, Brown and Gold, was recorded by the University of Manitoba Band at CJRC radio station in 1939, and was written by W. J. MacDonald with lyrics written by Charles McCullough. 
The Manitoban, founded in 1914 as a semi-monthly University journal, is the university newspaper. In 1934, the University of Manitoba Quarterly was replaced by the Alumni Journal. In 1938, the Arts Student Body began publishing the Manitoba Arts Review, a journal of academic articles written primarily by UM students and faculty. In 1947, a new literature and art magazine called Creative Campus made its way under the editorship of Alvin Goldman. 
As of 2010[update], there have been 96 Rhodes Scholars from the University of Manitoba, more than from any other university in Western Canada. 
The National Panhellenic Conference sororities on campus are Alpha Delta Pi, Alpha Gamma Delta, and Alpha Phi. Fraternities on campus include Delta Upsilon, Delta Kappa Epsilon, and Phi Delta Theta. Fraternity Rush and Sorority Recruitment occur during the first weeks of school in September. 
The university held its first track meet in the early fall of 1914 with the University of North Dakota on the Winnipeg Exhibition Grounds. With U of M being victorious, the meet would be thought of as a success and the universities decide to make it an annual event. In 1979, UM student Jan Madden equals the world record in the 300-yard track-and-field event. 
On 6 September 1952, a prototype de Havilland DH.110 jet fighter crashed during an aerial display at the Farnborough Airshow in Hampshire, England. The jet disintegrated mid-air during an aerobatic manoeuvre, causing the death of pilot John Derry and onboard flight test observer Anthony Richards. Debris from the aircraft fell onto a crowd of spectators, killing 29 people and injuring 60. 
The cause of the break-up was later determined to be structural failure due to a design flaw in the wing's leading edge. All DH.110s were initially grounded, but after modification to its design, the type entered service with the Royal Navy as the Sea Vixen.  Stricter safety procedures were subsequently enacted for UK air shows and there were no further spectator fatalities until the 2015 Shoreham Airshow crash in which 11 people died.[a] 
Richards was 25 years old and a graduate member of the Royal Aeronautical Society.  Having worked for de Havilland as an apprentice, he had become a member of the flight-test section in December 1948, and in April 1952 had become the first British flight test observer to exceed the speed of sound, with Derry piloting. 
I'll never forget, it looked like confetti, looked like silver confetti. The remaining airframe floated down right in front of us. It just came down like a leaf. And then the two engines, like two missiles, shot out of the airframe and hurtled in the direction of the airshow. There was a sort of silence, then people, one or two people screamed but mostly it was just a sort of shock. You could hear some people sort of whimpering which was quite shocking.
Sixty-three years later, speaking on the BBC Today radio programme in the wake of the 2015 Shoreham Airshow crash, author Moyra Bremner recalled her own traumatic experience.  A huge bang silenced the crowd and was followed by "My God, look out" from the commentator.  Bremner, standing on the roof of her parents' car, realised that an engine was heading straight towards her. It passed a few feet over her head, a "massive shining cylinder", and then plunged into the crowd on the hill behind. 
Following the accident the air display programme continued once the debris was cleared from the runway, with Neville Duke exhibiting the prototype Hawker Hunter and taking it supersonic over the show later that day. 
In laser science, the beam parameter product (BPP) is the product of a laser beam's divergence angle (half-angle) and the radius of the beam at its narrowest point (the beam waist). The BPP quantifies the quality of a laser beam, and how well it can be focused to a small spot. 
The BPP can be easily measured by placing an array detector or scanning-slit profiler at multiple positions within the beam after focusing it with a lens of high optical quality and known focal length. To properly obtain the BPP and M2 the following steps must be followed: 
In principle, one could use a single measurement at the waist to obtain the waist diameter, a single measurement in the far field to obtain the divergence, and then use these to calculate the BPP. The procedure above gives a more accurate result in practice, however. 
High-power lasers, such as those used in laser welding and cutting are typically measured by using a beamsplitter to sample the beam. The sampled beam has much lower intensity and can be measured by a scanning-slit or knife-edge profiler. Good beam quality is very important in laser welding and cutting operations. 
The Barren Islands were named on 25 May 1778 by the British explorer Captain James Cook of the Royal Navy, who wrote, "They obtained their name of Barren Isles from their very naked appearance." 
After seeing limited action as a rookie, this was Michael Vick's first full season as starting quarterback. 
This was Dan Reeves' last full season as head coach as he was replaced by interim Wade Phillips during the following season. 
Vick and linebacker Keith Brooking were voted to play in the Pro Bowl after the season. However, neither Vick not Brooking actually participated in the game. The Pro Bowl was Vick's first and Brooking's second. 
In addition to their new NFC South rivals, the Falcons played all teams from the NFC North and AFC North.  In addition, the Falcons played the New York Giants from the NFC East, and the Seattle Seahawks from the NFC West, based on 2001 standings. 
Wragge & Co LLP was a UK-headquartered international law firm providing a full range of legal services to UK and international clients. Wragge & Co merged with the London law firm Lawrence Graham in May 2014, forming Wragge Lawrence Graham & Co. in 2016, Wragge Lawrence Graham & Co merged with the Canadian firm Gowlings to become Gowling WLG. 
According to The Lawyer 200 in 2011, Wragge & Co was the 23rd largest law firm in the UK. Twenty of its partners featured among Legal 500s 'leading individuals', while the firm was ranked for 41 different practice areas in Chambers UK 2012.  Its 126 equity partners and 500 lawyers advised on deals, projects and disputes from the firm's headquarters in Birmingham and offices in London, Brussels, Guangzhou and Munich. Wragge & Co also had affiliated offices in Abu Dhabi, Dubai and Paris. 
Some of the firms earliest clients included Lloyds Banking Co, The Birmingham Canal Navigations, and Bishop of Worcester. 
In recent years, to help its strategy of increasing revenue through international work, the firm experienced global expansion with offices opening in London, Brussels, Guangzhou and Munich. As a result of a deal with the company's Saudi financier Mohamed Al Mehairi, a new venture in Abu Dhabi was launched in December 2010, with a second office opening in Dubai the following year. Wragge & Co also joined forces with a 10 partner team to open a third affiliated office in Paris. 
The United States men's national under-16 ice hockey team represents the United States at the Youth Olympic Games. 
The team won a gold medal in 2016. Several NHL prospects, such as Jack Eichel and Nick Schmaltz, have played on this team. 
He was born the son of George Parker and the nephew of Admiral Sir Peter Parker, 1st Baronet. He joined the Royal Navy in 1773 under the patronage of his uncle and served throughout the American War of Independence. His uncle then promoted him to lieutenant (at the age of 15) in 1782.  
After his return to England he was appointed to the 74-gun third-rater HMS Aboukir  in which (as part of the Walcheren expeditionary force) he was employed in the North Sea and the Mediterranean until the end of 1813. He then returned home and did not go to sea again. 
He was promoted Rear-Admiral on 4 June 1814, Vice-Admiral on 19 July 1821 and full Admiral on 10 January 1837. His investment as a Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath (KCB) took place on 12 June 1833. 
The Governor of Manipur is the nominal head and representative of the President of India in the state of Manipur. The Governor is appointed by the President for a term of 5 years. The current and 17th Governor of Manipur is La. Ganesan from August 27, 2021. 
7. https://www.thehindu.com/news/national/other-       states/sikkim-governor-sworn-in-as-governor-in-charge-of-manipur/article35875622.ece 
This biographical article related to association football in France, about a defender born in the 1980s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Zumblito is a former Salinan settlement in Monterey County, California. Its precise location is unknown. 
Pekka Juhani Huhtaniemi (born 9 November 1949, in Valkeakoski) is a Finnish diplomat. He served as Finland's ambassador to the United Kingdom in 2010-2015. In 2006-2010, Huhtaniemi was the Undersecretary of State for Trade in Foreign Affairs. 
Huhtaniemi graduated as an undergraduate in 1968 and a Master of Political Science from the University of Helsinki in 1971.  
From 1995 to 1998, Huhtaniemi served as chief cabinet secretary to Erkki Liikanen, at the European Commission, in Brussels. He served as Ambassador at the Finnish Permanent Representation in Geneva, 1998-2003 and in Oslo, 2003-2005. 
Cicero Leak is an American talent agent.  He is the Co-Founder of TLS Talent Agency which provides representation for clients in motion pictures, television, literary rights, brand strategy, interactive media, comedy, commercials, personal appearances and sports.   
He grew up in Durham, North Carolina where he attended Hillside High School.  After high school, Leak attended North Carolina Central University.   
In 2009 Leak started TLS Talent Agency with long time friend Tristian Turner.  The pair started out with just three clients but quickly grew their client list in 2010 by signing Grammy Award Winning singer Fantasia Barrino, Academy Award nominee director James Fargo, entrepreneur and star of ABC's Shark Tank Daymond John, hip-hop duo/actors Kid N Play, BET Network host Big Tigger, MTV Network host Sway Calloway. 
Leak was named one the Honorees of the 2014 North Carolina Central University 40 under 40 Alumni Award. 
Leak was acknowledged by Diverse Representation as one of the Top Ten Professionals in sports and entertainment to watch in 2021. 
Leak along with TLS Co-Founder Tristian Turner and Managing Director Chuck Stinson launched a new sports division, TLS Sports in 2021. The new division will represent professional athletes, coaches, on-air personalities and help athletes from Historically Black Colleges and Universities (HBCU's) that aspire to make to the next level. 
Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart's String Quartet No. 17 in B-flat major, K. 458, nicknamed "The Hunt", is the fourth of the Quartets dedicated to Haydn. It was completed in 1784. It is in four movements: 
Its popularity is reflected in its use in various films, such as The Adventures of Huck Finn, Mystery Date, The Royal Tenenbaums and Star Trek: Insurrection. 
This article about a composition for a chamber music group is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Gibran Latif Hamdan (born February 8, 1981) is a former professional American football quarterback in the National Football League and NFL Europa. He was drafted by the Washington Redskins in the seventh round of the 2003 NFL Draft. He played college football at Indiana. Hamdan was also a member of the Amsterdam Admirals, Seattle Seahawks, San Francisco 49ers, Miami Dolphins, and Buffalo Bills. He is the first person of Pakistani descent to play in the NFL. 
Hamdan's mother was a 16-year-old from Pakistan when she married his father, a Palestinian nuclear engineer who attended the University of Illinois but met her on a business trip. Hamdan was born in San Diego, but his family moved to Kuwait when he was three. 
Hamdan played in NFL Europe in the spring of 2004, where he was backup quarterback behind third-year NFL Europe veteran Clint Stoerner.  He was released by the Redskins in September following training camp. 
Hamdan was out of the league until 2005 when he was signed by the Seattle Seahawks and once again allocated to NFL Europa.  Though originally winning the starting quarterback job for the Amsterdam Admirals over Kurt Kittner, a broken collarbone cut short Hamdan's season.  In the four games he started he posted 39 completions out of 75 attempts for a total of 556 yards, five touchdowns and two interceptions.  He was once again released at the conclusion of training camp. 
The San Francisco 49ers claimed Hamdan off waivers but released him a few days later.  On September 3, he was signed to the 49ers' practice squad. 
Due to an injury to starting quarterback Matt Hasselbeck, the Seahawks elected to re-sign Hamdan to their active roster on October 24 to provide depth. He was inactive for six games with the Seahawks before being released on December 5 and added to the team's practice squad. 
After Hamdan's contract with the Seahawks expired in January, he was signed to a future contract with the Miami Dolphins on February 6, 2007. He was released at the conclusion of the preseason on September 1. 
On September 26, 2007, the Buffalo Bills signed Hamdan to their practice squad after an injury to starting quarterback J. P. Losman. The Bills released Craig Nall and promoted Hamdan to the team's 3rd QB on October 19. Due to injury of Trent Edwards, Hamdan was promoted to backup quarterback for the game between the Bills and the Bengals on November 4, 2007. 
Hamdan appeared in 3 preseason games in 2008, completing 30/47 passes for 258 yards averaging 5.5 yards, a 63.8% completion rate with no touchdowns or interceptions for a passer rating of 78.1. Hamdan suffered a concussion during the final preseason game against the Detroit Lions, a game in which he started. 
Hamdan was promoted backup quarterback for the last two games of the 2008 season pushing J.P. Losman back to third string, who had lost his starting role earlier that year to Trent Edwards. 
A restricted free agent in the 2009 offseason, Hamdan was re-signed by the Bills on February 26 as the Buffalo Bills. The signing of Ryan Fitzpatrick put him back to third string at the start of the 2009 training camp. 
He attended the NFL broadcasters bootcamp in 2009 and was featured his own weekly show on the Buffalo Bills website named 'Hanging Ten with Hamdan'. 
Hamdan appeared in all 4 2009 preseason games, with 32/48 attempts completed for 427 yards averaging 8.9 yards, a 66.7% completion rate, one touchdown and 2 interceptions for a passer rating of 84.3. 
Hamdan was waived on November 19, 2009, in favor of Brian Brohm, who was signed off the Green Bay Packers' practice squad. The Bills re-signed Hamdan on December 22, 2009, after injuries to Fitzpatrick and Edwards, with cornerback Terrence McGee going on injured reserve to make room for Hamdan on the roster. 
On March 10, 2010, it was announced that Hamdan had signed a one-year plus an option contract with the Toronto Argonauts of the Canadian Football League. He retired from football on June 4, 2010. 
Hamdan is married to Jenny Grant, granddaughter of former head coach in the NFL and CFL Bud Grant. Hamdan's younger brother Bush is also a former quarterback who played at Boise State, and is currently an assistant coach at Missouri. 
"Gimme the Loot" is a song by Russian rap artist Egor Rakitin, professionally known as Big Baby Tape, from his debut studio album Dragonborn. The song uses a sample from The Notorious B.I.G. song of the same title. 
The song reached number one on VKontakte, and Apple Music in Russia, and on the American hip hop site Genius. 
Welcome to: Our House (stylized as welcome to: OUR HOUSE) is the second and final studio album by hip hop supergroup Slaughterhouse, consisting of Crooked I, Joe Budden, Joell Ortiz and Royce da 5'9". The album was released on August 28, 2012 via Shady Records and Interscope Records. This would also be their only major label album before disbanding on April 26, 2018. 
On August 4, 2012, the track listing was confirmed with the guests appearances. Notably, Shady records label head Eminem appears on three tracks. Joining Mr. Mathers are Cee Lo Green, Busta Rhymes, Skylar Grey, Swizz Beatz and B.o.B. The producers on the album are AraabMuzik, Streetrunner, Sarom, Mr. Porter, Boi-1da, The Alchemist, J.U.S.T.I.C.E. League, No I.D., Alex da Kid, Hit-Boy, T-Minus, Black Key, Zukhan, Kane Beatz, and Eminem as the executive producer. 
Welcome to: Our House was Slaughterhouse's most successful release to date, peaking at number two in the Billboard 200 and at Number One in the Billboard Top Rap Albums, selling 52,000 copies in the first week. As of September 30, 2012, it has sold 80,000 copies in the US. As of January 2016, the album has sold 200,000 copies in the United States. 
Troy Ball Club Grounds was a baseball ground in Watervliet, New York. It was home to the Troy Trojans baseball club of the National League for the 1882 season. 
Bartlett reported the scouring effect of the current on the plateau, noting that on each side of the current the sounding cylinder, a device for sampling the nature of the bottom with the sounding, brought up ooze. Within the current the "bottom was washed nearly bare", with particles being small and broken pieces of coral rock and so hard the sharp edge of the brass cylinder was bent. 
Due to unusual features of the plateau, particularly scouring by the Florida Current and the Antilles Current that merge over the plateau to form the Gulf Stream, mineral deposits, particularly manganese nodules, have long been of interest. Methane and other gas hydrates are also found on the plateau. 
95th Siege Battery was a heavy howitzer unit of Britain's Royal Garrison Artillery (RGA) raised during  World War I. It manned heavy howitzers on the Western Front from 1916 to 1918, beginning with the Attack on the Gommecourt Salient on the First day on the Somme. It then served at Vimy Ridge and Ypres, against the German Spring Offensive and in the final Allied Hundred Days Offensive. 
On the outbreak of war in August 1914, units of the part-time Territorial Force (TF) were invited to volunteer for Overseas Service and most of the Lancashire and Cheshire Royal Garrison Artillery (L&CRGA) did so. This unit had mobilised as part of No 24 Coastal Fire Command, responsible for the defence of Liverpool, Barrow-in-Furness and the Mersey Estuary. 
According to WO Instruction No 181 of 16 December 1915, 95th Siege Battery was to be formed at Portsmouth from a cadre of 3 officers and 78 other ranks (the equivalent of a TF Company) drawn from the L&CRGA. The L&CRGA cadre was assembled in January 1916 at Crosby Battery under the command of Captain J.E. Wheeler (No 3 Company) with lieutenants T.S. Paterson (No 5 Co) and R.W. Balfour (No 8 Co). After the battery was formed at Portsmouth, it moved to Horsham for training. 
The battery went out to the Western Front on 25 May 1916 equipped with four 9.2-inch howitzers with Major Francis Twiss as officer commanding (OC). It joined VII Corps of Third Army to begin the bombardment for the Attack on the Gommecourt Salient in the forthcoming 'Bug Push' (the Battle of the Somme.  
The front was rearranged at the end of the year. XV Corps took over part of the line from the French Army and 18th HAG HQ was brought in to command the heavy artillery moving into the French gun positions; 95th Siege Bty joined it on 3 December. Although the front was generally quiet, the battery still came under CB fire in its new positions on 14 December. 
95th Siege Bty was ordered to pull its guns out on the night of 6/7 February 1917, immediately after firing its allocation of shells in a scheduled bombardment. The gunners found the move extremely difficult because of the hard frost. The battery then moved via Amiens to join 70th HAG with First Army. However, it transferred to 50th (South African) HAG on 27 February, almost immediately after arriving. 
95th Siege Bty joined 88th HAG supporting VIII Corps and its guns were positioned in the gardens of 'Goldfish Chateau' west of Ypres. Although VIII Corps was not scheduled to attack, its artillery assisted the preparations with CB fire north of the sector to be attacked. Once the assault had been delivered on 7 June, VIII Corps was withdrawn and on 13 June the battery transferred to 57th HAG with II Corps in the Ypres Salient under Fifth Army. 
95th Siege Bty was joined on 28 August by a section from 419th Siege Bty, preparatory to the battery being increased to six howitzers. However the extra guns did not arrive until the following January.[c] 
90th Brigade advanced into Belgium and eventually into Germany as part of British Army of the Rhine where it was disbanded in 1919. 95th Siege Bty was left at Flesselles, near Amiens, with 5th Bde, RGA. In the interim order of battle for the postwar army published in May 1919 the battery was intended to form 120th Bty in XXX Bde, RGA, but this was rescinded after the signing of the Treaty of Versailles, and 95th Siege Bty battery was disbanded later in 1919. 
The Commonwealth War Graves Commission records 40 men of the battery who died in service, but there may have been others listed simply as RGA (as was Capt Wheeler). 
Pitambar is a 1992 Indian Hindi-language film directed by Imran, starring Mithun Chakraborty, Ravi Kishan, Raza Murad and Kiran Kumar. 
Mercy Hospital South has 767 licensed beds and is staffed by approximately 3,700 employees, 790 physicians and provides care to approximately 200,000 patients each year. 
In 1900, the Franciscan Sisters, Daughters of the Sacred Hearts of Jesus and Mary, based in Wheaton, Illinois, opened St. Anthony's Hospital at Grand and Chippewa in south St. Louis City. The facility was named after Anthony of Padua, an early disciple of Francis of Assisi, who patterned his life and healing ministry after the example set by Jesus Christ.  
The Russell and Fern de Greeff Hospice House, known as Greeff Hospice House, provides traditional hospice care to terminally ill individuals who do not have a caregiver available to care for them at home. It is located on 3-1/2 acres of wooded property on the campus of Mercy Hospital South. Patients requiring de Greeff Hospice House services may have a caregiver who is unable to care for them any longer, symptoms that cannot be managed at home or no caregiver or resources to hire outside help. 
In 1998, Russell de Greeff was diagnosed with terminal cancer. He was admitted to St. Anthony's Medical Center, St. Louis, Mo. He and his wife, Fern, saw a need and established an endowment for a freestanding hospice house to care for terminally ill individuals who had no one to care for them in their homes. Russell de Greeff died in June 1998, one year before the hospice house opened in 1999. 
In 2006, the Hospice House expanded to care for 18 patients from the original 10 patients. Fern de Greeff died at age 100 in January 2010. Her name is now synonymous with generosity and hospice care in St. Louis. 
It was added to the National Register of Historic Places in 1969.  It is located in the Onancock Historic District. 
This article about a property in Accomack County, Virginia on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Unlike many contemporary singers his career began late, at the age of 30, and he studied singing in Berlin, with Otto Iro in Vienna and with Aaltje Noordewier-Reddingius in Hilversum. 
Following World War II, Bogtman sang in France and Belgium. In a 1957 recording of Bach's St Matthew Passion with De Nederlandse Bachvereniging, conducted by Anthon van der Horst, he was the Vox Christi. 
In 1967, he was made one of the initial Officers of the Order of Canada "for the humour which he has brought to his profession as a newspaper writer and radio commentator". 
Clark was born and raised in Toronto, and attended high school at Harbord Collegiate Institute.  After twice failing his first year studies at the University of Toronto, in 1911 Clark joined the editorial staff of The Toronto Star, where his father Joseph worked as an editor. Clark would work at the Star for the next 36 years, interrupted only by military service in World War I, from 1916 through 1918. 
Surviving three years in the trenches of World War I, Clark returned to Canada in 1918 a major with the Canadian Mounted Rifles with the Military Cross for conspicuous gallantry at Vimy Ridge. After the Armistice, Clark returned to his job as a newspaper reporter. 
Too old for active service, in World War II Greg Clark returned to the battlefield as a reporter. To his peers  he was Dean of Canadian War Correspondents. Clark reported on the German Blitzkrieg from France in 1940, on Dunkirk and Dieppe from England, and on the Italian and North-West Europe campaigns from the Front.  He was awarded the OBE for his service as a war correspondent. 
Clark and Frise continued to work together as a writer/illustrator team for the Standard, beginning in early 1947.  However, after feeling unwell the night before, Frise died of a heart attack in his home in Toronto on 13 June 1948, at age 57. 
Clark continued as a syndicated columnist for the rest of his life.  Frise was briefly replaced as illustrator by Duncan Macpherson, but this did not last long, and Clark did not work with another illustrator after parting ways with Macpherson circa 1950. 
After a long layoff from book publishing, Clark was persuaded to issue the collection The Best of Gregory Clark (1959), which consisted of an editor's selection of Clark's best Weekend pieces from the 1950s.  It was successful enough to merit a series of sequels, beginning with Greg's Choice (1961) a selection of Clark's own personal favourite Weekend columns.  Collections of Clark's columns thereafter appeared regularly, usually every year or two, for the rest of his life. 
Though he was probably Canada's most honoured journalist, an initiate Officer of the Order of Canada, and decorated as both a fighting soldier and as a war correspondent, Clark's work is currently out of print. 
In 1981, The Life and Times of Gregory Clark, Canada's Favorite Storyteller, by fellow journalist Jock Carroll, was published by Doubleday. 
Deiracephalus is an extinct genus of trilobites. It lived from 501 to 490 million years ago during the Dresbachian faunal stage of the late Cambrian Period. 
The history of Greeks in Baltimore dates back to the late 19th and early 20th centuries. Baltimore is home to one of the largest Greek American communities in the United States. The community is centered in the Greektown and Highlandtown neighborhoods of East Baltimore. 
In 1940, around 1,200 Greek Americans lived in Baltimore. In the same year 1,193 immigrants from Greece lived in Baltimore. These immigrants comprised 2% of the city's foreign-born white population. 
The Greek community in the Baltimore metropolitan area numbered 16,764 as of 2000, making up 0.7 percent of the area's population. In the same year Baltimore city's Greek population was 2,693, 0.4% of the city's population. 
As of September 2014, immigrants from Greece were the twenty-fourth largest foreign-born population in Baltimore and the Greek language was the ninth most commonly spoken language other than English. 
The first Greeks in Baltimore were nine young boys who arrived as refugees of the Chios Massacre, the slaughter of tens of thousands of Greeks on the island of Chios at the hands of the Ottomans during the Greek War of Independence. 
By the 1920s, a vibrant yet small Greek community had been firmly established. The St. Nicholas Greek Orthodox Church was built to serve this growing community. Because there was no direct steamship service from the Mediterranean to the port of Baltimore, many Greek immigrants came by train, often from New York City. 
The peak of the Greek migration to Baltimore was between the 1930s and the 1950s. The Greek community gained its first political representation in 1959, when Peter Angelos became the first Greek American to be elected to the Baltimore City Council. 
The Greek population saw another smaller surge in numbers after the passage of the Immigration and Nationality Act of 1965, which allowed for the immigration of thousands of Greeks. This wave of Greek immigrants to Baltimore ended by the early 1980s. During the 1980s the Greek residents of the neighborhood that was then known simply as the Hill successfully petitioned the city government to rename the neighborhood as Greektown. By that time the Greek community was 25,000 strong. 
While there is still a strong Greek-American presence in Greektown and Highlandtown, the population of the Greek community has been declining. The population is aging and many have moved out of the original Greek neighborhoods. The Latino population is increasing rapidly as the Greek population decreases. The majority of newcomers to the neighborhood are now Latino. 
There are a number of Greek-American restaurants in Baltimore, such as Ikaros, The Acropolis, The Black Olive, Samos, and Zorba's. There is also an annual Greek Folk Festival held at Saint Nicholas Greek Orthodox Church. 
Baltimore historically had a Greek mafia presence. A two-year FBI investigation into a cocaine ring run by the Greek mafia in Baltimore, Philadelphia, and Washington, D.C. resulted in charges being filed in August 1987. 
West Calder High School is a secondary school in West Calder, West Lothian, Scotland. The current school building was opened in 2018. 
The school first opened in 1965 to take up to 750 pupils from the Calders Area of West Lothian, Scotland, which includes East Calder, Mid Calder, West Calder and Polbeth.  The enrollment of pupils in the school was around 900 pupils in 2011.  
Since its opening, the designers of the new West Calder High School building, NORR UK, were nominated for but did not win an award in the 'Pupil Experience' category at the 2018 Education Building Scotland Awards in November 2018. In 2019, the school won Project of the Year title at the Education Buildings Scotland Awards. 
Howard Korder is an American screenwriter and playwright.  He is the author of the 1988 coming-of-age play Boy's Life, which earned him a Pulitzer Prize for Drama nomination. His play Search and Destroy was adapted into a film in 1995. Among the screenplays he has written are The Passion of Ayn Rand and Lakeview Terrace. He is also one of the writers of Boardwalk Empire. 
The mishnas (mishnayot) are devoted in the main to an exact definition of the rules of procedure in the case of a wife who was either actually or supposedly unfaithful. The mishnas discuss other rituals in which speech is a key component, such as egla arufa, breaking the heifer's neck; Hakheil, the Jewish King's septa-annual public Torah reading; and the Blessings and Curses of Mount Gerizim and Mount Ebal. 
The Tosefta of Sotah is divided into fifteen chapters and contains a large number of aggadic and exegetic interpretations, as well as various historical statements and narratives. 
Both Gemaras, Bavli, and Yerushalmi, contain many tales and legends, aggadic interpretations, sayings, and proverbs, in addition to their elucidations of Mishnaic passages. 
Findev Inc. (formerly TransGaming Inc.) is a real estate financing company, with its head office in Toronto, involved in property development within the Greater Toronto area. The company is aligned with Plazacorp, a property development company, which is its major shareholder. The current CEO is Sruli Weinreb. 
A former technology company, it was founded by Gavriel State, who ran the Linux product division at Corel. TransGaming's Graphics and Portability Group was acquired by NVIDIA in 2015, paving way to NVIDIA's first office in Canada, located in Toronto. 
In 2016, TransGaming Inc. decided to change its business focus from technology and gaming to real estate financing. In August 2016 its last remaining gaming division, GameTree TV, together with its subsidiaries and offices in Tel Aviv and Kyiv, were sold to TransGaming Interactive UK Limited, a subsidiary of General Media Ventures based in the United Kingdom. This company, now renamed to PlayWorks Digital Ltd., carries on the former GameTree TV business under the PlayWorks name. 
Cider was a technology marketed towards developers that allows Windows games to run on Mac OS X.  It shared much of the same core technology as Cedega but was designed for video game designers and publishers. Like Cedega, Cider was a proprietary fork of Wine. 
At the 2007 World Wide Developer Conference (WWDC07), Electronic Arts announced their return to the Mac, publishing various titles simultaneously on both PCs and Macs, using Cider on the Mac. 
In a newsletter dated 2007-11-13, the company announced that Cider's improvements will be merging back into Cedega. 
GameTree Linux was a developer program dedicated to the further development of Cedega, which is a compatibility layer for running Microsoft Windows games on Linux.There are games that run on Cedega but not on Wine, and games that run on Wine but not Cedega. Users that want to play a specific game usually look for it on the games databases available on the web. 
SwiftShader is an advanced software renderer with Direct3D 8/9 class features, including shaders. SwiftShader was sold to Google in 2015 for $1.25 million USD. 
In 2010 Transgaming launched their new app, GameTree TV, a cloud-based, on-demand entertainment platform for Smart TV. In 2012 Transgaming acquired the connected TV division of Oberon Media and integrated them into their GameTree TV platform. 
I'll Have Another (foaled April 1, 2009) is a champion American Thoroughbred racehorse who won the 2012 Kentucky Derby and Preakness Stakes. 
He was bred in Kentucky, owned by Canadian businessman J. Paul Reddam and trained by Doug O'Neill. In May 2012, ridden by Mario Gutierrez, he won the first two legs of the Triple Crown by taking the Kentucky Derby with a time of 2:01.83. and the Preakness Stakes in 1:55.94. On the day before the Belmont Stakes, he was scratched due to tendonitis, ending his chances of winning the Triple Crown, and retired from racing. 
After winning on his racecourse debut in July 2011, I'll Have Another finished second to Creative Cause in the Grade II Best Pal Stakes at Del Mar in August.  He ran sixth of the ten runners behind Currency Swap in the Grade I Hopeful Stakes on a sloppy track at Saratoga. 
I'll Have Another began his three-year-old season by winning the Robert B. Lewis Stakes at Santa Anita on February 4, as a 43/1 outsider. In April, he won the Santa Anita Derby, staying on gamely to beat the favorite Creative Cause by a nose. 
On July 11 the New York Times carried a report on the veterinary records of I'll Have Another, which O'Neill had been required to submit to the New York racing authorities. The records showed that the colt had been suffering from osteoarthritis. Three veterinarians interviewed by The Blood-Horse magazine, stated that the medications used were phenylbutazone, dexamethasone and polyglycan, a glucosamine-based medication, all of which were routine and appropriate. 
On November 6, 2018, it was announced that I'll Have Another would return to the U.S. for the 2019 breeding season to stand at stud at the Ballena Vista Farm in Ramona, California for a fee of $6,000. 
This biographical article relating to a Turkish basketball figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Base Band 5, abbreviated as BB5, is the current mobile baseband generation implemented on Nokia mobile phones and the replacement for prior DCT (Digital Core Technology) generations. 
This generation of Nokia phone basebands uses a new range of chipsets, bus systems and components as well as enhanced security mechanisms preventing manipulations of firmware and system configurations. The phones' system interface has changed over from previous generations to allow, for instance, flashing of the device via USB. 
In July 2007, Kaljevic released the instructions and schematics to build a hardware solution for unlocking the Nokia N95. It was based on a CPLD logic IC and worked by manipulating CPU instructions on-the-fly, fooling the phone that a wrong unlock code was accepted like a correct one. However, it is not designed for end-users, since it requires advanced knowledge in electronics and soldering skills to accomplish. 
In August 2008, Kaljevic released a full unlock box for newer BB5 handsets that doesn't require any soldering. 
Since the release of the BB5 generation, although numerous hacks has been released that allowed unlocking as of 2014 it was not possible to load modified firmware into a BB5 phone. 
In 2009, Nemesis Service Suite (NSS) had become a popular software package in order to unlock and extract information from certain BB5 phones. With the use of extra equipment, many BB5 phone could be unlocked using NSS. NSS had also been a popular way to generate a master-code (a code for bypassing Nokia's unlock screen) for BB5 phones. 
The method of finding the master code was done by using connecting the BB5 Nokia phone via USB to a Windows Device running NSS. NSS would then mine for phone information and produce a PM file, storing the master-code plus other phone related information within the file.  
In 2008, Unlockitfree produced a sub site which steps through the NSS process for Windows users. The final step of the website is to upload the data dumped from NSS into Unlockitfree. If the steps were followed successfully, the server would parse the data dump file and identify the Security code for the device.   
Almena is a village in Barron County in the U.S. state of Wisconsin. The population was 677 at the 2010 census. 
A post office called Almena has been in operation since 1888. The village's name is an amalgamation of Albert and Wilhelmina, the names of a first settler and his wife. Almena was platted in 1891. The name Almena came about after the federal government rejected the name "Lightning City" for a post office, which was derived from the nearby Lightning Creek. 
As of the census of 2010, there were 677 people, 297 households, and 178 families living in the village. The population density was 593.9 inhabitants per square mile (229.3/km2). There were 337 housing units at an average density of 295.6 per square mile (114.1/km2). The racial makeup of the village was 96.2% White, 0.1% African American, 0.9% Native American, 0.3% Asian, 0.3% from other races, and 2.2% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 0.7% of the population. 
There were 297 households, of which 30.3% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 42.8% were married couples living together, 9.1% had a female householder with no husband present, 8.1% had a male householder with no wife present, and 40.1% were non-families. 30.6% of all households were made up of individuals, and 15.5% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.28 and the average family size was 2.79. 
The median age in the village was 39.3 years. 23.5% of residents were under the age of 18; 8% were between the ages of 18 and 24; 25.9% were from 25 to 44; 26.4% were from 45 to 64; and 16.2% were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the village was 50.2% male and 49.8% female. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 720 people, 295 households, and 182 families living in the village. The population density was 720.0 people per square mile (278.0/km2). There were 308 housing units at an average density of 308.0 per square mile (118.9/km2). The racial makeup of the village was 97.08% White, 0.14% Black or African American, 1.25% Native American, 0.83% from other races, and 0.69% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.53% of the population. 
There were 295 households, out of which 33.9% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 41.7% were married couples living together, 13.2% had a female householder with no husband present, and 38.3% were non-families. 29.5% of all households were made up of individuals, and 13.9% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.44 and the average family size was 2.99. 
In the village, the population was spread out, with 29.9% under the age of 18, 8.6% from 18 to 24, 31.8% from 25 to 44, 15.8% from 45 to 64, and 13.9% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 32 years. For every 100 females, there were 100.0 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 93.5 males. 
The median income for a household in the village was $27,917, and the median income for a family was $34,028. Males had a median income of $25,833 versus $20,278 for females. The per capita income for the village was $13,928. About 10.8% of families and 14.9% of the population were below the poverty line, including 18.0% of those under age 18 and 15.6% of those age 65 or over. 
 The Poor Clares of Perpetual Adoration (PCPA) are a branch of the Poor Clares, a contemplative order of nuns in the Franciscan tradition. Founded in France in 1854 by Marie Claire Bouillevaux, the Poor Clares of Perpetual Adoration are cloistered nuns dedicated to the Perpetual Adoration of the Blessed Sacrament. 
In the United States, the first foundation was established in Cleveland, Ohio. in 1921. One of the order's best-known members was Mother Angelica, the foundress of the Eternal Word Television Network. Their motherhouse is in Canton, Ohio. There is a second community at Our Lady of Solitude Monastery in Tonopah, Arizona, near Phoenix. It is located within the Roman Catholic Diocese of Phoenix and operates independently of the diocese, with the approval of the bishop of Phoenix. 
In 1715, by orders of Peter the Great he was sent to Isfahan, Persia (which he reached in March 1717) as the new Russian ambassador. During his travelling he was supposed to redirect the silk trade route in Persia to Russia with the Armenians' help. During his stay in Isfahan, Volynsky signed a treaty with the Shah Husayn giving commercial advantages over a country torn by revolts. 
In 1738 he was introduced into the Russian cabinet by Biron as a counterpoise against Andrei Osterman. Volynsky, however, now thought himself strong enough to attempt to supersede Biron himself, and openly opposed the favorite in the State Council in the debates as to the indemnity due to Poland for the violations of her territory during the War of the Polish Succession, Biron advising that a liberal indemnity should be given, whereas Volynsky objected to any indemnity at all. 
A tombstone in their honour was erected in 1741 by order of Elizabeth of Russia over their burial place beside St. Sampson Cathedral. That was the only thing that was visible over their grave until 1885 when a monument was placed as they were seen as national heroes because they opposed German ideas, as represented by Biron. This point of view would have been quite amazing to their contemporaries and reflects more the concerns of the next century than of Biron's and Volynsky's time. 
The charge of conspiracy appears to have been untrue. Volynsky was tortured twice but even under torture he refused to admit to conspiracy, while admitting the ancillary charge of taking bribes (of which no Russian official of the time was innocent). Volynsky's draft of a General Project of Internal Affairs of the State contained many suggestions for reforms of administration but avoided altogether the subject of imperial succession and prerogatives. 
ARA Salta (S-31) is a Type 209 diesel-electric attack submarine in service with the Argentine Navy. The vessel was reported as incapable of navigation as of 2020. However, Argentine navy divers were reported to be using her as a training platform at dockside. 
The station is located below the street of Huyssenallee near the Philharmonie of Saalbau Essen. The station has four entrances and two tracks with side platforms. Mixed-gauge tracks with three rails are used to allow Stadtbahn trains as well as trams to use the station. 
Initially, the station was called Saalbau, since 2004 Philharmonie/Saalbau. Later, the addition Saalbau was deleted. 
This article about a railway station in North Rhine Westphalia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Clyne designed a number book jackets for August Derleth's Arkham House during the first two decades of that publisher's history. 
In 2007 a retrospective exhibition of Clyne's work was mounted at The Narrows in Melbourne, Australia. 
"Valentine's Day" is the sixteenth episode of the second season of the American comedy television series The Office, and the show's twenty-second episode overall. Written by Michael Schur and directed by Greg Daniels, the episode first aired in the United States on February 9, 2006 on NBC. The episode guest stars Craig Anton, Andy Buckley, Charles Esten, and Conan O'Brien as himself. 
The episode was the first time that Pam Beesly (Fischer) had a different hairstyle. In addition, many of the scenes were improvised, including Dwight's line about ham and Michael's antics in New York. "Valentine's Day" received mostly positive reviews from television critics and was watched by 8.95 million viewers. 
When preparing to enter the Dunder Mifflin office for his presentation, Michael is seen sitting by the fountain in front of the tower at 1251 Sixth Avenue, directly across the street from Rockefeller Center. He gets up and walks toward the street, then is seen speaking to the camera in the lobby of the Simon & Schuster building at 1230 6th Avenue, indicating that Dunder Mifflin corporate has offices in that building. 
"Valentine's Day" originally aired on NBC in the United States on February 9, 2006. The episode was viewed by 8.95 million viewers. This marked a dramatic improvement from the previous episode "Boys and Girls", which was viewed by only 5.42 million viewers. 
This biographical article related to an Australian cricket person born in the 1880s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
My Old Man's Place (also known as Glory Boy or The Old Man's Place) is a 1971 American war drama film directed by Edwin Sherin and starring Arthur Kennedy, Mitchell Ryan, William Devane, Michael Moriarty, and Topo Swope. The film was released by Cinerama Releasing Corporation on June 29, 1971. 
The Carmichael Show is an American television sitcom broadcast on NBC created by Jerrod Carmichael, Ari Katcher, Willie Hunter and Nicholas Stoller. The series premiered on August 26, 2015. Starring Carmichael, it follows a fictional version of his family. On May 15, 2016, NBC renewed the series for a 13-episode third season, which premiered on May 31, 2017. On June 30, 2017, NBC canceled the series after three seasons. 
After Jerrod survives a shooting at a local mall in which three people are killed, he is irritated when his family coddles him and treats him like a victim. It is only after Jerrod talks to a police officer and tells what he saw that he begins to realize how lucky he is to be alive. 
Many plant families have multiple succulents species found within them (more than 25 plant families). In some families, such as Aizoaceae, Cactaceae, and Crassulaceae, most species are succulents. The habitats of these water-preserving plants are often in areas with high temperatures and low rainfall, such as deserts. Succulents have the ability to thrive on limited water sources, such as mist and dew, which makes them equipped to survive in an ecosystem that contains scarce water sources. 
A further difficulty for general identification is that plant families (the genus) are neither succulent nor non-succulent and contain both. In many genera and families, there is a continuous gradation from plants with thin leaves and normal stems to those with very clearly thickened and fleshy leaves or stems. The succulent characteristic becomes meaningless for dividing plants into genera and families. Different sources may classify the same species differently. 
The storage of water often gives succulent plants a more swollen or fleshy appearance than other plants, a characteristic known as succulence. In addition to succulence, succulent plants variously have other water-saving features. These may include: 
There are approximately sixty different plant families that contain succulents. Plant orders, families, and genera in which succulent species occur are listed below. 
For some families and subfamilies, most members are succulent; for example the Cactaceae, Agavoideae, Aizoaceae, and Crassulaceae. 
The table below shows the number of succulent species found in some families and their native habitat:[citation needed] 
Succulents are favored as houseplants for their attractiveness and ease of care. If properly potted, succulents require little maintenance to survive indoors. Succulents are very adaptable houseplants and will thrive in a range of indoor conditions. For most plant owners, over-watering and associated infections are the main cause of death in succulents. 
Christ at the Sea of Galilee is an oil painting by Jacopo Tintoretto. The painting depicts Jesus Christ raises a hand toward the apostles, who appear in a boat amid hostile waves at sea. It is an example of mannerism, a European art style that exaggerates proportion and favors compositional tension. This can be seen in the expressive postures of the figures and the muted, yet intense color of the sea and sky. 
Tintoretto had a mostly Venetian audience and was known for painting scenes of Venice, but this painting departs from this path. Additionally, the scene was made to look overly dramatic rather than realistic. The paint is thin and Tintoretto uses extreme highlights, intensifying the darkness and light that seems to come from a compressed and directed light source. 
The painting is currently on display in the Samuel H. Kress Collection at the National Gallery of Art in Washington, D.C.. 
Mark Borisovich Shchukin (October 10, 1937 - July 14, 2008) was a Russian archaeologist. He was Professor of Archaeology at the Saint Petersburg State University and a researcher on archaeology at the Hermitage Museum and the Russian Academy of Sciences. He was also a corresponding member at the German Archaeological Institute. Schukin specialized in the study of the Iron Age cultures of Eastern Europe and their interaction with the classical world. 
Ojara is the chairperson of the select committee to investigate alleged mismanagement in Uganda Telecom (UTL) and a founder member of the Parliament Public Finance Management Forum. Also he is a member of both the Parliamentary Forum on Climate Change and the Uganda Parliamentary Prayer Breakfast Fellowship. 
Ojara was born in Kitgum, Acholi sub-region, on 26 May 1971 in an Anglican family of the Acholi. He had his primary education in his home town of Kitgum and attained his PLE certification in 1987. 
He then attended Lango College for his O-Level education and Sir Samuel Baker Secondary School for his A-Level education, attaining a UCE certification in 1991 and a UACE certification in 1994. 
Ojara further advanced to Makerere University, where he attained a bachelor's degree in social work and social administration in 1997. He then went to Trinity College, Dublin, graduating in 2006 with a Master of Philosophy in international peace studies. 
In 2007, Ojara secured employment at the Cooperative for Assistance and Relief Everywhere (CARE International, Uganda) where he worked as a team leader up until 2009 when he was recruited as a senior technical advisor by UNDP South Sudan. In 2013, he worked as a distributor for Total Uganda before serving as the Prime Minister Acholi Kingdom in 2014 up until 2015 when he resigned to join active politics. 
Ojara is a married man with a number of children. He is passionate about civil rights and social action, economic empowerment, education, health, human-rights, politics and poverty alleviation issues. 
Dinajpur is located on the north-western part of the country. It covers an area of 20.7 square kilometers (8.0 sq mi) 
The percentage of literacy in the city is 85.05% which is quite high compared with that of other cites in Bangladesh. The progress of education has been marked by gradual and steady increase in the proportion of literates. 
Over the last 25 years, Dinajpur has attracted some prominent educational institutions, all of which are government financed. They are as follows: 
Tenth educational board of Bangladesh has been established in Dinajpur in 2007. From 2009 S.S.C. (Secondary School Certificate) and H.S.C. (Higher Secondary School Certificate) exams have been started to be taken. In S.S.C. exam for the first time it stood 2nd in the country in the G.P.A. 5 list. 
Squirrel vs Bear was an American synthpop band from Chico, California.  They released two records, went on a national tour, played with bands such as The Thermals and the Epoxies, and achieved regional popularity before officially disbanding in 2006. 
The band was started in 2003 by members Ronald Barker, Morgan Fleischmann, Kirt Lind, and Ryan Maker.  In October 2004, the band entered the Black Lodge Studio in Chico to record their first record.  Tracked live in three days, The No Business was released in March 2005. 
In September 2005, Squirrel vs Bear embarked on their first and only national tour with their sister band, The Cheat.  The tour proved an enormous strain on the band's relationship, and by the end they had decided to disband.  In December, they played their final show, and ceased operations as a live band to focus on working in the studio. 
In September 2006, Squirrel vs Bear Thrill Her was finally completed and released.  It was recorded over the course of a year in their home studio.  Whereas their first record was recorded live, Thrill Her was more produced and overdubbed, heavily featuring the MicroKorg and Akai MPC.  The band played a reunion show on September 2, 2006, to coincide with the release of the record, which was the last time the band is expected to perform live. 
The band's sound is best described as synth-pop, although the terms dance-punk, post-punk and new-wave have also been used.  They are also notorious for covering Hip-hop and R&B artists such as Michael Jackson, Murs, Ciara, Dr. Octagon, and Prince. 
The Red Eagle Formation (or Red Eagle Limestone) is a geologic formation ranging from Oklahoma, through Kansas, into southeast Nebraska of the United States. Its members define the Carboniferous-Permian boundary in Kansas. 
In the Oklahoma type location, the Red Eagle is a single limestone unit, not further defined into members. However, from the far southeast Nebraska type section into northern Kansas, the Red Eagle Formation consists of three members, each with distinctive lithologies. In Nebraska and northern Kansas in particular, the formation stands out on riverside bluffs and road cuts as two blocky, light-colored limestones sandwiching a dark layer of shale. 
Named from exposures south of Howe, Nebraska, the Howe Limestone member is a grey limestone, 4-5 feet thick, that weathers to buff or slightly yellow. The limestone exhibits brachiopods, baculites, and larger bivalve mollusks. The environment was an open, but very shallow sea with very little in the way of terrogenous sediments. As such, the topmost bed is particularly notable for algae beds and melon-sized stromatolites. 
Named from exposures high in valley sides just northwest of Glenrock, Nebraska, the Glenrock Limestone member is lighter grey. It is a hard limestone; fresh fractures sparkle in full sunlight from tiny calcite crystals.  
This article about a specific stratigraphic formation in Oklahoma is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a specific stratigraphic formation in Kansas is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In the first round proper, two pots were made, first pot with Divizia A teams and other teams till 16 and the second pot with the rest of teams qualified in this phase. Each tie is played as a single leg. 
If a match is drawn after 90 minutes, the game goes in extra time, and if the scored is still tight after 120 minutes, then a replay will be played. In case the game is still tight after the replay, then the team from lower division will qualify for the next round. 
From the first edition, the teams from Divizia A entered in competition in sixteen finals, rule which remained till today. 
Cellana solida is a species of sea snail or true limpet, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Nacellidae. 
Allinson was born in December 1852 in Newcastle upon Tyne. He attended Lincoln College, Oxford, beginning in 1872, from which he took a Bachelor of Arts degree on 14 June 1877, and a Master of Arts degree in 1882. After graduation he worked as an assistant school master and a librarian. He was also a meteorological hobbyist. He was living in Newcastle, Northumberland in 1901, and in St Thomas, Exeter in Devon in 1911. He died in December 1929 in the London Borough of Hackney. 
Allinson's primary importance to literature is in helping to introduce French authors Alexandre Dumas and Anatole France to a broad English audience. Several of his translations of their works were the first into English, and a number of these remain the only English versions. In the case of Anatole France, his were the English versions authorised by the original writer. 
Note: publication dates shown are those of the translation, not of publication in the original language. 
The following is a list of African-American holders of public office from 1900 to 1959. This period was a low point for African American elected officials, especially as African-Americans were almost entirely barred from public office in former Confederate states under the Jim Crow regime. The number of African American officeholders would dramatically increase following the passage of the Civil Rights Act of 1964. 
The Times had the scoop headline "Everest: The Last Climb: Hopes That Summit Was Reached", and Noel's 1924 film, according to Wade Davis, "elevated Mallory ... into the realm of the Titans". Noel's film The Epic of Everest: The Immortal Film Record of This Historic Expedition had its premiere at the New Scala Theatre on 8 December 1924.[note 2] 
In 1981 Walt Unsworth revealed in his book Everest that "The Affair of the Dancing Lamas" was the primary reason why Mount Everest expeditions had been again banned by Tibet.[note 6] The main blame for the diplomatic incident is indeed laid on Noel rather than Hazard but Unsworth views the position of the Tibetan government differently from the more recent accounts of Hansen and Davis, whose analysis has been given above. 
Ashwater is a village and civil parish in the Torridge district of Devon, England.  According to the 2001 census it had a population of 651 that had risen to 673 by the 2011 census.  It is close to the Cornish border, and is about 10 miles north of Launceston. 
The church is thirteenth century, with fifteenth-century windows, with an arcade that mixes the two periods. The decorated font is Norman, described by Mee as "a great treasure". The former rectory is a Grade II listed building. 
Huang Shih Tsai (born June 1951) is a Hong Kong billionaire property developer, who is chairman of Great China International, a privately held investment company. 
The 2007 Motorola Indy 300 was a race in the 2007 IRL IndyCar Series, held at Infineon Raceway. It was held over the weekend of 24 -August 26, 2007, as the fifteenth round of the seventeen-race calendar. 
The story as Herodotus tells it was taken up in other literature. Lucian of Samosata wittily imagined the dialogue between Poseidon and the very dolphin who bore Arion. 
From what is told in ancient Greek scripts, Arion, although favored by Apollo, is the son of Poseidon and Ino. 
The episode may be seen as a doublet of the fate of Melicertes, where the leap into the sea was that of his mother, Ino. transformed into the "white goddess" Leucothea; Melicertes was carried more dead than alive to the shores where the Isthmian Games were celebrated in his honour, as he was transformed to the hero Palaimon, who was placated with a nocturnal chthonic rite, and the whose winners were crowned with a barren wreath of spruce. 
A similar story of told of the founding of Taras in Megale Hellas (Magna Graecia), modern Taranto, Apulia, Italy. When a son of Poseidon called Taras was shipwrecked, his father rescued him by sending a dolphin which he rode to traverse the sea from the promontory of Taenarum to the south of Italy. Brought ashore, Taras founded the city of the same name. According to Pausanias, he was worshiped as a hero who named both the city and the river, Taras after himself. 
Another parallel is the myth of Dionysus and the sailors, related in the Homeric Hymns: Tyrrhenian pirates try to lash the god to the mast, but the wood itself starts to sprout and the mast is entwined with ivy (like the god's thyrsus); the sailors leap into the sea and are transformed into dolphins.  This is especially interesting because Arion is credited with the invention of the dithyramb, a dionysiac song. 
Stewart Flory identified Herodotus' characteristic use of the episode in a historicising context as an example of what Flory calls his "brave gestures", a man faced with death performs with calm dignity some spirited but unnecessary gesture that demonstrates contempt for danger. 
Heywood saw what he believed to be a disproportionate concentration of capital in the hands of a few as the result of a selective extension of government-backed privileges to certain individuals and organizations. 
Heywood's philosophy was instrumental in furthering individualist anarchist ideas through his extensive pamphleteering and reprinting of works of Josiah Warren, author of True Civilization (1869), and William B. Greene. In 1872, at a convention of the New England Labor Reform League in Boston, Heywood introduced Greene and Warren to eventual Liberty publisher Benjamin Tucker. 
Unlike Bennett, Heywood was pardoned after six months by President Rutherford B. Hayes in response to massive protests by sympathizers and free speech advocates. Arrested four more times following his release, Heywood died of tuberculosis within a year of his final release from prison. 
Heywood met his wife Angela Heywood through her work in the abolitionist movement. They had four children together named Psyche, Angelo, Vesta, and Hermes. 
Tatari is a monotypic genus of Ni-Vanuatu jumping spiders containing the single species, Tatari multispinosus. It was first described by Lucien Berland in 1938, and is found only on Vanuatu. The species name is derived from Latin, meaning "having multiple spines". 
This article related to jumping spiders (Salticidae) is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Kelvin Kinikanwo Wachukwu is a Nigerian engineer who served as Rivers State Commissioner of Works from December 2015 to April 2016. He was suspended indefinitely from office for negligence, dereliction of duty, particularly his failure to supervise projects effectively. He was replaced by Harrison B. Iheanyichukwu on 9 May 2016. 
This biographical article relating to Rivers State is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Uijuro is a legal dong, or neighbourhood of the Jung-gu district in Seoul, South Korea and governed by its administrative dongs, Sogong-dong and Jungnim-dong. 
David Lale (born 1981) is a cellist from the United Kingdom. He is a member of the Lale String Quartet and plays regularly in a number of orchestras in the UK  including the BBC Symphony Orchestra and the Philharmonia Orchestra. David is the nephew of Australian cellist David Lale. 
David studied under Anna Shuttleworth at the University of Leeds and Louise Hopkins at the Guildhall School of Music and Drama. He has performed as soloist with the Southbank Sinfonia  and with other orchestras.  
A young maid, referred to as "Mai-chan", happens to be immortal, and her mistress forces her to participate in sexual acts with customers, who are allowed to do whatever they want to her. As well as being immortal, she has the ability to regenerate, as does a young boy called Kizuna. A life of being sexually humiliated and dismembered daily ensues. 
Stephen Michael McCarthy (born July 21, 1988 in Honolulu, Hawaii) is a former American soccer player who previously played for San Antonio FC. 
McCarthy played youth soccer with the Dallas Texans 88'. Former teammates include Andre Akpan, Ross LaBauex, Jonathan Villanueva and Omar Gonzalez. This team also won three National Championships along with being the only American team to win the Dallas Cup Super Group. During that year both Manchester United and Real Madrid took part in the international tournament. 
McCarthy attended Nolan Catholic High School in Fort Worth, Texas. During his senior year along with leading Nolan Catholic to a State Championship, he was also awarded the Texas Association of Private and Parochial Schools Division I Offensive Player of the Year. As well as being recognized as an All-State selection (2006). 
McCarthy played college soccer at Santa Clara University, and later transferred to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill. He also played USL Premier Development League for the DFW Tornados and then the Carolina Dynamo in the following year. 
McCarthy represented the U.S. at the Under-20 level. In 2007, he played for the U.S. Under-18's at the Pan-American Games held in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil. 
Without Honor is a 1949 film noir directed by Irving Pichel and starring Bruce Bennett, Laraine Day, Dane Clark, Agnes Moorehead, and Franchot Tone. 
Arthur Lions notes in Death on the Cheap: The Lost B Movies of Film Noir, "A top-notch cast is wasted in a total clunker. The film takes the award, however, for the movie with the shortest performance by a top-billed star. Leading man Tone, after his brief initial appearance, spends most of the picture as the "corpse" in the laundry room." 
WMUH (91.7 FM) is a college radio station, supported through Muhlenberg College, located in Allentown, Pennsylvania, in the Lehigh Valley region of Pennsylvania in the United States. 
In 2000, WMUH was named one of the top 20 college radio stations by The Princeton Review.  That same year, WMUH was named the best radio station in the Lehigh Valley (including commercial stations) by the Lehigh Valley Music Awards Association. 
The station began broadcasting in 1948 at 640 AM, but could only be heard on the Muhlenberg campus.  This continued until 1964, when Muhlenberg received an FCC broadcast license for an FM station on 89.7. However, WMUH's reach was still primarily the Muhlenberg campus. 
This changed in 1979, when WMUH received a power increase of 440 watts, moved over to 91.7 FM, and could be heard throughout the Lehigh Valley. 
In 1982, WMUH began broadcasting for the first time at 24 hours a day, seven days a week.  This was primarily accomplished with community volunteers and recently graduated ex-WMUH disc jockeys covering the overnights from 2AM - 6AM. 
In the 1980s, WMUH launched the station's slogan "the only station that matters," which is still in use to this day, and was a take-off on the phrase, "the only band that matters," which was used in England to describe The Clash during that period. 
The Bears experienced major offensive problems at the start of the season, resulting in the team's worst 17-game start in eight years. But the team saw more success as the season progressed, including a seven-game road winning streak from November 28 to January 11, and a seven-game point streak from January 26 to February 15. The Bears participated in the 2013 AHL Outdoor Classic, but lost to the Wilkes-Barre/Scranton Penguins. 
Note: GP = Games played; TOI = Time on ice; W = Wins; L = Losses; GA = Goals against; GAA = Goals against average; SV = Saves; SA = Shots against; SV% = Save percentage; SO = Shutouts; G = Goals; A = Assists; PIM = Penalty minutes Updated as of May 8, 2013 
Just a Souvenir is an album by Squarepusher, which was widely released on 27 October 2008. The album had been available to purchase as a download from bleep.com on 15 September 2008. 
Folklore (born 2003) is a retired American Thoroughbred racing filly. In 2005, she won the Breeders' Cup Juvenile Fillies and won an Eclipse Award for champion juvenile filly of 2005. She won the Matron Stakes by fourteen lengths and finished third in the Santa Ynez Stakes in her only start as a three-year-old. She fractured her knee in 2006 which caused her early retirement. 
USS Columbine (1862) was a side-wheel steamer that patrolled with the South Atlantic Blockading Squadron in the American Civil War. 
Columbine was originally a tugboat. The vessel was built in New York City in 1850 as A. H. Schultz, purchased by the Union Navy on 12 December 1862, outfitted by Howe & Cope-\land, New York City, and placed under the command of Acting Master J. S. Dennis. 
More than half of Columbine's crew were wounded in the fighting. Official records of Columbine indicate that only one seaman was killed. The remaining seamen were eventually transferred to Andersonville, Georgia Prison; the officers being sent to Macon, Georgia. 
The destruction of Columbine was one of the few instances in which a Union warship was destroyed by land-based forces during the Civil War in Florida. During the spring of 1864, the Confederates managed to sink four other Union ships in the St. Johns River with the use of a new weapon: the underwater mine. 
The wreck has only recently been discovered and a marker was placed on the site where Dickison and his men captured the "USS Columbine by the Florida Confederation for the Preservation of Historic Sites, Inc. 
This article incorporates text from the public domain Dictionary of American Naval Fighting Ships. The entry can be found here. 
He was born at Oudenarde, in Flanders. Intended for the church, he studied Greek and Latin at Ghent, and philosophy at Leuven; but his father having been outlawed for his religion, and deprived of his estate, retired to England, where the son followed him in 1567. He found a teacher of Hebrew in Antoine Rodolphe Chevallier, with whom he resided for some time at Cambridge. In 1572 he became professor of Oriental languages at Oxford. 
Upon the pacification of Ghent (1576), he returned with his father to their own country, and was appointed professor of Oriental languages at the University of Leiden in the following year. In 1585, he removed to Friesland and was admitted as professor of Hebrew at the University of Franeker, an office which he discharged with great honour till his death. He acquired a reputation as a professor, and his class was frequented by students from all the Protestant countries in Europe. 
He was learned in Hebrew and in Jewish antiquities; and in 1600 the states-general employed him, at a salary of 400 florins a year, to write notes on the difficult passages in the Old Testament; but, this work was not published until after his death. As the friend of Jacobus Arminius, he was charged by the Contra-Remonstrant party with unfairness in the execution of the task, and the last sixteen years of his life were therefore marred by controversy. 
He carried on an extensive correspondence with the learned in different countries; for, besides letters in Hebrew, Greek and other languages, there were found amongst his papers upwards of 2000 written in Latin. He had a son, John, who died in England at the age of twenty-one, and was accounted a prodigy of learning. He had mastered Hebrew at the age of nine, and Scaliger said that he was a better Hebrew scholar than his father. 
The Flying Torpedo is a 1916 American silent drama directed by John B. O'Brien and Christy Cabanne. It was produced by the Fine Arts Film Company and distributed by the Triangle Film Corporation. The film was written by John Emerson (who also stars), Robert M. Baker and D. W. Griffith (who was not credited). The film is now considered lost. 
John Emerson had previously portrayed the role of Winthrop Clavering in the play The Conspiracy, from December 1912 to March 1914. 
The film was produced by D. W. Griffith's film production company Fine Arts and was distributed by Triangle Film Corporation. Griffith also helped to write the film's scenario with lead John Emerson and Robert Baker. Griffith was also responsible for casting a teenage Bessie Love in the film whom he discovered and cast in several of his films in 1915. Filming began in July 1915 under the working title The Scarlet Band. Christy Cabanne directed the battle sequences. 
Anyphaena pectorosa is a species of ghost spider in the family Anyphaenidae. It is found in the United States and Canada. 
The Red Three (German: Rote Drei) was the Switzerland section of the so-called Red Orchestra. It was established and maintained by Soviet Military Intelligence Staff Division 4. 
He died of cancer at age 51 in 1968. His only recordings as a leader were five tunes for Signature Records in 1945 and some V-Discs. 
Koberidze was born in Tiflis, Georgian SSR (now Tbilisi, Georgia), where he graduated from the Rustaveli State Theatre Institute in 1948. He then worked at the Drama Theater in Sukhumi and Marjanishvili Theater in Tbilisi. He played more than 50 roles during his career at the film studio Kartuli Pilmi, including a memorable role of a 17th-century Georgian hero in the 1956 historical action film Bashi-Achuki. He directed ten films and wrote scripts for three films. 
Bolshaya Nazarovskaya is located 17 km northwest of Vozhega (the district's administrative centre) by road. Okulovskaya is the nearest rural locality. 
Its main rival in the United States was ANALOG Computing, another long-lived magazine devoted to the Atari 8-bit line. Multi-system magazines COMPUTE! and Family Computing also served Atari 8-bit owners with type-in programs. 
NASA programmer Jim Capparell was an early Atari 8-bit owner. He quit his job on 15 January 1982 to found a magazine for the computer. Companies such as On-Line Systems, Broderbund, and Synapse Software agreed to purchase advertising in the new publication, and Capparell's staff distributed the first issue of 30 pages at the March 1982 West Coast Computer Faire. The first issue of Antic was published in April 1982. While it began as a bimonthly magazine, within a year it had gone monthly.  
By Christmas 1983 the magazine was 148 pages, but in 1984 Antic saw advertising sales drop by 50% in 90 days. The Antic Software catalog, bound into each issue, contained public domain software, re-released products from the Atari Program Exchange after it folded, and original titles. It helped the company avoid bankruptcy, and in 1985 it started II Computing for the Apple II series. 
Antic started selling games and application software under the name Antic Software after the Atari Program Exchange was closed by Atari, Inc.. The Antic Software catalog was bound into issues of the magazine and included former APX titles. 
In 1985 Antic began ST Resource, a section of the magazine devoted to the Atari ST line. In 1986 it began STart Magazine for the computer. The daughter magazine would outlive its parent by about a year. When Antic ended, it continued as a section of STart, appearing in six more issues. A magazine for the Amiga, the primary competitor of the Atari ST, was published from 1989 until 1991 under the name Antic's Amiga Plus. 
Versions of TYPO were also published and used (with permission) by Page 6 magazine. ANALOG magazine also used a two-letter checksum code for their type-in programs they offered and was interoperable with Antic's TYPO II. 
The Church of Holy Trinity is an Anglican church on Bell Hill in Stapleton, Bristol, England. It has been designated as a grade II* listed building. 
Parish records for Holy Trinity church, Stapleton, Bristol are held at Bristol Archives (Ref. P.HTS)  (online catalogue) including baptism, marriage and burial registers. The archive also includes records of St Giles' church Begbrook, the incumbent, parochial church council, churchwardens, schools and societies. 
Suzuki is considered to be one of the foremost specialists in the Ranging Rook opening. Suzuki and fellow ranging rook specialists Takeshi Fujii and Toshiaki Kubo are collectively referred to as the "Ranging Rook Big Three". 
Suzuki was selected to be an executive director and serve on the Japan Shogi Association's board of directors for a two-year term at the association's 68th General Meeting on May 29, 2017. He was re-elected to a second two-year term in June 2019. 
This article related to an Italian comedy film of the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to German cycling is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
She never intended to work for the Foreign Ministry, having studied Islamic Studies at Hebrew University. However, after the Yom Kippur War, and recommendations made by the Agranat Commission, "she was recruited for her knowledge of Arabic culture." 
The 1972 Cotton Bowl Classic was a college football bowl game between the Penn State Nittany Lions and the Texas Longhorns. The 36th Cotton Bowl Classic, it was played on Saturday, January 1, 1972, at the Cotton Bowl in Dallas, Texas. 
The convincing win pushed Penn State back up to fifth for the final AP poll, while Texas fell to 18th. 
The Longhorns went to three more Cotton Bowls in the 1970s, while Penn State returned three years later. 
At the 2019 National Championships, an international swimming competition held July to August 2019 in Stanford, California, Casas won the national title in the 100-meter backstroke. His time of 52.72 made him the fifth fastest swimmer in the event globally for the year, and the seventh fastest American in the event in history. 
At the US Olympic Trials held in Omaha, Nebraska and postponed to June 2021 due to the COVID-19 pandemic, Casas competed in two events. In the 100-meter backstroke he swam a 52.76 in the final, finished in third place behind Ryan Murphy and Hunter Armstrong, and did not make the 2020 US Olympic team in the event. In his second event, the 200-meter backstroke, he finished in sixth place in the final with a time of 1:57.64 and did not qualify for the US Olympic team. 
Casas entered to compete in all the individual backstroke events, 50-meter, 100-meter, and 200-meter distances, at the 2021 World Short Course Championships in Abu Dhabi, United Arab Emirates in December. 
Crawford is a city in Oglethorpe County, Georgia, United States. The population was 832 at the 2010 census. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 807 people, 326 households, and 203 families residing in the city.  The population density was 687.5 people per square mile (266.3/km2).  There were 369 housing units at an average density of 314.4 per square mile (121.8/km2).  The racial makeup of the city was 68.77% White, 29.49% African American, 0.12% Native American, 0.37% Asian, and 1.24% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.24% of the population. 
There were 326 households, out of which 28.8% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 38.7% were married couples living together, 19.3% had a female householder with no husband present, and 37.7% were non-families. 33.7% of all households were made up of individuals, and 17.2% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older.  The average household size was 2.29 and the average family size was 2.93. 
In the city, the population was spread out, with 23.0% under the age of 18, 8.7% from 18 to 24, 24.4% from 25 to 44, 20.0% from 45 to 64, and 23.9% who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 40 years. For every 100 females, there were 71.3 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 67.4 males. 
The median income for a household in the city was $19,917, and the median income for a family was $32,969. Males had a median income of $27,500 versus $19,028 for females. The per capita income for the city was $13,934.  About 15.5% of families and 23.7% of the population were below the poverty line, including 19.6% of those under age 18 and 26.4% of those age 65 or over. 
Electricity is provided directly by Georgia Power. Water and sewage are provided by the city. The city maintains two treatment plants: one is located off U.S. 78 near the western city limit, while the second is located off Waterworks Road at the end of Park Avenue on the eastern city limit. The city also provides water services to some parts of Oglethorpe County as well as the county school system. 
Eisbrecher (German for "Icebreaker") is the fourth and final album by German pop rock band Nena and the fifth studio album of its singer, Gabriele "Nena" Kerner. After the band split the following year, Kerner went on to a solo career. "Mondsong" and the remix of "Engel der Nacht" were released as singles. 
 The Eisbrecher album came out when the fortunes of the band were decidedly on the wane.  The concert tour to promote its predecessor, Feuer und Flamme, had been poorly attended and the band had parted company with their manager Jim Rakete.  In his 2014 memoirs, the band's drummer Rolf Brendel described the idea behind the album: 
We wanted to remember our beginnings, what had made us great. Eisbrecher was meant to be a clear, uncompromising album, without technical bombast. ... He [Klaus Voormann, the album's producer] had to tear it out, to inspire Nena's new old life and to tap into the success of the first two albums.
In the event and over time, it was two other tracks from the album which were to prove to be the most enduring. 
Whatever its provenance, the 2002 version of the song was the only track from Eisbrecher included in the 2010 Best of Nena album which Nena holds out as being her only compilation album comprising tracks which she, as opposed to her record company, has selected. 
Wallace "Wally" Cleaver is a fictional character in the iconic American television sitcom Leave It to Beaver. Wally is the thirteen-year-old son of archetypal 1950s suburban parents, Ward and June Cleaver and the older brother of the seven-year-old ("almost eight") title character, Theodore "Beaver" Cleaver. The characters grew older along with the actors. 
Leave it to Beaver was created by writers Joe Connelly and Bob Mosher, who found inspiration among their own children for plot lines and dialogue. Wally is based on Connelly's son, Jay. 
Wally serves as a bridge between Ward, June and Beaver. He is more astute and experienced than his brother and often puts parental communications in simpler terms for Beaver's comprehension. At other times, he clues the parents in on Beaver's activities, plans and feelings. At the age of five, Wally gave a newborn Beaver his nickname while trying to pronounce his given name of Theodore. 
Though there are four bedrooms in the Cleaver house, Wally and Beaver share a bedroom. Their bedroom is a principal setting on the show. Wally spends his time in the bedroom at a small desk doing school assignments, the boys entertain their friends in the bedroom, and the room is often the scene of Ward's disciplinary lectures. Though Wally sometimes warns Beaver he will suffer some sort of physical punishment from Ward ("Dad's gonna clobber you!"), such punishments never occur. 
Many episodes have a very brief "after school" scene in the kitchen between June and Wally. Wally arrives home and finds his mother preparing dinner; he regales her with teenspeak banter about the day's events at school. Then, as Wally leaves the room with a parting bon mot and the canned laughter kicks in, the camera catches June's bewildered, dazed, or amused facial expression. 
A few episodes deal with Wally's teen taste in hairstyles and clothing. In one episode, he infuriates his mother by wearing his hair in a greasy "tango dancer" style and in another episode he irks both his parents when he buys a garish suit in a men's wear store. 
As Beaver grew into an awkward young teen, he sometimes took a back seat to his older brother Wally, a student in his final years of high school. Tony Dow had grown into an attractive, athletic young man and was often featured in "heartthrob"-type magazines aimed principally at teen girls. Producers took advantage of Dow's popularity and scripted episodes delving into Wally's dating life, his after school jobs, his pals, and his car. Beaver was relegated to the background. 
In 1983, CBS aired the reunion telemovie Still the Beaver starring Jerry Mathers. Other members of the original series cast, including Dow, reprised their roles. In 1985, a sequel to the original series was produced called Still the Beaver, again starring Jerry Mathers and other original cast members. The series lasted one season on the Disney Channel before being picked up by TBS in 1986 and renamed The New Leave It to Beaver. The series aired until 1989. 
The trees are dioecious, meaning that there are male and female trees. Male trees produce multiple male flowers on a terminal raceme. These have red sepals and petals, and about 20 stamens per flower. On rare occasion a male flower can produce a gynoecium, turning it bisexual. Female flowers grow individually on their own pedicel and have staminodes. 
Sclerocarya birrea is divided into three subspecies: subsp. birrea, subsp. caffra and subsp. multifoliolata. These subspecies are differentiated by changes in leaf shape and size. They also grow in different areas in Africa. Subsp. birrea is found in northern Africa, subsp. caffra is found in southern Africa, and subsp. multifoliolata is only found in Tanzania. The leaves are alternate, compound, and imparipinnately divided. The leaflet shapes range from round to elliptical. 
The generic name Sclerocarya is derived from the Ancient Greek words 'skleros' meaning 'hard' and 'karyon' meaning 'nut'. This refers to the hard pit of the fruit. The specific epithet 'birrea' comes from the common name 'birr', for this type of tree in Senegal. The marula belongs to the same family Anacardiaceae as the mango, cashew, pistachio and sumac, and is closely related to the genus Poupartia from Madagascar. 
Common names include jelly plum, cat thorn, morula, cider tree, marula, maroola nut/plum, and in Afrikaans, maroela. The marula tree is protected in South Africa. 
On an industrial level the fruit of the marula tree is collected from the wild by members of rural communities on whose land the trees grow. This harvest and sale of fruit only occurs during two to three months but is an important income to poor rural people. This can be an  important source of income for poor rural women. The fruit is delivered to processing plants where fruit pulp, pips, kernels and kernel oil are extracted and stored for processing throughout the year.[citation needed] 
The fruit is used to make the cream liqueur Amarula and also sold as a frozen puree used in juice blends. Marula oil is used as an ingredient in cosmetics.[citation needed] 
The crown prince was a member of the Danish Order of Freemasons, serving as its Grand Master from 1871 until his death. 
Frederick and Louise resided at Amalienborg Palace in Copenhagen, spending the summers at Charlottenlund Palace north of the city. They had four sons and four daughters; their eldest sons, Christian and Carl, would become kings of Denmark and Norway respectively. 
Frederick became king of Denmark upon his father's death on 29 January 1906. In many ways, Frederick VIII was a liberal monarch who was much more favorable to the new parliamentarian system than his father had been, being reform-minded and democratically inclined. 
Due to his late accession to the throne, Frederick's reign would last only six years, throughout which he was plagued by ill health. 
False rumors soon began to circulate about a possible scandal involving the king, as the place where he collapsed and died at was near a well-known brothel. The local police did not disclose details about the investigation, for fear of causing distress to the royal family. 
The reigning families of Denmark, Norway, Belgium and Luxembourg are descended from King Frederick VIII; Denmark's through his eldest son Christian X, and Norway's through his second son, Haakon VII. The royal family of Belgium and grand ducal family of Luxembourg are both descended from his daughter, Princess Ingeborg of Denmark. 
The Kronprins Frederiks Bro in Frederikssund and King Frederick VIII Land in Greenland are named after him. 
Mark Thomas McNally (born 20 July 1989) is a British former professional road and track racing cyclist, who rode professionally between 2009 and 2018 for four different professional teams. 
McNally was born in Fazakerley, Liverpool. He took up cycling after watching the 2000 Summer Olympics on television. In November 2014, Madison Genesis announced that McNally would join them for the 2015 season. 
In 1850 at a meeting of the Cambrian Archaeological society (Cymdeithas Hynafiaethau Cymru), Phillips announced that he was seeking to locate his large collection at a location in Wales. He employed a distant relative by marriage, Amelia Elizabeth Guppy, to photograph some of his collection in 1853 including artefacts from Babylon and Utrecht. 
Phillipps married Henrietta Elizabeth Molyneux, daughter of Major-General Thomas Molyneux, in 1819. This was after the death of his father, who had opposed the match because she lacked a dowry. 
In 1821, he was made baronet of Middle Hill in the County of Worcester at the age of 29. The honour was the result of his father-in-law's connections with the Duke of Beaufort. He was appointed High Sheriff of Worcestershire in 1825. 
Phillipps' eldest daughter, Harriett, married the Shakesperean scholar James Orchard Halliwell. While still an undergraduate at Cambridge, Halliwell had collaborated in research with Phillipps. He came to visit Thomas Phillipps in February 1842 and became attached to Harriett. Phillipps refused to allow his daughter to marry and the couple eloped. Phillipps was enraged by this and maintained a lifelong vendetta against the couple. 
As the Phillippses had only daughters the title became extinct on his death in February 1872, aged 79. He was buried at the Church of St Eadburgha in Broadway. 
This biographical article related to Danish artistic gymnastics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Titanoptilus stenodactylus is a moth in the family Pterophoridae first described by Thomas Bainbrigge Fletcher in 1911. It is known from South Africa, Tanzania, the Democratic Republic of the Congo and the Comoros. 
This article on a moth of the family Pterophoridae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In the mid-nineteenth century, the colonial Dutch began importing Indian labor to work on Sumatran plantations and to construct roads, trenches, and dykes; today, Sumatra is home to as many as 60,000 people of Indian descent, many of whom reside in Medan. 
Every year, Kampung Madras becomes a meeting point for Hindu and/or Tamil festivals such as Thaipusam, Thai Pongal, and Deepavali. 
Kampung Madras is made of a ten acre landscape beginning the edge of Sungai Soekamoelia off Jalan Palang Merah, precisely the corner of Bank Sumut Medan, eclipsing towards Jalan Diponegoro to the East encircling all the way to Jalan Jendral Sudirman Sekolah Immanuel (Formerly Known as Queen Beatrice School) towards Sungai Babura, covering all the areas towards Jalan Cik di Tiro leading to Titi Berlian on the North rounding up all the way to the Chettiar Kovil in Jalan Kebun Bunga.  
Shri Mariamman, an historic temples, stand as an icon of Kampung Madras is located along Jalan Zainul Arifin, as well as other Hindu temples the Kaliamman Temple and the Thedayuthabani Chettiar Temple on Jalan Kebun Bunga. 
There is also Khalsa Indian school, later changed to be Khalsa National School, that has a long history of producing the most English speakers of the resident of Medan and beyond, precisely located next to the Gurduwara in Kampung Madras. 
Two mosques serve the enclave: Jami Mosque, built in 1887, and Ghaudiyah Mosque. Both mosques were built by early South Indian Muslims in Medan. 
Tony Rice's first encounter with Southern Cal happened to be only his second start of his young career on October 24, 1987 as the sophomore quarterback caught the #18 ranked USC Trojans (8-4) by surprise, 26-15.  For Rice, this signature win was a foreshadowing of events yet to come, as his 26-yard touchdown run lifted the Irish to a 10-7 lead with 2:55 left in the first half.  He finished the contest rushing 9 times for 56 yards and completing 3-of-7 passes for 47 yards. 
Miami was No.1 and Notre Dame No.4 when they met in South Bend, Ind. on October 15. The Irish held a 31-21 lead in the third quarter, but the Hurricanes rallied to within 31-30 on a touchdown with 45 seconds left in the game. The Canes went for the two-point conversion and missed as Notre Dame's safety Pat Terrell batted down the ball. The loss snapped a 36-game, regular season winning streak for the Miami Hurricanes. 
Rice finished the contest rushing 13 times for 86 yards and completing 5 of 9 passes for 91 yards against the Trojans. 
Coming into the 1989 Fiesta Bowl, Notre Dame coach Lou Holtz insisted that his team couldn't pass the ball against West Virginia. Tony Rice simply smiled and agreed. But by the end of the game he had outplayed Mountaineer quarterback Major Harris, who went down with an injury early in the game, by completing 7 of 11 passes for 213 yards and two touchdowns. 
Rice would finish the year with 1,176 yards and 8 touchdowns passing and 700 yards and 9 touchdowns rushing. 
Tony Rice entered his senior season with high expectations following all the successes from a year ago.  Preseason ranked No. 2 Notre Dame faced a brutal schedule that included games against five ranked opponents. 
The Irish met resistance early from the state of Michigan as two Raghib "Rocket" Ismail kickoff returns for scores gave Notre Dame the upper hand in a 24-19 win over the Wolverines in Ann Arbor, Mich. on September 16, 1989.  The next week, Michigan State was feisty defensively as Notre Dame's  running backs Ricky Watters and Anthony Johnson managed to find the endzone and lift the Irish past the Spartans, 21-13. 
Notre Dame's next test came when the Irish traveled to face #17 Air Force on October 14 in what became a shootout.  Rice went 9-of-13 passing for 123 yards and rushed 14 times for 71 yards against the Falcons' defense.  He also threw a 27-yard touchdown pass to Johnson as the Irish had to overcome a strong performance from Air Force's explosive QB Dee Dowis who passed for 306 yards. 
On November 18, Notre Dame extended its record to 11-0 by knocking off #17 Penn State, 34-23, in what was a career day for Rice.  The mobile quarterback had a career-high 141 rushing yards and completed 5 of 10 passes for 47 yards as the Irish finished with 425 yards on the ground against the Nittany Lions.  At this point, Notre Dame's winning streak had run up to a total of 23 games. 
The 2nd half opened up with Rice directing a 69-yard drive in seven plays as fullback Anthony Johnson punched it in from the 2-yard line giving Notre Dame a 7-0 lead.  Raghib "Rocket" Ismail, filling in at tailback for an injured Ricky Watters, broke away for a 36-yard touchdown run to push Notre Dame's lead to 14-0 with 7:19 left in the third quarter.  The Irish won the game, 21-6. 
Rice was sharp as he completed 5 of 9 passes for 99 yards and rushed 14 times for 50 yards.  He completed a very successful 12-1 season as Notre Dame was ranked #2 by the AP College Football Poll after the win over Colorado. 
After his short stint with the Roughriders of the CFL, Rice began checking other options.  In February 1991, he was drafted in the second round by the Barcelona Dragons of the World League of American Football, which played its football season in the spring beginning in March. 
Rice's first season with Barcelona was very successful as the Dragons finished 9-3 and reached the championship game that was known as the "World Bowl '91."  Rice's Dragons fell to the London Monarchs, 21-0.  He had nearly equal playing time with the team's starter, Scott Erney, as Rice went 69-of-129 passing for 915 yards with 1 touchdown and 3 interceptions for the season.  He had 33 rushes for 210 yards and 2 touchdowns in his first year with the new football league. 
The next season was not as prosperous for Barcelona as the team finished at 5-6.  The Sacramento Surge knocked them out of the playoffs, 17-15, on May 31, 1992.  As the backup quarterback, Rice was 22-of-57 passing for 313 yards and had 102 yards rushing and a touchdown for the 1992 season. 
The World League of American Football ceased its operations following the 1992 season.  Rice joined the Munich Thunder of the Football League of Europe in Munich, Germany in 1994 and played quarterback for one season there as this was his last go around with professional football. 
Rice works at Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an insurance brokerage and risk management firm as Vice President of Employee Benefits, and works closely with Pop Warner teams making visits and giving speeches and is active in the D.A.R.E. program, fighting to keep kids off drugs. 
Born in Staunton, Virginia, he attended Wake Forest University and the University of North Carolina. 
She won the bronze medal in the women's 200 metres event at the 2015 Arab Athletics Championships held in Isa Town, Bahrain. 
She finished fourth in the 100 metres and won a bronze medal in the 400 metres at the 2017 Jeux de la Francophonie, and finished fifth in the 200 metres at the 2017 Islamic Solidarity Games. She also competed at the 2014 African Championships, the 2016 African Championships and the 2018 Mediterranean Games without reaching the final. 
In 2019, she competed in the women's 200 metres and women's 400 metres events at the 2019 African Games held in Rabat, Morocco. 
This biographical article relating to Moroccan athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to an English cricket person born in the 1840s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The hooded antpitta (Grallaricula cucullata) is a species of bird in the family Grallariidae. It is found in Colombia and Venezuela. 
Its natural habitat is subtropical or tropical moist montane forest. It is threatened by habitat loss. 
Guerry Romondt (born 10 August 1985, Port-de-Paix, Haiti) is a Haitian footballer who currently plays for Arcahaie. 
Romondt left his hometown of Port-de-paix in 1999 to go to Port-au-Prince to train with a small club named Sophisa FC. 
Romondt made his international debut for the Haiti national football team against Bolivia on 6 February 2013. 
This biographical article related to Haitian association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The station has two side platforms connected by a footbridge. The station has a "Midori no Madoguchi" staffed ticket office. Kitaca is not available.[clarification needed] 
This Is Paris is a 2020 documentary film produced by YouTube Originals, featuring socialite, model, and media personality Paris Hilton. 
The Cyclopidae are a family of copepods containing more than half of the 1,200 species in the order Cyclopoida in over 70 genera. 
Acrocercops brachyglypta is a moth of the family Gracillariidae, known from Java, Indonesia, as well as Samoa and the Solomon Islands. It was described by E. Meyrick in 1931. 
This article relating to moths in genus Acrocercops is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"Paradise" is a song written by E-Type and Mud and performed by E-Type with Nana Hedin during Melodifestivalen 2004. Participating in the second semifinal in Gothenburg, it made it to the finals inside the Stockholm Globe Arena, where it ended up 5th. 
Released as a single, it also appeared on the album Loud Pipes Save Lives. It peaked at 2nd position at the Swedish singles chart. 
It also charted at Svensktoppen, for three weeks between 11 April 2004 and 25 April 2004, peaking at 5th position before leaving the chart. 
As of the December 2020 timetable change,[update] the following services stop at Grindelwald Terminal: 
Bo Petersen (born 21 February 1958 Bolbro, Denmark) is a former motorcycle speedway rider who first rode in the UK with the Hackney Hawks. Signed by Len Silver in 1978 he stayed with the Hawks until they closed at the end of the season 1983. 
He made one further appearance on a bike at Arena Essex when he rode for a Hammers Dream Team in the Andy Galvin Benefit Meeting in March 1995. 
The lineage of Company B, 503rd AIR was redesignated on 1 September 1957 as Headquarters and Headquarters Company, 2d Airborne Battle Group, 503d Infantry (2-503rd), assigned to the 82nd Airborne Division, and activated at Fort Bragg, North Carolina (organic elements concurrently constituted and activated). 
2-503rd was relieved on 24 June 1960 from assignment to the 82nd Airborne Division and assigned to the 25th Infantry Division in Hawaii. The following year, on 1 July 1961, it was relieved from assignment to the 25th Infantry Division and assigned on 26 March 1963 to the 173rd Airborne Brigade on Okinawa. 
On 25 June 1963, 2-503rd was reorganized and redesignated as the 2nd Battalion (Airborne), 503rd Infantry. 
The 2-503d was assigned to the 101st Airborne Division at Fort Campbell, Kentucky as part of the 3d Bde along with the 1-503d and 3-187th. 
From December 1986 to September 1990, the 2-503rd was assigned to Camp Hovey, Korea, along with the 1-503rd, as a Light Infantry battalion.  Together, the two battalions comprised the 2nd Brigade of the 2nd Infantry Division.  While there the battalion participated in annual rotations for patrol, guardpost, and quick-reaction force duty at the DMZ. 
Note: The published Army lineage shows War on Terrorism "Campaigns to be determined". Comparison of the battalion's deployment dates with the War on Terrorism campaigns estimates that the battalion will be credited with participation in the six campaigns listed. 
This biographical article relating to an American football linebacker born in the 1940s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Regional Security System (RSS) is an international agreement for the defence and security of the eastern Caribbean region. 
The RSS initially started as a US instrument to combat the spread of communism in the Caribbean region. As of 2001, the RSS further cooperates with the CARICOM Regional Task Force on Crime and Security (CRTFCS). 
Subsequently, Canada also pledged collaboration with the RSS bloc to combat a threat of Central American criminal gangs from expanding into the English-speaking Caribbean region. 
The discography of Australian rock group Midnight Oil consists of twelve studio albums, forty singles, two EPs, four video albums, four live albums, and six compilation albums. As of 2021, the band have sold 20 million albums worldwide. 
Midnight Oil began under the name Farm in 1972, establishing their own record label 'Powderworks' in 1977. They released their debut self-titled album Midnight Oil in 1978 along with their first single "Run by Night". Their first three albums charted in the top 50 of the Australian Kent Music Report; in Australia, Head Injuries was certified gold and Place without a Postcard was certified platinum. 
In the next decade, Midnight Oil released three further studio albums, all of which registered on the top ten in Australia, but did not match the success of their earlier efforts. In 1997, the band released the greatest hits album 20,000 Watt R.S.L., which has since achieved four times platinum sales in Australia. In 2002, lead vocalist Peter Garrett announced his decision to leave Midnight Oil, concluding the band's 30-year career. The group reformed in 2017. 
Concomitant drugs are two or more drugs used or given at or almost at the same time (one after the other, on the same day, etc.). The term has two contextual uses: as used in medicine or as used in drug abuse. 
This designation is used when medicinal drugs are given either at the same time or almost at the same time. This is often the case in medicine. 
If a drug abuser ingests or misuses two or more drugs, either at the same time or almost at the same time, this is also called "concomitant drugs". 
Hymenaea allendis is an extinct legume species in the family Fabaceae described from a single isolated fossil flower in amber.  The species is known from a Late Oligocene to Early Miocene location in southern Mexico.  Unlike the coeval extinct species Hymenaea mexicana and Hymenaea protera which are placed closer to the living species Hymenaea verrucosa of Africa, H. allendis is closer in relation to the neotropical species of Hymenaea. 
Martlet is a lightweight air-to-surface and surface-to-surface missile developed by Thales Air Defence for the United Kingdom.  
Developed as the Lightweight Multirole Missile (LMM) to meet the UK's "Future Air-to-Surface Guided Weapon (Light)" requirement, the Ministry of Defence (MOD) placed an initial order for 1,000 missiles with deliveries due to start in 2013. However, initial operating capability has been considerably delayed and is now expected in 2021 with full operating capability anticipated in 2024. The missile was given the name "Martlet" in British service. 
Thales test-fired an LMM from a Schiebel Camcopter S-100, demonstrating a potential for use from unmanned aerial vehicles (UAVs). 
In May 2021, the Royal Navy deployed Martlet missiles for the first time as part of UK Carrier Strike Group 21. 
LMM is intended to provide a single family of weapons that can be used in different modes, including: 
The LMMs in the initial batch use laser beam riding with infrared terminal homing and a laser proximity sensor, although a semi-active laser version is under development for precision surface attack roles. 
In early 2019 HMS Sutherland tested a modified mounting for the 30mm Automated Small Calibre Gun which incorporated a launcher for five Martlet LMMs, by firing four of them at a small speedboat target at the Aberporth range in Wales. The concept of mounting the missile alongside the 30mm Bushmaster cannon was tested just 5 months after the idea's conception. 
The intended role of the Martlet is to further extend the Type 23 frigate's capabilities against small, fast moving targets beyond the current 30mm, general purpose machine gun and Minigun options to provide a long range "stand-off" ability. As of 2019 it was not clear whether the Royal Navy intends to equip any more Type 23s with the system. 
Ramnagar Legislative Assembly constituency is one of the 70 Legislative Assembly constituencies of Uttarakhand state in India. 
This article related to a location in the Indian state of Uttarakhand is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Belize Green Independent Party (BGIP) is an ecologist political party in Belize. Founded in 2012, BGIP has yet to win a seat in the Belize House or a municipal election at the city or town level. BGIP is one of the few Green parties in the world unafilliated with the Global Greens. 
BGIP formally contested an election for the first time in 2015, fielding a candidate at the 8 July 2015 Belize House by-election in Dangriga. However, the party's candidate, Llewellyn Lucas, finished a distant third with 14 votes (0.37%). 
In the 2015 general election, Llewellyn Lucas ran as a candidate for the Toledo East House seat. Lucas finished fourth with 5 votes (0.09%). 
The following is a list of the American radio and television networks and announcers that have broadcast the Major League Baseball All-Star Game over the years. 
The Atlanta hotel is a hotel located on Sukhumvit Road, Soi 2 in Bangkok, Thailand. Opened in 1952 by Dr. Max Henn, the hotel is known for its art deco interior design. 
In the 1960s the hotel frequently housed American soldiers returning from Vietnam; one such military guest was US General Westmoreland. 
The hotel's swimming pool, opened in 1954 and claimed to be the first in Bangkok, was originally a pit used to hold snakes used in the antivenom making process. 
Since the 1980s the hotel has had a strict policy against accepting sex tourists as guests, which is explicitly announced by a sign reading "sex tourists not welcome" beside its front door. 
Rotten Tomatoes, a review aggregator, reports that 38% of eight surveyed critics gave the film a positive review; the average rating is 5.6/10. 
The Nilgiri blue robin (Sholicola major), also known as Nilgiri shortwing, white-bellied shortwing, Nilgiri sholakili or rufous-bellied shortwing is a species of passerine bird in the family Muscicapidae endemic to the Shola forests of the higher hills of southern India, mainly north of the Palghat Gap. This small bird is found on the forest floor and undergrowth of dense forest patches sheltered in the valleys of montane grassland, a restricted and threatened habitat. 
The white-bellied blue robin was formerly considered conspecific with this species but in 2005 the two taxa were split by Pamela C. Rasmussen, a treatment that is followed by some authorities. Their genus remained uncertain until a 2017 molecular phylogenetic study found that these two south Indian species formed a sister group to a clade containing the genera Eumyias, Niltava and Cyornis. A new genus Sholicola was therefore erected for these two species. 
This chat-like bird is long-legged and appears chunky with its short tail and wing. Although sharing similar habits and shape, the two species differ in plumage and both may show slight sexual dimorphism. Females may differ from males in iris colour at least in S. albiventris. 
The Nilgiri blue robin (S. major) has the lores black and the upperside, the throat, breast are dark slaty blue but the lower plumage is rufous. The centre of the belly is buffy white. The brow is not as well-marked as in the other species and is diffuse bluish. 
Its natural habitat is forest patches in the valleys of high altitude grasslands known as sholas. The species has been found to occur only above 1200 m altitude in the higher hill ranges of Western Ghats. These forest patches are highly restricted in size and the species is thus threatened by habitat loss. 
Two greyish green and brown-marked eggs are laid during the breeding season that varies from April to June, after the rains. The nest is placed in a tree hole or placed on a bank and is made of moss and fibrous roots and placed low over the ground. The incubation period is about 16 to 17 days. Both parents share the nesting duties like incubation and feeding the nestlings. Old nests from the previous year may sometimes be reused. 
Anthony Morris House is a historic home located near Norristown in Worcester Township, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania.  The log house was built in 1717, and is a two-story, two bay by two bay, stone dwelling.  It measures approximately 25 feet square. 
This article about a property in Montgomery County, Pennsylvania on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
LUMI (Large Unified Modern Infrastructure) is a petascale ("pre-exascale") supercomputer currently under construction at the CSC data center in Kajaani, Finland. The completed system will consist of around 200,000 cores, capable of executing more than 375 petaflops, with a theoretical peak performance of more than 550 petaflops, which would place it among the top five most powerful computers in the world.  
The computer will use 100% hydroelectric energy, and the heat it generates will be captured and used to heat buildings in the area, making LUMI one of the most environmentally efficient supercomputers in the world. Using hydroelectricity will also guarantee reliability of the power supply, estimated to cause a single 2 minute outage on average every 38 years. 
By June 2021 pilot projects had been selected for the first run of the CPU partition, scheduled for September 2021, with full operations including the GPU partition planned for early 2022. 
Simone Del Nero Cavaliere OMRI (born 4 August 1981) is an Italian footballer who plays as a midfielder for S.S.D. Massese. 
Born in Carrara, Massa-Carrara, Del Nero grew up in the youth system of Empoli. He played just four senior games in two years for the Tuscans before moving to Brescia. Upon joining the Rondinelle, Del Nero at first played with the youth team, developing as a player under the guidance of youth coach and former professional, Luciano De Paola. 
In the summer of 2007, Del Nero was available on a free transfer as he was out-of-contract at Brescia and was quickly signed to a five-year deal by giants Lazio, who were preparing for a return to the UEFA Champions League, having just finished third in Serie A. 
Del Nero was a part of the Italy U-21 side which emerged victorious in the 2004 UEFA European Under-21 Championship and also won a bronze medal with the Italian Olympic team at the 2004 Summer Olympics. 
 The concerto has a duration of roughly 20 minutes and is cast in the traditional three-movement concerto form.  In the score program notes, Rouse wrote, "Often in my symphonies and concerti I have chosen a form other than the 'standard' one (i.e., four movements for symphonies, three for concerti). This is not due to any sense of dissatisfaction for those standard forms but rather reflects my desire to try new things."  He continued:
The work is scored for solo organ and a small orchestra comprising bass clarinet, contrabassoon, four horns, two trumpets, three trombones, tuba, timpani, three percussionists, and strings. 
It was originally opened by the German-owned Shantung Railway Company, and after the Germans were defeated in China by the Japanese during the First World War, it passed to Chinese control as the Jiaoji Railway Company. After the Japanese occupation of northern China during the Second Sino-Japanese War, the Jiaoji Railway was nationalised and made part of the North China Transportation Company. After the establishment of the People's Republic of China, the railway became part of China Railway. 
Between 1959 and 1990, the railway was dualled. Electrification of the railway began in 2003 and was completed in September 2006. 
This People's Republic of China rail-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
From Milwaukee, Wisconsin, Snyder went to University of Iowa. In 2000, Snyder worked for WSAU (AM). He then worked for United States Representative Sean Duffy as a field representative. He lived in Schofield, Wisconsin. In 2017, Snyder served in the Wisconsin State Assembly and is a Republican. 
This article about a Republican Party member of the Wisconsin State Assembly born in the 1950s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Tacho is an indigenous ethnic group of South Sudan based mainly around southern Kordofan and in the Moro Hills  and in the areas surrounding the border between Sudan and South Sudan. They are also known by the names Tocho and Toicho; about 90% of the population practice Islam  as their main religion. 
They speak Tocho, which is of the Talodi language group, with its root in the Niger-Congo languages. However they also speak Sudanese Arabic. Today their population possibly numbers less than 10,000. 
The Akhil Bharatiya Akhara Parishad is based on the system of akharas in Hindu society. An akhara literally means a wrestling ring in Hindi, but also stands for a place of debate. There are 14 such organisations based on the form of Hinduism and Hindu philosophy they adhere to. Most Akharas are Vaishnavas (devotees of Vishnu) and Shaivas (devotees of Shiva). 
While the ABAP does not participate in electoral politics, it has a position of great importance in Hindu society as a leading Hindu leadership organisation. At times, it has cooperated with the Vishva Hindu Parishad (VHP), a Hindu religious organisation more openly involved in politics and part of the Sangh Parivar of Hindu nationalist organisations. However, the ABAP has also openly criticised the VHP for raising unnecessary controversies and refused to follow an agenda set by the VHP. 
As of January 2019 there were 13 recognised akharas, with Juna Akhara being the largest. Seven of these akharas were founded by Adi Shankaracharya. There are 3 types of akharas; Nirvani Ani Akhada, Digambar Ani Akhada and Nirmal Ani Akhada. 
It has the largest number of akhadas for the Sadhu Sants and the Naga Sadhus as well. There are seven Nirvani Ani Akhadas: 
It is also known as Bairagi Akhadas. They are Vaishnavas (followers of  Lord Vishnu). It contains three akhadas, they are: 
The city grew from a small town in 1947 to a population of 275,128 inhabitants in 2011. Within Iraq, it is known as the "city of mosques" for the more than 200 mosques found in the city and the surrounding villages. 
The region has been inhabited for many millennia. There is evidence that the area surrounding Fallujah was inhabited in Babylonian times. The current name of the city is thought to come from its Syriac name, Pallgutha, which is derived from the word division or "canal regulator" since it was the location where the water of the Euphrates River divided into a canal. Classical authors cited the name as "Pallacottas". The name in Aramaic is Pumbedita. 
The region played host for several centuries to one of the most important Jewish academies, the Pumbedita Academy, which from 258 to 1038 along with Sura (ar-Hira) was one of the two most important centers of Jewish learning worldwide. 
Under the Ottoman Empire, Fallujah was a minor stop on one of the country's main roads across the desert west from Baghdad. 
In the spring of 1920, the British, who had gained control of Iraq after the collapse of the Ottoman Empire, sent Lieut.-Colonel Gerard Leachman, a renowned explorer and a senior colonial officer, to meet with local leader Shaykh Dhari, perhaps to forgive a loan given to the sheikh. Exactly what happened depends on the source, but according to the Arab version, Gerard Leachman was betrayed by the sheikh who had his two sons shoot him in the legs, then behead him by the sword. 
During the brief Anglo-Iraqi War of 1941, the Iraqi Army was defeated by the British in a battle near Fallujah. In 1947 the town had only about 10,000 inhabitants. It grew rapidly into a city after Iraqi independence with the influx of oil wealth into the country. Its position on one of the main roads out of Baghdad made it of central importance. 
Fallujah was one of the least affected areas of Iraq immediately after the 2003 invasion by the US-led Coalition. Iraqi Army units stationed in the area abandoned their positions and disappeared into the local population, leaving unsecured military equipment behind. Fallujah was also the site of a Ba'athist resort facility called "Dreamland", located a few kilometers outside the city proper. 
The damage the city had avoided during the initial invasion was negated by damage from looters, who took advantage of the collapse of Saddam Hussein's government. The looters targeted former government sites, the Dreamland compound, and the nearby military bases. Aggravating this situation was the proximity of Fallujah to the infamous Abu Ghraib prison, from which Saddam, in one of his last acts, had released all prisoners. 
On 31 March 2004, Iraqi insurgents in Fallujah ambushed a convoy containing four American private military contractors from Blackwater USA, who were conducting delivery for food caterers ESS. 
The U.S. military first denied that it has used white phosphorus as an anti-personnel weapon in Fallujah, but later retracted that denial, and admitted to using the incendiary in the city as an offensive weapon. According to George Monbiot, reports following the events of November 2004 have alleged war crimes, human rights abuses, and a massacre by U.S. personnel. This point of view is presented in the 2005 documentary film, Fallujah, The Hidden Massacre. 
In June 2007, Regimental Combat Team 6 began Operation Alljah, a security plan modeled on a successful operation in Ramadi. After segmenting districts of the city, Iraqi Police and Coalition Forces established police district headquarters in order to further localize the law enforcement capabilities of the Iraqi Police. A similar program had met with success in the city of Ramadi in late 2006 and early 2007 (See Battle of Ramadi). 
After beginning a campaign to liberate Anbar Governorate from ISIL in July 2015, in February 2016, the Iraqi army and its allies started to encircle the city in the Siege of Fallujah. On 22 May 2016, Operation Breaking Terrorism was launched to recapture Fallujah, marking the beginning of the Battle of Fallujah. 
On 22 May 2016, the Iraqi Army notified the remaining Fallujah residents of its plans to retake the city, and that such residents should either evacuate, or if not possible, to minimally raise a white flag over their roofs. 
On 30 May 2016, the military began to enter the city of Fallujah itself, but began to be stalled on 1 June, trying to attack ISIL members, but keeping the tens of thousands of civilians still trapped inside the city safe. However, by 3 June they began to make further advances on the city, killing 62 more ISIL militants. On 26 June, the Iraqi army reported that it had fully liberated the city, while fighting was ongoing in some pockets northwest of Fallujah which remained under ISIL control. 
Fallujah's western boundary is the Euphrates River. The Euphrates flows from the west (Ramadi), past Fallujah, and into the Baghdad area. When the river reaches the western edge of Fallujah, it turns north, then quickly south, forming what is commonly referred to as the 'peninsula' area. There are two bridges that cross the Euphrates at Fallujah. 
There are three major hospital locations in Fallujah. The main hospital (formerly Saddam General) is located downtown, near the west end. The second is located across the Euphrates River in an area of west Fallujah commonly referred to as the 'peninsula', (due to its shape).  The third hospital is the Jordanian Field Hospital located east of the Highway 10/Highway 1 interchange. 
Following a series of trials, Grandier was convicted. He was executed by burning on 18 August 1634, never having admitted guilt, even under torture. The demons then began leaving the nuns, but the improvement was only temporary. Jeanne des Anges, mother-superior of the convent, remained possessed by seven different demons. 
While he was entering this state, Jeanne des Anges was slowly recovering. "During my ministry, the devil passed from the body of the possessed person and entered into mine" he wrote to a friend, the Jesuit father Achille Doni d'Attichy. Surin believed that the devil particularly hated Carmelites, and that a relic of St. Teresa that he had used at Loudun had miraculously expelled one of the demons. 
In 1952 Aldous Huxley published his nonfiction book on the exorcisms, titled The Devils of Loudun. Playwright John Whiting adapted Huxley's book as the play The Devils (1960). Ken Russell directed a feature film adaptation, The Devils (1971), starring Vanessa Redgrave and Oliver Reed. Krzysztof Penderecki wrote an opera, The Devils of Loudun (Die Teufel von Loudun) in 1969. 
Surin's French prose was widely admired and his hundreds of letters, copied and recopied by the faithful, circulated throughout France. 
Rocky coppice occurs on limestone outcroppings between mangroves and pineyards. These forests are often flooded at high tide. They are dominated by spiny black olive (Bucida molinetii), but Swietenia mahagoni and Cedrela odorata also grow within them. 
Fauna that reside within Bahamian dry forests includes the Bahaman funnel-eared bat (Natalus tumidifrons), rock iguanas (Cyclura spp.), the Bahamian hutia (Geocapromys ingrahami), and the Cuban amazon (Amazona leucocephala bahamensis). 
KHEI (107.5 FM) is a radio station broadcasting a classic hits format. Licensed to Kihei, Hawaii, United States. The station is currently owned by Visionary Related Entertainment, LLC. 
KHEI signed on the air on April 30, 2009, with a Hawaiian contemporary/reggae format branded as "Island 107.5". 
On April 1, 2016, KHEI changed their format from Hawaiian contemporary/reggae to classic hits, branded as "Buzz 107.5". 
"You, You, You" is a popular song published in 1953. The music was written by Lotar Olias, the original German lyrics by Walter Rothenberg, with English lyrics written by Robert Mellin. 
It was also a minor hit for Mel Carter on Derby Records in 1966, as one of the follow-ups to his hit, "Hold Me, Thrill Me, Kiss Me". 
Dhati or something which is essential for a thing, applied in Islamic philosophy in opposition to Accidental property. Those things which are Dhati are definite description for separation of one thing from other things. Dhati in Islamic philosophy has three uses: 
This term also used as description for apprehension, creation. essential attribute is such that the described thing is along with it and is not outside of substance. 
According to Avicenna, essential phenomena are to those predicates maintain their subjects. If the essential phenomena disappeared then the essence would be demolished. These phenomena are such a way that the subject is dependent to them in its existence. Sometimes Muslim philosophers used essential phenomena as requisites of quiddities. These requisites predicates on quiddities as such, not in respect to their existence. 
Yvonne Hayes Hinson is an American politician who currently serves as the representative for Florida House of Representatives District 20 as a member of the Democratic Party. 
Although he played guitar since he was fifteen, he studied bassoon at the Fergana Music School and graduated in 1973. For eight years he was a member of the band Sato and appeared on the albums Efsane (1986) and Give Your Love for a Friend in a Circle in (1987). He went back to school and got a degree from Tashkert University, then began a solo career. 
In 1995 he won the First European International Guitar Competition in Lausanne, Switzerland. During the same year, he was named Musician of the Year by Ukrainian music critics. He has toured in Ukraine, Russia, Estonia, Moldavia, Bulgaria, Finland, Norway, Sweden, Denmark, Belgium, Italy, Germany, Turkey, and the U.S. 
It was Stewart Ginn's first appearance in a TV play. It was directed by Alan Burke who had just done Rose without a Thorn for the ABC and directed Look Back in Anger on stage for the Elizabethan Theatre Trust. Burke went on to become one of the ABC"s leading directors. 
This article related to an Australian made-for-TV movie is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Exonomasis is a genus of moths belonging to the family Tineidae. It contains only one species, Exonomasis exolescens, which is found in South Africa. 
Watamu Marine National Park and Reserve was established in 1968 with Malindi Marine National Park and Reserve. They were established by the Kenyan government. Watamu Marine Park is now part of a UN recognised World Biosphere Reserve. 
The park's coral reefs form the physical and biological backbone of the area. With over 150 species of hard and soft corals, such as brain corals, fan corals and sponges, it provides for abundant nutrients for fish. The main park has over 500 species of fish and the reserve over 1000. There are also whale sharks, manta rays, octopus and barracuda as some of the larger species in the park.[citation needed] 
So Stevens does not die in the hotel lobby, and he and Sylvia live to celebrate their 50th wedding anniversary. 
Clair initially wanted Cary Grant for the lead role, but wound up with Dick Powell, who was on the verge of altering his screen persona from a lightweight musical-comedy "juvenile" to a harder one, playing tough guy private detective Philip Marlowe in Murder My Sweet later that year, followed by a series of film noirs. 
Although It Happened Tomorrow was far from Clair's favorite, he was later to write that "[t]he last twenty minutes are the best thing I did in Hollywood." The ending, especially, which hinges on a mistake in the newspaper from the future, had a personal connection for Clair, since he was fired from his first job as a reporter when he made up a story which was the opposite of what actually happened; Nichols was a former newsman as well. 
It Happened Tomorrow was a success at the box office.  Film historian Jeff Stafford noted that the critical response in the United States was "complimentary but reserved". In France, however, the film was a "major critical success". 
It Happened Tomorrow was adapted as a radio play for the July 3, 1944 episode of Lux Radio Theater with Don Ameche and Anne Baxter, the September 25, 1944 episode of The Screen Guild Theater with Dick Powell and Linda Darnell reprising their original roles and on the October 9, 1946 episode of Academy Award Theater, starring Eddie Bracken and Ann Blyth. 
Sangamon County is located in the center of the U.S. state of Illinois. According to the 2010 census, it had a population of 197,465. Its county seat and largest city is Springfield, the state capital. 
The median income for a household in the county was $52,232 and the median income for a family was $66,917. Males had a median income of $48,324 versus $36,691 for females. The per capita income for the county was $28,394. About 9.9% of families and 13.4% of the population were below the poverty line, including 19.7% of those under age 18 and 7.3% of those age 65 or over. 
Sangamon County is governed by a 29-member board. Each member of the board is elected from a separate district. 
Like much of Central Illinois, Sangamon County tilts Republican. It is rather conservative for a county with an urban state capital, but is not nearly as conservative as the surrounding counties. Only six Democrats have carried it since 1896. It is slowly moving towards the Democratic camp, having shifted 8.7 points to the left since 2000 (as of 2020). 
The Thirring model is an exactly solvable quantum field theory which  describes the self-interactions of a Dirac field in (1+1) dimensions. 
The correlation functions of the Thirring model (massive or massless) verify the Osterwalder-Schrader axioms, and hence the theory makes sense as a quantum field theory. 
The massless Thirring model is exactly solvable in the sense that a formula for the     n   {\displaystyle n}  -points field correlation is known. 
After it was introduced by Walter Thirring, many authors tried to solve the massless case, with confusing outcomes. The correct formula for the two and four point correlation was finally found by K. Johnson; then C. R. Hagen  and B. Klaiber  extended the explicit solution to any multipoint correlation function of the fields. 
The mass spectrum of the model and the scattering matrix was explicitly evaluated by Bethe Ansatz. An explicit formula for the correlations is not known. J. I. Cirac, P. Maraner and J. K. Pachos applied the massive Thirring model to the description of optical lattices. 
The exact solution shows once again the equivalence of the Thirring model and the quantum sine-Gordon model. The Thirring model is S-dual to the sine-Gordon model. The fundamental fermions of the Thirring model correspond to the solitons of the sine-Gordon model. 
S. Coleman  discovered an equivalence between the Thirring and the sine-Gordon models. Despite the fact that the latter is a pure boson model, massless Thirring fermions are equivalent to free bosons; besides massive fermions are equivalent to the sine-Gordon bosons. This phenomenon is more general in two dimensions and is called bosonization. 
In October 2006, a new company has been established in the southern port city of Bandar Abbas to repair various types of ocean liners. According to ISNA, the Bandar Abbas Pars Ship Repairing Company has been formed jointly by IRISL and ISOICO. The plant has the capacity to carry out maintenance works on large vessels with 500,000-ton capacity. 
"Iran-Shahr-e Kord" is identical to "Iran-Arak" and both ships are produced by ISOICO for Iran Shipping Lines. On Sept 11, 2011 Iran launched a third ship named "Iran-Kashan". 
ISOICO shipyard is capable of constructing any type of vessel up to about 4 x 80,000 DWT per year on its existing building berths mainly bulk carrier, containership and oil product carrier using advance technology, afterwards the constructing capability will increase for the vessel up to about 2 x 300,000 DWT VLCC or 2 x 140,000 m3 LNG carrier per year in addition to the existing capacity. 
Over the next two decades, Iran would need 500 new ships, including 120 oil tankers, 40 liquefied natural gas (LNG) carriers and over 300 commercial vessels. In 2009, in a move aimed at further enhancing Iran's shipbuilding industry, President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad said he will ban the purchase of foreign ships by Iranian organizations.[citation needed] The Ministry of Commerce has confirmed that Iran is able to build all its needed sea fleets inside the country. 
Whitecourt was a provincial electoral district in Alberta, Canada mandated to return a single member to the Legislative Assembly of Alberta using first-past-the-post balloting from 1971 to 1993. 
The district replaced Lac Ste. Anne for the 1971 election, with only minor boundary changes from the previous district. Its boundaries again remained mostly unchanged when replaced by Whitecourt-Ste. Anne in 1993, although the area around Fox Creek was transferred to Grande Prairie-Smoky. 
The district's only MLA was Progressive Conservative Peter Trynchy. He entered the Legislature upon winning the seat in the 1971 election and served eight terms all together, six as MLA for Whitecourt and two in Whitecourt-Ste. Anne, finally retiring in 2001. 
The 1982 election saw the rise of the separatist Western Canada Concept, which failed to win any seats. Their result in Whitecourt was the fourth-best in the province, despite Social Credit candidate George Richardson's status as party leader. Trynchy still won an outright majority of votes, benefitting from a surge in turnout.  
Ebonshire - Volume 3 is the 23rd album released by Nox Arcana. It is the third in a series of winter holiday EPs inspired by Nox Arcana's holiday music trilogy: Winter's Knight (2005), Winter's Eve (2009), and Winter's Majesty (2012), which are each set in a fantasy realm called Ebonshire. 
Sarvan is a Spanish comics series featuring an eponymous character, written by Antonio Segura and drawn by Jordi Bernet. The series was launched in the comics magazine Cimoc in 1982, had a relatively short serial run before the artist and writer moved on to their next collaboration, Kraken. 
Sarvan is a woman living in a fantasy-science fiction environment, on a barbarous planet where a blonde astronaut, Heloin, arrives. The volatile Sarvan claims him for herself, and this generates an almost endless series of struggles. In many of these clashes Sarvan dresses in a revealing bikini that frequently slides down. 
Macrochelys is a genus of very large freshwater turtles in the family Chelydridae from Southeastern United States. Only a single extant species was recognized until a 2014 study divided it into two, or possibly three species. 
Traditionally, only a single extant species was recognized, but following reviews, two species are now recognized: Anatomical differences between the two species of Macrochelys include the shape of the caudal notch at the rear of the carapace and the angle of the squamosal bone at the rear of the skull. The two species are estimated to have diverged less than 3.5 million years ago.  
A third species has been proposed, but its validity is disputed. Neither the Reptile Database nor IUCN's Tortoise and Freshwater Turtle Specialist Group recognize it as separate from M. temminckii. 
Unlike the family Chelydridae as a whole, the genus Macrochelys is exclusively North American. Hutchison (2008) considered the genus Chelydrops to be a junior synonym of Macrochelys, and recombined its type species, Chelydrops stricta from the Miocene (Early Barstovian) of Nebraska, as the (then) fourth species of Macrochelys. 
Vivian Cherry was born in Manhattan on July 27, 1920, and grew up in the Bronx, New York. Her parents, Sasha and Ida (Agranovitch) Cherry, were Russian Jewish immigrants. Her father anglicized his name to Sam after arriving in the United States, and found work as a house painter. Her mother was a homemaker. 
Cherry's earliest ambition was to become a dancer. She studied dance at the Denishawn School in the Bronx before attending Walton High School.  
After a short stint at the University of Wisconsin, Madison, Cherry began dancing professionally. She performed with the Helen Tamiris Dance Company; in nightclubs like La Conga and Le Bal Tabarin; in the Lunch Hour Follies, a wartime entertainment put on by the American Theater Wing; and the Broadway musical Sadie Thompson. 
Cherry also traveled outside of New York City for her photo essays, including a pair that focused on issues of healthcare among the Navajo and Pueblo nations and among West Virginia coal miners. Her photography was inspired by the documentary work of Dorothea Lange, Helen Levitt, and Paul Strand. 
Vivian Cherry took a long hiatus from photography beginning in the early 1960s. For about 25 years, she focused on jewelry-making as an artistic pursuit, while working as an X-ray technician alongside her husband Dr. Louis Finger. When she returned to photography in the late 1980s, she began working for the first time in color, including on a series of photographs of people with tattoos. By the early 2000s she had returned to her signature black-and-white film. 
Vivian Cherry was married four times; three of the marriages ended in divorce. She had one son, Steven Schmidt. 
Saint Luis Rey is the name of a premium cigar brand in Cuba created in 1940 and still produced there for Habanos S.A., the Cuban state-owned tobacco company. 
The brand is today produced at the Briones Montoto factory in Havana, where Romeo y Julieta cigars are produced. 
In the US, the Saint Luis Rey trademark was registered by Altadis.  In 2008, Altadis was acquired by the British tobacco giant Imperial Tobacco (now Imperial Brands).  Imperial now markets the Altadis USA line of non-Cuban cigars with the Saint Luis Rey brand name incorporating a blend of Honduran and Nicaraguan or Peruvian long filler tobaccos and a Nicaraguan binder and wrapper. 
The range of sizes produced by Habanos S.A. today comprises several vitolas including the Molinos or 'mill', which is a Cervantes size.  
The fundamental role of the dystrobrevin protein family remains unclear. Much of what we do know has been observation from biochemical studies of associated proteins and the phenotypic consequences of their loss. 
Being Myself is a 1998 studio album by Lena Horne, and was the final original studio album released during her lifetime. It came out shortly before she turned 81. 
Horne initially began work on the album in 1995; however, the project was left unfinished and Horne entered the studio in 1997 to record the songs presented in this album. Horne recorded three tracks for the original version of this album: "Black Is," "Chelsea Bridge" and "Willow Weep for Me." These tracks were later issued on the Blue Note compilation album Seasons of a Life. 
In 2013, the college finished construction on a multimillion expansion program which included new state-of-the-art classrooms, study spaces, and new labs. Lewis N. Reich, OD, PhD, was named as SCO's seventh President in January 2016 and formally installed in the office in May 2016. 
Similar to a teaching hospital, The Eye Center is a primary health care facility providing services for patients, mostly from Memphis/Shelby County, West Tennessee, Arkansas & Mississippi. The Eye Center is under the direction of Dr. James E. Venable, vice president for clinical programs, and Dr. Christopher Lievens, chief of staff. 
As a teaching facility, The Eye Center is divided into service areas. These service areas cover a wide range of vision needs for our patients, including: 
The Hayes Center is under the direction of Lisa Wade, OD, who was named Director of the Hayes Center for Practice Excellence in 2015 
SCO students represent a large cross-section of U.S. demographics and regions, and alumni live and practice in all 50 states and abroad. Notable individuals include: 
SCO is the alma mater to 14 American Optometric Association Presidents. The winners of the Varilux Optometry Student Bowl in 2003, 2004, and 2005 were all students from SCO. 
Little Darby Island Airport (ICAO: MYXF) is a private use airport located near Little Darby Island, the Bahamas. 
This article about a Bahamian building or structure related topic is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Born in Delavan, Illinois, Creighton graduated from Wellesley College in 1929, and went on to complete her Ph.D. at Cornell University in 1933. 
During her time at Cornell she worked in the field of maize cytogenetics with Barbara McClintock, the pair published a very influential paper in 1931 in which they described chromosomal crossover for the first time. This paper, part of her Ph.D. research, provided key evidence that chromosomes carried and exchanged genetic information and hence that genes for physical traits are carried on chromosomes. Barbara McClintock guided her Ph.D. research. 
After completing her Ph.D. she taught at Cornell University and Connecticut College, and then returned to Wellesley College where she taught until her retirement in 1974; taking time from her career to serve in the U.S. Navy during World War II. 
This article about a specific military ship or boat of France is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Okubovirus is a genus of viruses in the order Caudovirales, in the family Herelleviridae, in the subfamily Spounavirinae. Bacteria serve as natural hosts. There are two species in this genus. 
Viral replication is cytoplasmic. Entry into the host cell is achieved by adsorption into the host cell. DNA-templated transcription is the method of transcription. Bacteria serve as the natural host. Transmission routes are passive diffusion. 
Alonso was born in 1989 in Valladolid.  She has almost no vision in her right eye, and only around 10% in her left. 
In 2005, when Alonso was 16 years old, she was a member of Club El Refugio de Huerta del Rey. At the time, she was starting to specialize in the 200 meter freestyle event. That year, she competed in the Spanish national championships, finishing high enough to qualify for a competition in Colorado Springs. At the 2007 IBSA World Games, she won a gold medal. She competed at the 2008 Summer Paralympics, finishing eighth in the 200 meter freestyle. 
Until 1988 the village belonged to the municipality of Pristina, when it was included in the newly-formed Kosovo Polje municipality.[citation needed] 
Marc van Orsouw (born 12 April 1964) is a former Dutch racing cyclist. He rode in eight Grand Tours between 1986 and 1994. 
This biographical article related to a Dutch cycling person born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
She was born in Indiana and attended the University of Indianapolis, where she received an associate degree in computer science and a B.A. in English. She worked as a legal secretary. 
Exile is a direct sequel to Guardian's Key, following the life of the original protagonist's daughter. 
This article about a novelist of the United States born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Gilbert H. Hamilton House is a historic building in the Glen Echo neighborhood of Columbus, Ohio. It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1992 and the Columbus Register of Historic Properties in 2018. The house, completed in 1927, overlooks the Glen Echo Ravine. It was built for Gilbert H. and Caroline J. Hamilton; the family lived there until 1952. 
This article about a property in Franklin County, Ohio on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article related to a building or structure in Columbus, Ohio is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In October 1908, Thomas Henry Barton used a Durham Churchill charabanc to start the company's first service, between Long Eaton and the Nottingham Goose Fair. (Many years later, in 1953, Barton built a replica of its original Durham Churchill vehicle, using a Daimler chassis dating from 1911.) 
Barton had already had experience of operating a motorised bus, in Mablethorpe, some nine years earlier. 
During World War I, the fleet was used to transport workers to and from the National Shell Filling Factory, Chilwell. Also during the War, Barton pioneered the use of town gas as fuel, converting the whole fleet to run on it. The gas was stored in a large "bag" on the roof of the bus, and the company also manufactured these bags for sale to other operators. 
The 1920s saw fierce competition in the British bus industry. Barton imported Lancia chassis from Italy, which were lengthened and fitted with a patented tag-axle by Barton. The vehicles were known as "Bartons Gliders" and their speed and smooth riding provided a competitive advantage. 
Many new and secondhand buses also joined the fleet, and Barton kept up its modern double-deck image with Northern Counties bodied AEC Regents, which had wrap-around windscreens on both decks. Also built to the same style was a unique vehicle, no. 861, which had lowbridge bodywork on a lowheight Dennis Loline chassis, and was the lowest ever roofed British double-decker. It was specially designed to pass under an ultra low railway bridge at Sawley Junction, now Long Eaton, station. 
During the 1950s, Barton had over 280 vehicles and 1,000 employees. Numerous smaller companies were purchased, especially in the 1960s, including Hall Brothers of South Shields on Tyneside (1967), and Robin Hood Coaches of Nottingham (1963), whose emblem was retained and applied to the whole fleet. 
In 1983, Barton bought five Leyland Tigers and five DAF MB200s with Plaxton Paramount bodywork, these being the company's first modern 12m coaches, although not its first 12m vehicles, since Barton had experimented with lengthening a Daimler bus to 40' before World War I. From 1984 until the sale of the fleet in 1989, Barton standardised on the DAF MB with Plaxton Paramount bodywork, a further 26 being purchased. 
In 1989, the business was sold to the Wellglade Group and merged with its Trent Buses business to form Trent Barton. 
On 1 October 2008, the journey of the first Barton bus, from Long Eaton to Nottingham's Market Square, was recreated to mark the centenary of the company. Buses and coaches from each decade of service travelled along the route, becoming more modern in turn. 
From 1929 until 1991, Barton had a 50% shareholding in South Notts Bus Company, based in nearby Gotham. 
The Barton company still exists today, having dropped "transport" from its title, it is known as Barton Holdings, mainly involved in property ownership. The Chilwell depot site was the subject of an unsuccessful planning application in 2007, which would have seen the sprawling site redeveloped into housing and retail. 
Barton's fleet livery was red, cream and maroon. The fleetname (rendered as BARTON) was placed within a flag motif on the vehicle sides, and, from the 1960s onwards, a detailed picture of Robin Hood was placed alongside following the acquisition by Barton of Robin Hood (Coaches) Limited of Nottingham in late 1961. 
Barton operated from many depots and outstations over the years. The largest depot was at the company's headquarters in Chilwell. Others included: 
Barton's former depot on Huntingdon Street in Nottingham was Grade II listed in August 2019. The building was opened in 1939, and was constructed in the Moderne architecture style typical of the period. At the time of listing the building was still owned by the Barton family company, who had submitted planning approval for it to be "dismantled with care" and eventually re-erected at their corporate headquarters in Chilwell, to allow redevelopment of the city centre site. 
Edward Mulcahy was born in Malden, Massachusetts on June 15, 1921. His parents were John and Mary Alice (Duffy) Mulcahy. He was the eldest of seven children. He graduated from Malden Catholic High School in 1939. Mulcahy graduated from Tufts University with a degree in history in 1943. 
He was survived by three brothers, two sisters, five children, and nine grandchildren. His last surviving sibling, his youngest sister, Elizabeth (Betty) Mulcahy McKeon, was buried on June 24, 2020, in Nashua, NH.. 
Leonora Colmor Jepsen (born 3 October 1998), also known simply as Leonora, is a Danish singer and former competitive figure skater. As a figure skater, she was a two-time national junior champion in singles in 2015, 2016 and represented her country at the 2016 World Junior Championships. As a singer, she won the 2019 Dansk Melodi Grand Prix and represented Denmark at that year's Eurovision Song Contest in Tel Aviv, finishing 12th with 120 points. 
As a figure skater, she competed in the ISU World Junior Championships in 2016 and in the ISU JGP Riga Cup 2015. In December 2016, Leonora and her brother Linus were gold medallists at the Danish figure-skating championships. She had previously been Denmark's junior champion skating solo. She now no longer competes but works as a figure-skating trainer and choreographer. 
She represented her country in the Eurovision Song Contest 2019 in Tel Aviv with the song "Love Is Forever". She won Danish Melodi Grand Prix 2019 after gaining 42% of the public and jury vote in the superfinal, beating favorites Julie & Nina, and Sigmund. Her song "Love Is Forever", written by Lise Cabble, Melanie Wehbe and Emil Lei, combines four different languages: English, Danish, German and French. 
Lower Nimpkish Provincial Park is a provincial park in British Columbia, Canada, located on the lower Nimpkish River. It is an undeveloped wilderness park that seeks to preserve the habitat while offering fishing and nature appreciation opportunities to the public.  
This British Columbia protected areas related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Japanese Air Force One and Japanese Air Force Two are the radio callsigns of the two Boeing 777-300ER aircraft used by the government of Japan for overseas travel by the Emperor, Prime Minister and other high-ranking officials. Each aircraft has a capacity of 140 passengers and can be used for emergency evacuations of Japanese citizens and overseas deployment of Japan Self-Defense Forces personnel. The aircraft are operated by the Japan Air Self-Defense Force. 
During the early postwar era, the Japanese government generally used the state-chartered international airline, Japan Airlines (JAL), for official trips overseas. 
The Japanese government began investigating the possibility of purchasing dedicated government transport aircraft during the 1970s. Much of the impetus came from problems in using JAL: labor unions were unwilling to put aircrews at risk in missions to evacuate Japanese citizens from overseas, and often objected to transporting members of the Japan Self-Defense Forces overseas for political reasons. The privatization of JAL in the mid-1980s hastened the process. 
The Cabinet of Japan decided to purchase two Boeing 747-400 aircraft in 1987 in order to have aircraft with worldwide operating range. Another goal of the 36 billion yen purchase was to counterbalance the growing trade deficit between Japan and the US. 
Both aircraft were delivered in the fall of 1991 (though one source has the second delivery as being in April 1992). Kiichi Miyazawa was the first prime minister to use the 747 when he visited the US in 1993; the Emperor used the aircraft for the first time later that year. 
The aircraft were used to transport relief workers to the area of the 2010 Canterbury earthquake in New Zealand. Foreign Minister Seiji Maehara offered use of the aircraft to evacuate Japanese nationals on the return flight, but was forced to withdraw this offer when the foreign ministry pointed out that there was not enough space for all of them on board. 
The Democratic Party of Japan government requested public comments about the Japanese government budget in 2011, and many responses criticized the aircraft as wasteful, suggesting that the government should switch back to charters of private aircraft as required; however, following a hostage crisis in Algeria in 2013, the Shinzo Abe government determined that the aircraft should be maintained for national security purposes. 
The aircraft are painted with red and gold stripes along the fuselage and Hinomaru insignia on the tail and wings. 
For shorter VIP flights, the government also uses Eurocopter EC225 helicopters (GSDF 1st Helicopter Brigade) and Gulfstream IV business jets (ASDF, known as U-4 in Japanese defense parlance). The Gulfstream IV was only used as a prime ministerial aircraft once, by Yasuo Fukuda to travel from Beijing to Nagasaki at short notice when the 747 was unavailable. 
Unlike the American Air Force One, the Japanese government aircraft may only be used for government business for overseas, and cannot normally be used for personal travel by the Imperial family or the Prime Minister. 
During emergency evacuations of Japanese citizens from particularly dangerous areas overseas, personnel from the Guide Unit of the 1st Airborne Brigade, along with officials from the MOFA will travel on the aircraft, in order to assist with the retrieval and transport of evacuees to evacuation points. 
While the Boeing 787 was reportedly a leading candidate to replace the 747s at one point due to its fuel efficiency and its large proportion of Japanese components, and the Airbus A350 was also raised as a candidate by some officials, the Ministry of Defense favored the 777 due to its capabilities being closer to those of the 747. 
The aircraft were replaced by Boeing 777-300ER aircraft in the fiscal year 2019, with maintenance outsourced to All Nippon Airways. The first 777-300ER arrived at Chitose Air Base to commence testing and training on August 17, 2018, while the second arrived on December 11, 2018. 
The Boeing 747-400 were taken out of service, stored at Sapporo for a period of time, then ferried to Marana for short term storage under new registrations N7474C and N7477C. It is currently being planned to convert the two aircraft to carry cargo.[citation needed] 
Robert Michael Waszgis (born August 24, 1970 in Omaha, Nebraska) is a former Major League Baseball player. Waszgis played for the Texas Rangers in 2000. He batted and threw right-handed. 
This biographical article relating to a United States baseball catcher born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This is a list of Kazakh European Film Award winners and nominees. This list details the performances of Kazakh actors, actresses, and films that have either been submitted or nominated for, or have won, a European Film Award. 
Cauda equina syndrome (CES) is a condition that occurs when the bundle of nerves below the end of the spinal cord known as the cauda equina is damaged. Signs and symptoms include low back pain, pain that radiates down the leg, numbness around the anus, and loss of bowel or bladder control. Onset may be rapid or gradual. 
The cause is usually a disc herniation in the lower region of the back. Other causes include spinal stenosis, cancer, trauma, epidural abscess, and epidural hematoma. The diagnosis is suspected based on symptoms and confirmed by medical imaging such as MRI or CT scan. 
CES is generally treated surgically via laminectomy. Sudden onset is regarded as a medical emergency requiring prompt surgical decompression, with delay causing permanent loss of function. Permanent bladder problems, sexual dysfunction or numbness may occur despite surgery. A poor outcome occurs in about 20% of people despite treatment. About 1 in 70,000 people is affected every year. It was first described in 1934. 
Severe back pain, saddle anesthesia, incontinence and sexual dysfunction are considered "red flags", i.e. features which require urgent investigation. 
Direct trauma can also cause cauda equina syndrome. Most common causes include as a complication of lumbar punctures, burst fractures resulting in posterior migration of fragments of the vertebral body, severe disc herniations, spinal anaesthesia involving trauma from catheters and high local anaesthetic concentrations around the cauda equina, penetrating trauma such as knife wounds or ballistic trauma. 
CES can be caused by lumbar spinal stenosis, which is when the diameter of the spinal canal narrows. This could be the result of a degenerative process of the spine (such as osteoarthritis) or a developmental defect which is present at birth. In the most severe cases of spondylolisthesis cauda equina syndrome can result. 
Chronic spinal inflammatory conditions such as Paget disease, neurosarcoidosis, chronic inflammatory demyelinating polyneuropathy, ankylosing spondylitis, rheumatoid disease of the spine, and chronic tuberculosis can cause it. This is due to the spinal canal narrowing that these kinds of syndromes can produce. 
Individuals most at risk for disc herniation are the most likely to develop CES. Race has little influence with the notable exception that African Americans appear slightly less likely to develop CES than other groups. Middle age also appears to be a notable risk factor, as those populations are more likely to develop a herniated disc; heavy lifting can also be inferred as a risk factor for CES. 
Diagnosis is usually confirmed by an MRI scan or CT scan, depending on availability. Bladder scanning and loss of catheter sensation can also be used to diagnose an onset of cauda equina syndrome and can aid diagnosis before MRI scanning.[citation needed] Early surgery in acute onset of severe cases has been reported to be important. 
Early diagnosis can allow for preventive treatment. Signs that allow early diagnosis include changes in bowel and bladder function and loss of feeling in groin. Changes in sensation can start as pins and needles leading to numbness. Changes in bladder function may be changes to stream or inability to empty bladder fully. If a person progresses to full retention intervention is less likely to be successful.[citation needed] 
The management of true cauda equina syndrome frequently involves surgical decompression. When cauda equina syndrome is caused by a herniated disk early surgical decompression is recommended. 
Cauda equina syndrome of sudden onset is regarded as a medical/surgical emergency. Surgical decompression by means of laminectomy or other approaches may be undertaken within 6, 24 or 48 hours of symptoms developing if a compressive lesion, e.g., ruptured disc, epidural abscess, tumor or hematoma is demonstrated. Early treatment may significantly improve the chance that long-term neurological damage will be avoided. 
Cauda equina syndrome can occur during pregnancy due to lumbar disc herniation; age of mother increases the risk. Surgery can still be performed and the pregnancy does not adversely affect treatment. Treatment for those with cauda equina can and should be carried out at any time during pregnancy. 
Lifestyle issues may need to be addressed post-treatment. Issues could include the person's need for physiotherapy and occupational therapy due to lower limb dysfunction. Obesity might also need to be tackled. 
The prognosis for complete recovery is dependent upon many factors. The most important of these is the severity and duration of compression upon the damaged nerve(s). Generally, the longer the time before intervention to remove the compression causing nerve damage, the greater the damage caused to the nerve(s).[citation needed] 
Damage can be so severe that nerve regrowth is impossible, and the nerve damage will be permanent. In cases where the nerve has been damaged but is still capable of regrowth, recovery time is widely variable. Surgical intervention with decompression of the cauda equina can assist recovery. Delayed or severe nerve damage can mean up to several years' recovery time because nerve growth is exceptionally slow.[citation needed] 
Various etiologies of CES include fractures, abscesses, hematomas, and any compression of the relevant nerve roots. Injuries to the thoracolumbar spine will not necessarily result in a clinical diagnosis of CES, but in all such cases it is necessary to consider. Few epidemiological studies of CES have been done in the United States, owing to difficulties such as amassing sufficient cases as well as defining the affected population, therefore this is an area deserving of additional scrutiny. 
Traumatic spinal cord injuries occur in approximately 40 people per million annually in the United States, resulting from traumas due to motor vehicle accidents, sporting injuries, falls, and other factors. An estimated 10 to 25% of vertebral fractures will result in injury to the spinal cord. Thorough physical examinations are required, as 5 to 15% of trauma patients have fractures that initially go undiagnosed. 
Degenerative lumbosacral stenosis (DLSS), also known as cauda equina syndrome, is a pathologic degeneration in the lumbosacral disk in dogs; affecting the articulation, nerve progression, tissue and joint connections of the disk. This degeneration causes compressions in soft tissues and nerve root locations in the ultimate caudal area of the medulla, causing neuropathic pain in the lumbar vertebrae. 
Universities Australia (formerly the Australian Vice-Chancellors' Committee) is an organisation founded in Sydney in May 1920, which attempts to advance higher education through voluntary, cooperative and coordinated action. After being based for a time in both Sydney and Melbourne, its offices relocated to Canberra in 1966. It is a private company whose members are Australia's 39 universities. The universities are represented by their vice-chancellors. 
The current chair of Universities Australia is Professor Debbie Terry. Its CEO is Ms Catriona Jackson. 
Universities Australia is non-partisan and exists exclusively for educational purposes. Its continuing aim is to serve the best interests of the universities, and through them, the nation. According to its website, its aims are to 
Universities Australia represents (and is funded by contributions from) 38 of Australia's 39 universities. 
Higher Ed Services (HES) is a not-for-profit, professional services company owned by Universities Australia. It specialises in the provision of management services for collaborative development projects for the universities in Australia. 
The business consultants of HES collaborate with collaborative groups in developing common strategies to address the business challenges facing the sector. It designs innovative business and contractual models to realise the outcomes required, capitalising on the opportunities initiated by collaborating universities. 
While an activity of the AVCC, AARNet built the Internet in Australia. AARNet was established under the AVCC in 1989. The AVCC sold AARNet1 as a going concern to Telstra, then Telecom Australia, in 1995.  AARNet Pty Ltd was established as a separate company from AVCC in 1998. 
Tavai is a village in Wallis and Futuna. It is located in Sigave District on the northwestern coast of Futuna Island. Its population according to the 2018 census was 160 people. 
Caecilia subterminalis is a species of ceacilian in the family Caeciliidae. It is endemic to Ecuador. 
The Cypress Grove Plantation was a Southern plantation owned by President Zachary Taylor near Rodney, Mississippi. Later, it was also known as Buena Vista Plantation. 
The plantation bordered Ashland Plantation and the Mississippi River. It was near the Ashland community, and Ashland's port was sometimes used by Cypress Grove Plantation.  The plantation was also located on the Mississippi River ten miles below Rodney, a small town on the Mississippi River in Jefferson County, Mississippi. It was north of Natchez. 
Taylor's parents, Colonel Richard and Sara Strother Taylor, raised him on their plantation, so he had experience running a plantation. Cotton, tobacco, corn and wheat were grown, and hogs, sheep, cattle and poultry were raised on his plantation. He grew potatoes and peas in his garden. His home on the plantation was made of timber and included a large library. He also had a sawmill on this plantation. 
Mississippi River travelers could cut ten miles from their trip by going through Gillam's Shute which flowed between Buena Vista Island and Taylor's plantation.  Thus, the plantation was well known to river travelers. Taylor died on July 9, 1850. Taylor's widow, Margaret, and the other heirs sold the plantation land in 1850 to Charles B. New for $20,000. Most of the land has since eroded away into the Mississippi River. 
Westermark enjoyed success on the Challenge Tour in the early 1990s where he won the 1993 Campeonato de Castilla and the 1994 Centenario Copa Palmer. He also finished runner-up in the 1991 Neuchatel Open, 1993 Kenya Open, 1994 Neuchatel Open, 1994 Tessali Open, 1994 El Corte Ingles Open, 1996 Is Molas Challenge and the 1998 Volvo Finnish Open. 
Westermark later become the club professional at El Paraiso Golf Club in Estepona, Spain.  He claimed the 16th and final card at qualifying school in Portugal to earn conditional playing rights for the 2015 European Senior Tour season. 
The two sides agreed to resume Permanent Status negotiations to reach a Permanent Status Agreement. They reaffirmed that negotiations on the Permanent Status would lead to the implementation of Security Council Resolutions 242 and 338. Both sides agreed to make a determined effort to conclude a framework agreement and established a timetable to achieve this goal. 
The memorandum states that neither side would initiate or take any step that would change the status of the West Bank and the Gaza Strip in accordance with the Interim Agreement. This clause recognized the necessity to create an appropriate environment for negotiations, 
Palestine and Israel also called upon the international donor community to enhance its financial support for the Palestinian economic development and the Israeli-Palestinian peace process. 
The Fat Tulip stories were told and co-written by Tony Robinson and included characters such as Thin Tim, Fred the Baddy, Gilbert Harding Sheep, Bunting Tadpole, Anwar and Amita Rabbit, Tracey Bee, a cockle called Jim Morrison, and the Terrible Stinkers - Peter, Paul and Mary. Spin-off books were also published in 1985: Meet a Dog Called Dorian and Never Eat a Tortoise in picture book format, and Tales from Fat Tulip's Garden as a paperback. 
This biographical article related to British television is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Budapest indie music scene was the indie music scene of Budapest, Hungary in the 2000s. It was often associated with bands like Amber Smith, The Moog, EZ Basic and We Are Rockstars. 
On 10 March 2006, Amber Smith's third studio album, RePRINT, was released by the German Kalinkaland Records. The album included the song Hello Sun which brought the band international recognition. 
On 10 April 2007, The Moog's first full-length studio album Sold for Tomorrow was released by the American label MuSick. The song I Like You brought international success for the band. 
On 18 February 2008, Amber Smith's fourth studio album was released entitled Introspective. The album included songs like Introspective, Select All/Delete All, and Coded. 
On 10 April 2012 The Moog released their third studio album entitled Seasons in the Underground produced by Ken Scott followed by US tour with bands like B-52s and David Lane. The Moog concentrated on their US carrier with moderate success.  
On 21 April 2012 Amber Smith released their fifth studio album entitled Amber Smith. Although Poniklo claimed that this record is one of the best ones among the previous releases, the band did not achieve those sorts of successes as with the previous records. 
You can move left or right, or jump between levels of the current step by pressing up or down. Button 1 performs kicks, while button 2 performs a shorter kind of jump (for more direct attacks and for clearing certain gaps) Further, pressing the kick button during either kind of jump will deliver a flying kick, which awards more points for an enemy defeated by it. You can also gain more points by knocking out multiple enemies with a single kick. 
In Japan, Game Machine listed Shao-lin's Road on their June 15, 1985 issue as being the twenty-second most-successful table arcade unit of the month. In Europe, Shao-lin's Road was marketed as a follow-up to Yie Ar Kung-Fu and became a commercial success in arcades. The Legend of Kage, released by Taito later the same year, was influenced by Shao-lin's Road. 
The current world record is held by Estel Goffinet scoring 50,000,000 points on June 28th of 2014 in just under 32 hours of play. Score is listed in the Twin Galaxies database.  
Adrian Rodriguez holds the official world record of 13,007,800 in the MAME platform on Twin Galaxies on 2018. 
Landkreis Kreuzburg O.S. was a Prussian district in Silesia, from 1742 to 1945, with its capital at Kreuzburg O.S. Today, the region is part of the Polish Opole Voivodeship. 
Traditional Icelandic folk music remained widely performed into the last decades of the 19th century, when folk collecting began in the country.  However, the advent of Western classical music and other foreign influences in the same period began leading to a decline in traditional music.  Later, the arrival of popular music furthered this change; some folk music was recorded between the World Wars, but intense collecting did not begin in earnest until recently. 
The four-line metres are a combination of two couplets with four stressed syllables in the first line of each, and two such syllables (first and third, second and third, or third and fourth) alliterate with the first stressed syllable of the second line.  
Salim Benali (born 3 December 1986 in Oran) is an Algerian footballer who plays as a defender for MC El Eulma in the Algerian Ligue Professionnelle 2. 
This biographical article related to a football defender from Algeria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1944, following the Soviet occupation of Estonia during World War II, he fled to Sweden. In 1950, he graduated from Uppsala University. After graduating he worked at the university's plant ecology institute. 
He published publications about algae, limnology and geobotany. He also described several new algae species, e.g. Peridinium lingii. 
Conus madagascariensis is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Conidae, the cone snails and their allies. 
Like all species within the genus Conus, these snails are predatory and venomous. They are capable of "stinging" humans. 
Diodora fragilis is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Fissurellidae, the keyhole limpets. 
Euchromia madagascariensis is a moth of the subfamily Arctiinae. It was described by Jean Baptiste Boisduval in 1833. It is found in Madagascar and South Africa. 
The Jardins de Callunes (4 hectares) are botanical gardens specializing in heather. They are located at 5, Chemin de la Prelle, Ban-de-Sapt, Vosges, Grand Est, France, and open daily in the warmer months; an admission fee is charged. 
The gardens opened to the public in 1996 after 7 years of design and planting under the direction of landscaper Jacques Couturieux. They form part of the rehabilitation of a former quarry, and traces of the pink sandstone and trench warfare from World War I still remain. 
Today the gardens comprise ten distinct areas linked by sweeping lawns and walkways. The pine forest, created in 1994, contains good collections of rhododendron and azalea beneath pines and Japanese maples. The heather gardens contain about 250 varieties of Erica, Calluna, and Daboecia, with rock gardens containing a further 180 taxa of alpine plants. The garden also contains tree peonies, phlox, saxifrage, water plants, and various perennials and shrubs. 
Blondie Goes Latin, also known as Conga Swing, is a 1941 American comedy film directed by Frank R. Strayer and Robert Sparks and starring Penny Singleton, Arthur Lake, and Larry Simms. It is the eighth of the Blondie films. The film showcases musical numbers of Kirby Grant, Ruth Terry, Tito Guizar, with Arthur Lake displaying his drum skills, Penny Singleton her singing and dancing prowess. 
The women's balance beam competition at the 2016 Summer Olympics was held at the HSBC Arena on 15 August. 
The top 8 qualifiers in the qualification phase (limit two per NOC), based on combined score of each apparatus, advanced to the individual all-around final. The finalists performed on each apparatus again. Qualification scores were then ignored, with only final round scores counting. 
The gymnasts who ranked top eight qualified for final round. In cases where there were more than two gymnasts in the same NOC, the last ranked among them would not qualify to the final round. The next best ranked gymnast would qualify instead. 
The F. Q. Story Neighborhood Historic District is located in central Phoenix, Arizona, United States. The neighborhood runs from McDowell Road south to Roosevelt Street and from Seventh Avenue west to Grand Avenue. The neighborhood as well as many of the individual houses are listed on the National Register of Historic Places. 
The F.Q. Story neighborhood consists of 602 homes that were constructed from the late 1920s through the late 1940s. A variety of architectural styles, including Spanish Colonial Revival, English Tudor, Craftsman bungalows as well as transitional ranch are represented within the neighborhood. 
Development hit its peak in 1930 with the construction of 133 new houses, only to falter as the effects of the Great Depression hit Phoenix. Construction declined, but by 1938, approximately seventy-five percent of the F.Q. Story Addition had been developed. 
The people who were first drawn to the neighborhood were considered one of its primary attractions. At one point during its development, the Price & Price Investment Company ran an advertisement listing the names and occupations of nearly all Story Addition property owners in an attempt to encourage sales. Homes were fairly small and, even at their most lavish, relatively inexpensive in comparison with some of the other emerging Phoenix neighborhoods of this era. 
The developers of Story Addition in the 1927-28 period also planned for commercial activities in the neighborhood. Commercial buildings were constructed in eight locations. Characteristic of commercial development of the period, these buildings were located on corner lots on McDowell, Roosevelt, and Grand Avenue, the chief thoroughfares. 
Spanish Colonial Revival houses take their characteristics from the Southwestern architectural tradition. Identifying features include flat or low-pitched roofs with little or no overhang, red tile roof shingles, prominent arches over doors, windows and porches, and an asymmetrical stuccoed facade. 
In contrast, Tudor Revival homes draw from the medieval architecture of Europe. These dwellings feature steeply pitched gabled roofs, and are often ornamented with half timbering. They also are identifiable by their picturesque massing, multiple pane window groupings and massive brick chimneys. 
Udre Udre is believed to have been shot and killed by Fiji government officials in 1840, however the manner of his death is still undocumented. 
His victims were not normal people, but they were "spoils of war."  Every person that he killed and ate was in return of a war victory.  All of the people that he ate were "spoils of war." 
The film industry is built upon many technologies and techniques, drawing upon photography, stagecraft, music, and many other disciplines. Following is an index of specific terminology applicable thereto. 
A and B editing - A roll - Accelerated montage - Acousmatic - Action axis - Aerial shot - Ambient light - American night - American shot - Anamorphic - Angle of view - Angle plus angle - Angular resolution - Answer print - Aperture - Apple box - Artificial light - ASA speed rating - Aspect ratio - Autofocus - Automatic dialogue replacement - Available light - Axial cut 
B roll - Baby plates - Backlot - Background lighting - Balloon light - Barn doors (lighting) - Below the line (film production) - Best boy - Blocking - Bluescreen - Boom shot - Boomerang (lighting) - Bounce board - Brightness (lighting) - Broadside (lighting) - Butterfly (lighting) 
Effects light - Electrotachyscope - Ellipsoidal reflector spot light - Establishing shot - Extreme close-up - Extreme long shot - Eye-level camera angle 
Hard light - Head-on shot - Heart wipe - High-angle shot - High camera angle - High concept - High-intensity discharge lamp - High-key lighting - Hip hop montage - Hydrargyrum Medium-Arc Iodide lamp 
The 2009 Formula BMW Pacific season was the eighth Formula BMW Pacific season. It began on May 2 in Sepang and ended on November 22 in Macau after 15 rounds in five countries. Rio Haryanto became champion with one race to spare, having won the title at Okayama. 
* At the last three rounds, guest drivers started from pole position, setting the fastest lap before winning the race. In Singapore, Felipe Nasr achieved that before Facundo Regalia (Okayama) and William Buller did so in Macau. 
Note: In the second race at the Sepang F1 support event, due to insufficient distance covered, half points were awarded. 
Dickson was a better than average hitting pitcher in his big league career, posting a .231 batting average (253-for-1095) with 81 runs, 34 doubles, 3 home runs, and 82 runs batted in (RBI). 
Fromm presents love as an activity, a skill that can be taught and developed, rejecting the idea of love as a magical and mysterious sensation that cannot be analyzed and explained. He focuses on love as a permanent state of being, as opposed to the short-lived experience of "falling in love" or being helpless in the face of love. 
Fromm calls the desire for interpersonal fusion the most powerful striving in humans. He argues that love is the only rational answer to our need to overcome separateness, which he sees as the fundamental problem of human existence. 
The Art of Loving argues that the active character of true love involves four basic elements: care, responsibility, respect, and knowledge. Each of these is difficult to define and can differ markedly depending on the people involved and their circumstances. Seen in these terms, love is hard work, but it is also the most rewarding kind of work. 
One of the book's concepts is self-love. According to Fromm, loving oneself is quite different from arrogance, conceit or egocentrism. Loving oneself means caring about oneself, taking responsibility for oneself, respecting oneself, and knowing oneself (e.g. being realistic and honest about one's strengths and weaknesses). In order to be able to truly love another person, one needs first to love oneself in this way. 
The book includes explorations of the theories of brotherly love, motherly and fatherly love, erotic love, self-love, and the love of God, and an examination into love's disintegration in contemporary Western culture. 
Fromm begins the last chapter, "The Practice of Love", by saying: "[...] many readers of this book, expect to be given prescriptions of 'how to do it to yourself' [...]. I am afraid that anyone who approaches this last chapter in this spirit will be gravely disappointed". He says that in order to master the art of loving, one must practice discipline, concentration, and patience in every facet of one's life. 
The Professor Harry Messel International Science School (ISS) is a fee-free residential educational event for selected secondary students held for two weeks in July every two years and based at the University of Sydney in Sydney, Australia which has gained renown. ISS aims to honour excellence in senior high school science students and to encourage them to consider careers in science. 
The ISS offers presentations by internationally respected guest lecturers from Australia and overseas to 140 science students from 10 countries (50 students) and Australia (90). 
The Australian Government funds the Len Basser Award for Scientific Leadership which is awarded to a student who demonstrates both strong academic interest in participating in the ISS and collegiality in sharing his/her understanding of the science being taught with fellow students. 
The ISS began in 1958. The first four Science Schools were annual events held for high school teachers. The first International Science School for students was held in 1962 and, until he retired in 1987, the driving force was Professor Harry Messel. Since his retirement, the ISS has operated under the Science Foundation for Physics. 
The ISS was held annually from 1962 until 1975. Since 1977, it has been held every two years.[citation needed] 
Also featured were the demonstrations of Julius Sumner Miller. Later, Dr Karl Kruszelnicki, the Foundation's Julius Sumner Miller Fellow, entertained and enthused the ISS Scholars with his "Great Moments in Science".[citation needed] 
A safari lodge (also known as a game lodge) is a type of tourist accommodation in southern and eastern Africa.  Lodges are  mainly used by tourists on wildlife safaris, and are typically located in or near national parks or game reserves. 
Mathonville is a commune in the Seine-Maritime department in the Normandy region in northern France. 
Mehboob was born in Mattancherry, Kingdom of Cochin (now part of India), into a family beset with stark poverty. He spent his childhood in the nearby Bengal battalion military camp polishing shoes while his mother did cleaning jobs. At the camp Mehboob picked up different languages and songs from soldiers drawn from various parts of the country, some Britishers too. 
Mehboob has also recorded numerous songs for stage plays, gramaphone records and other programmes, which is perhaps many times more than he recorded for films. He was also an inevitable performer in "Mehfils" and other concerts. Mehboob was never a careerist. He was known to be an alcoholic and finally died nearly an impoverished man, aged 56. H. Mehboob road in Mattancherry, Kerala, was named after Mehboob, to pay respect for his contribution in the field of music and also as his remembrance. 
Batman: The Dark Knight is an American comic book ongoing series and Limited series, and featuring Batman. One of two new ongoing titles to feature Bruce Wayne after the "Batman: The Return of Bruce Wayne" storyline, The Dark Knight depicts Bruce Wayne's life in Gotham City following his new global commitment to the newly established Batman Incorporated. In Finch's words, the stories are about relationships and connections he has in Gotham City that he can't walk away from. 
DC Comics relaunched Batman: The Dark Knight with issue #1 in September 2011, as part of The New 52. While David Finch was originally supposed to be the writer on the series permanently, Paul Jenkins was later announced to be co-writing issues. Joe Harris and Judd Winick had guest appearances before Gregg Hurwitz would take over the series. 
DC Comics launched Batman: The Dark Knight from Tom Taylor, Andy Kubert and Brad Anderson, as a six issue miniseries in April 2021. It sees Bruce Wayne travelling to London on a personal investigation and encounters a new villain named Equilibrium. 
Allium falcifolium is a North American species of wild onion known by the common name scytheleaf onion or coast flatstem onion. It is native to northern California and southern Oregon, where it grows in heavy, rocky soils, especially serpentine soils. 
The name Allium falcifolium var. demissum Jeps. was coined in 1921, referring to the taxon now known as Allium siskiyouense Ownbey ex Traub. 
The race consisted of eight lengths of the pool. Each of the four swimmers completes two lengths of the pool. The first swimmer has to touch the wall before the second leaves the starting block. 
He previously was the CEO of the Allegro division. Before working for Naspers, he worked for eBay. He began his business career as an associate at McKinsey & Company. He holds an MBA from INSEAD, and an MSc in econometrics from Erasmus University Rotterdam. 
Wulkau is a village and a former municipality in the district of Stendal, in Saxony-Anhalt, Germany. Since 1 January 2010 it has been part of the municipality of Kamern. 
Sam (Cheng) and his girlfriend Barbara (Chau) open up a joint cafe - the "LA Cafe Pillowcase". It later becomes a hotspot for recently separated couples to share their stories and memorabilia from past relationships. 
This article related to a Hong Kong film of the 2010s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bukit Batok Public Library is located at Bukit Batok on the third floor of West Mall in Singapore, next to Bukit Batok MRT station. This is fifth library of the National Library Board that is located inside a shopping mall. The library was officially opened on 21 November 1998 by Deputy Prime Minister, BG (NS) Lee Hsien Loong. 
The library begun operating soon after the West Mall was opened. The library is headed by Lim Puay Ling. It is a fully computerised library with a collection of 202,151 publications. It has served more than 1,419,634 visitors and residents from the Bukit Batok and Bukit Gombak constituencies. As of 2001, it had 28,814 members and had given out 1,345,869 book loans. 
The library includes a customer service counter, an adult/young people's section, a children's section, an activities room, 13 multimedia stations and a reference collection. Facilities in the library include borrower's enquiry, six borrowing stations, two bookdrop services, browsing shelves of books and periodicals in four main languages and multimedia services. 
Two storytelling sessions for children are conducted every Tuesday at 7:00 pm and 7:30 pm. Reading Bear programmes were organised for primary school. Primary school children are also taken on class visits to the library featuring storytelling, craft, video shows and a tour of the library. 
This article about a Singapore building or structure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Weston Park House and the surrounding parkland were given to the nation in 1986 by the 7th Earl of Bradford, with the support of the National Heritage Memorial Fund. It is now in the care of the trustees of the Weston Park Foundation. The house retains its art collection with over 30,000 objects and is open to the public. 
Adjacent to the house is the estate church, dedicated to St Andrew. Pevsner describes the church as "an enterprise of Lady Wilbraham...[of] 1700-1". The orangery, stable block, and granary, which all adjoin the house, have their own Grade II listings. The 1767 Granary building was restored in 2009 with support from the Heritage Lottery Fund and regional development agency Advantage West Midlands. 
Lady Elizabeth Wilbraham, the possible architect of Weston, by Sir Peter Lely, one of the portraits in the collection 
In 1947, Nazih Shabandar established a production studio filled with equipment he created. The following year, he produced the first Syrian talkie, Nur wa Thalam (Light and Darkness), written by Mohamed Shamel and Ali el-Arna'ut. The film was also significant because it featured several rising Syrian stars: Rafiq Shukri, Yevett Feghli, and Anwar el Baba. 
Film production improved during the 1950s, but was still hindered by lackluster distribution. The 1960s saw significant improvements with Doreid Lahham and Nuhad al-Qala'i, a comedic duo, generating higher profit margins than their predecessors. Their first film was Aqd al-Lulu (Necklace of Pearls), released in 1965. Aqd al-Lulu was the first in a tightly linked series of comedy films from the duo. Thanks to ample profits, they were able to produce films at a rate of two per year. 
Thomas Michael Hull (born June 30, 1952) is a former linebacker in the National Football League. He was drafted in the twelfth round of the 1974 NFL Draft by the San Francisco 49ers and played that season with the team. The following season, he played with the Green Bay Packers. Prior to playing in the NFL, Hull played at the collegiate level at Penn State University. 
Hull's son, Mike, followed in his father's footsteps and committed to Penn State in 2008. He later signed with the Miami Dolphins in 2015. 
This biographical article relating to an American football linebacker born in the 1950s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Stalling Down is a rolling area of open land  a few miles east of the town of Cowbridge, now the village common of St Hilary in the Vale of Glamorgan. The exact site of the battle and the precise details of the action are not known. The general site is known locally as Bryn Owain, meaning Owain's Hill. 
The site was known as Stallington, evolving to Stalling Down. A Roman road runs over the hill as it traverses the area and would have been a convenient route for moving a very large army along for the English. 
The battle is said to have lasted 18 hours and resulted in an appalling defeat for the King's army. The blood was fetlock deep on the horses that survived the battle. 
The English army retreated through Cardiff pursued by the Welsh in terrible conditions, which included a thunderstorm and flooding. 
Nebria tatrica tatrica is a subspecies of ground beetle in the Nebriinae subfamily that can be found in Poland, Slovenia, and Slovakia. 
This biographical article relating to a United States basketball player, coach, or other figure born in the 1910s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Gaby's Deli was a family Jewish  restaurant in London's Charing Cross Road. It was named after the founder, Gaby Elyahou, who ran it with his family. 
It served fresh salads and homely hot meals such as goulash.  It was especially noted for the quality of its salt beef. 
It was threatened by closure in 2011 but a campaign by its many celebrity customers, including prominent actors and politicians, persuaded the landlord, Lord Salisbury, to grant a further lease. It closed at the end of October 2018, following the owner's retirement. 
The Jewish deli was popular with theatrical celebrities because it was in London's Theatreland district and it served quick and tasty meals.  Charlie Chaplin was a regular customer and other stars commemorated by photographs inside the restaurant included Diana Rigg and Matt Damon. The restaurant was also popular with left-wing politicians such as Ken Livingstone because it was near Trafalgar Square, which is often the location of demonstrations and protest marches. 
The restaurant already served salt beef when Gaby took over and he thought this made the best sandwich. He introduced espresso coffee and many varieties of salad. Mediterranean dishes such as hummus and tahini were served and Gaby claimed to have introduced falafels to London. Other dishes included goulash, meatballs and soup. 
 Matthew Norman reviewed the restaurant for The Daily Telegraph, giving it a rating of 9 out of 10.  The dishes which he praised included bean and barley soup, chicken livers fried with onions, and a spinach salad.  His party then ordered more food and he especially praised the salt beef:
Kleftiko with lukewarm chips and Hungarian goulash with excellent saffron rice were fine winter warmers, but the clear highlight was my salt beef in rye bread with sweet and sour pickles. The beef was plentiful, juicy and just as fatty as it should be.  Lean salt beef is, as my mother puts it, like having a bath with your socks on. With its bustle, warmth and earthy charm, Gaby's is our best answer to the great New York delis such as the Carnegie...
The restaurant closed at 8.30pm on 31 October 2018.  Regulars who came for a final meal included Labour MP, Barbara Roche, who had been eating there with her family since she was sixteen. 
Cosmosoma vesparia is a moth of the subfamily Arctiinae. It was described by Maximilian Perty in 1834. It is found in the Amazon region. 
Villeda was born in Tlaxcala, Mexico in 1985. She began writing at age 9, and had her first poem published in a local newspaper after attending a literary workshop at age 16. She published her first book of poetry at age 18, and studied International Affairs at the Monterrey Institute of Technology and Higher Education. Her interest in poetry and its relation with various technological resources began with LABO: laboratory of cyberpoetry (www.labo.com.mx). 
Her poetry has been translated to several languages, including Arabic, English, French, German and Portuguese. 
Her work as poet is part of the Archive of Hispanic Literature on Tape of the Library of Congress (2015) and she is one of the few Mexican writers in the archive. Part of her digital work is in the third volume of Electronic Literature Collection of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology. 
As of 2018, the party began talks with other political forces such as New Generation, the Christian Democratic Alliance, Costa Rican Renewal, the Social Christian Republican Party, the Libertarian Movement and a faction of the Social Christian Unity Party to negotiate a right-wing coalition for the 2022 election; however, the talks stalled. 
Colobothea chontalensis is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Bates in 1872. It is known from Nicaragua and Panama. 
The region have been inhabited  since the Stone Age. Copper tools from the Chalcolithic period have been discovered. This area entered the Iron Age during the mid-2nd millennium BCE. 
Following Indian independence in 1947, the region was divided between the new states of Madhya Pradesh, Orissa, and Bihar. In 2000 a campaign led by the BJP for a separate state culminated with the passage of the Bihar Reorganisation Act, creating Jharkhand as a new Indian state. 
During 2nd millennium BCE the use of Copper tools spread in Chota Nagpur Plateau and these find complex are known as the Copper Hoard Culture. In the Kabra-Kala mound, at the confluence of the Son and North Koel rivers in Palamu district, various objects have been found which date from the Neolithic to the medieval period. The pot-sherds of redware, black and red ware, black ware, black slipware and NBP ware are from the Chalcolithic to the late medieval period. 
Samudragupta, while marching through the present-day Chota Nagpur region, directed the first attack against the kingdom of Dakshina Kosala in the Mahanadi valley. 
In the 7th century, Chinese traveler Xuanzang passed through the region. He described the kingdom as Karnasuvarna and Shashanka as its ruler. To the north of the kingdom was Magadha, Champa was in East, Mahendra in the west, and Orissa in the south. The region was also part of Pala Empire. 
By the end of medieval and the beginning of the modern period, this region was under the rule of many dynasties including Nagvanshi, Khayaravala, Ramgarh Raj, Raksel, Chero, Raj Dhanwar and the Kharagdiha Zamindari estates of Koderma, Gadi Palganj, and Ledo Gadi. 
On his return to Chota Nagpur, Durjan Sal assumed the title of Maharaja and changed his surname. He shifted the capital from Khukhragarh to Doisa, also known as Navratangarh. The reign of Durjan Sal lasted for about thirteen years. He died in 1639 or 1640 AD. He was succeeded by Raghunath Shah. He constructed several temples. He was also a poet and wrote several poems in Nagpuri language. 
Daud Khan, who launched his invasion on 3 April 1660 from Patna, attacked south of Gaya district and finally arrived at the Palamu forts on 9 December 1660. The terms of surrender and payment of tribute were not acceptable to the Cheros; Daud Khan wanted complete conversion of the Hindus to Islam. Following this, Khan mounted a series of attacks on the forts. Cheros defended the forts but ultimately lost and fled to the jungles. The temples were destroyed and Islamic rule was imposed. 
Other princely states in the Chota Nagpur Plateau came within the sphere of influence of the Maratha Empire, but they became tributary states of East India Company as a result of the Anglo-Maratha Wars known as Chota Nagpur Tributary States. 
In 1914, the Tana Bhagat resistance movement started, which gained the participation of more than 26,000 adivasis, and eventually merged with Mahatma Gandhi's Satyagraha and Civil Disobedience movement. 
In October 1905, the exercise of British influence over the predominantly Hindi-speaking states of Chang Bhakar, Jashpur, Koriya, Surguja, and Udaipur was transferred from the Bengal government to that of the Central Provinces, while the two Oriya-speaking states of Gangpur and Bonai were attached to the Orissa Tributary States, leaving only Kharsawan and Saraikela answerable to the Bengal governor. 
In 1936, all nine states were transferred to the Eastern States Agency, the officials of which came under the direct authority of the Governor-General of India, rather than under that of any Provinces. 
In March 1940, INC 53rd Session was accomplished under the presidency of Maulana Abul Qalam Azad at Jhanda Chowk, Ramgarh (now, Ramgarh Cant.). Mahatma Gandhi, Jawaharlal Nehru, Sardar Patel, Dr. Rajendra Prasad, Sarojini Naidu, Khan Abdul Ghaffar Khan, Acharya J.B. Kripalani, Industrialist Jamnalal Bajaj and other leaders of Indian freedom movement attended the Ramgarh session. Mahatma Gandhi also opened khadi and village industries exhibition at Ramgarh. 
After the Indian independence in 1947, the rulers of the states chose to accede to the Dominion of India. Changbhakar, Jashpur, Koriya, Surguja, and Udaipur States became part of Madhya Pradesh state; Gangpur and Bonai became part of Orissa state; and Kharsawan and Saraikela became part of Bihar state. 
The main cause of the crisis is the ongoing Yemeni Civil War. Aid often cannot effectively reach the population because of the ongoing civil war and the blockade of Yemen by Saudi Arabia which started in 2015. The blockade was intensified in November 2017 with the closure of all sea and land ports and then partially but not fully lifted at the end of the month, and some humanitarian supplies were allowed into the country. 
According to the 2019 Global Hunger Index, Yemen has the second-highest hunger score in the world, after the Central African Republic with a slight worsening of the hunger score since 2000 (increase from 43.2 to 45.9). For 2020, GHI estimates that the prevalence of wasting in children under 5 has increased from 13.3% to 15.5% and the prevalence of stunting has increased from 46.6% to 53.2% while overall child mortality has slightly decreased in the period of the civil war (compared to 2010). 
U.S. Senator Chris Murphy accused the United States of complicity in Yemen's humanitarian crisis, saying: "Thousands and thousands inside Yemen today are dying. ... This horror is caused in part by our decision to facilitate a bombing campaign that is murdering children and to endorse a Saudi strategy inside Yemen that is deliberately using disease and starvation and the withdrawal of humanitarian support as a tactic." 
Doctors Without Borders (MSF) has been assisting victims of the famine and the cholera outbreak, as well as providing mental health assistance to those who have been affected by the war. 
On 5 November 2017, the Saudi-led coalition began blocking all fuel shipments to Yemen, causing farmers to abandon modern equipment like tractors and forcing hospitals to function without generators. 
On 11   December 2017, Jamie McGoldrick, the UN's humanitarian coordinator for Yemen, affirmed that 8 million in the country are in danger of famine unless access to immediate humanitarian aid is allowed. On 13 December 2017, USAID administrator, Mark Andrew Green, stated that there are no signs that the blockade had been in any way eased and Yemeni ports are still fully blocked. 
According to The Economist, another major cause of the famine is the popularity of the cultivation and consumption of khat, which requires a significant amount of water to grow in addition to being the most popular drug in Yemen. Khat cultivation is monopolised by the Houthi rebels. 
In a September 2018 column in The New York Times, Nicholas Kristof stated that the United States is supporting crimes against humanity in Yemen, adding that: "America is helping to kill, maim and starve Yemeni children. At least eight million Yemenis are at risk of starvation from an approaching famine caused not by crop failures but by our actions and those of our allies. The United Nations has called it the world's worst humanitarian crisis, and we own it." 
In October 2018, World Peace Foundation released a report documenting systematic targeting and destruction of food production and distribution infrastructure in Yemen by the Saudi-led coalition. 
In November 2018, according to the New York Times report, 1.8 million children in Yemen are severely malnourished. 
On 3 August 2019, a United Nations report said the US, UK and France may be complicit in committing war crimes in Yemen by selling weapons and providing support to the Saudi-led coalition which is using the starvation of civilians as a tactic of warfare. 
Famine was averted in 2019, as support from donor governments saw the World Food Programme scale up to support increasing needs, going from supporting around 1 million people in 2015 to nearly 13 million in 2019. It was one of the largest humanitarian scale-ups in recent history. 
As of March 2020, UNICEF estimates that 2 million children under the age of 5 suffer from acute malnutrition and require treatment. 
The World Food Programme (WFP) projected in March 2021 that if the Saudi-led blockade and war continues, more than 400,000 Yemeni children under 5 years old could die from acute malnutrition before the end of the year as the blockade devastates the nation. 
Two films were made based on Gasoline Gus. The first in 1915  with a cast that included Fay Tincher and Elmer Booth, and the second Gasoline Gus (1921 film). The 1921 film was based on a Saturday Evening Post story by George Pattullo (writer). 
The petroleum scientist and Director of Universal Oil Products, Gustav Erloff, was nicknamed Gasoline Gus from 1915. 
The station was opened on 7 October 1928. There were initially two island platforms. Electrification on the current S-Bahn system commenced on 2 July 1929. Before that time, there were electrical test operations using a 550 V DC system. Since 15 May 1939, the station has been served exclusively by electric powered S-Bahn trains. A second entrance was built and the entire station was modernised. Rail services were abandoned towards the end of the Second World War in April 1945. 
The station was reopened for steam-powered trains on 8 June 1945. Electrical operations were resumed on 16 August 1945. 
The station is served by Berlin S-Bahn lines S2, S25, and S26. There are interchanges with the following bus routes operated by the Berliner Verkehrsbetriebe. 
Known during the British colonial days and parliamentary days of Burma as St. Peter's English High School, the Roman Catholic parochial school was the top school of choice for the children of the elite from Mandalay and Upper Burma. Many of the country's who's who in those days were alumni of St. Peter's. Many professionals and top-level leaders of Aung San Suu Kyi's government from Mandalay are also  alumni of St. Peter's. 
The school was founded as St. Peter's High School by the De La Salle Brothers, a Roman Catholic order on 1 May 1897. It was the first La Sallian high school founded in Upper Burma, and the third in the whole Burma after St. Patrick's in Mawlamyine and St. Paul's in Rangoon. 
St. Peter's high school was started teaching over 80 students. In 1924, there were 11 teachers and 350 students, including 130 resident students. 
Since it was opened, the school accepted boys only for some time. The all-boys school was among the few early schools that educated the children of the country's British officers, the Anglo-Burmese, the Anglo-Indians and the wealthy Burmese. The language of instruction was mainly English in the early days, and bi-lingual for some classes in the later days. There were also some Hebrew classes for the Jewish. 
General Ne Win's military government nationalized the school in April 1966, and changed the name to BEHS 9 Mandalay. The primary language of instruction became Burmese. The school, which used to have a "Roll of Honour" for its outstanding students, steadily lost significance partly due to the new requirement to attend nearby schools as much as possible. 
During the World War II, when the school was transformed into a hospital, St. Peter's High School was reopened at the Norman school campus (now BEHS 4 Mandalay). Its campus moved to the original and current place in 1952. 
The current school, BEHS 9, is open in the gated southern campus since the northern campus, inclusive of three-storey building, is donated to the Department of Basic Education, Ministry of Education in Myanmar. 
The school offers classes from KG to Grade 11 in accordance with the syllabus and curriculums prescribed by the Department of Basic Education under the Ministry of Education in Myanmar. 
The school library is open during one-hour lunch break. Librarian and members of school library committee (teachers) manage and maintain the library systematically in line with the instructions of the principal. Member cards for students are free of charge. There are hundreds of books, inclusive of encyclopedias, written in both English and Burmese. 
Both language and experimental science labs are available. Chemistry, physics and biology labs have enough teaching and learning aids for highschool students. Students have to join science labs when necessary for their studies, maybe once or twice a month. 
Co-curriculum activities such as morals, life skills, arts, music and physical training are available for all levels of students.  
Having sufficient facilities and good training, BEHS 9 Mandalay is well known for its students winning medals in basic education level tournaments every year. 
BEHS 9 Mandalay has both academic and extra-curricular clubs and activities according to each year's academic calendar. 
St. Peter's boys band once was the most popular in Mandalay. Many awards were achieved. However the band was dissolved for some reasons. 
In July 2019, school alumni co-ordinated with the principal, and formed new fife and drum corps with the current students. From August 2019 onwards, music lessons were started for BEHS 9 Mandalay's band. 
On the full moon day of Waso each year, BEHS 9 Mandalay offers Waso flowers at nearby Shwe Kyee Myin pagoda, and Waso robes are offered. 
Debra Laefer is the Director of Citizen Science program within NYU's Center for Urban Science + Progress and Associate Professor of NYU's Tandon School of Engineering. Previously a professor at University College, Dublin, her research in geotechnical and structural engineering focuses on ways to preserve architecturally significant buildings from sub-surface construction. 
Laefer leads the Urban Modelling Group which released the densest LiDAR dataset to date in order to facilitate urban development. She was also featured in a showcase of eight leading female scientists of Ireland in an exhibition in 2016. 
Laefer earned her PhD from the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign in Geotechnical Civil Engineering.  She holds a B.A. in Art History and a B.S. in Civil Engineering from Columbia University. She is a fellow of the Japan Society for the Promotion of Science and a Fulbright fellow. 
Kabarkada, Break the Bank is a Philippine TV game show by Endemol. It aired from August 27 to December 28, 2007 on Studio 23 and is hosted by Mo Twister. The show is a spin-off from ABS-CBN's Kapamilya, Deal or No Deal which is also from Endemol. 
(Celebrity offer) A videotaped recording of a big star, popular celebrity/personality offers a prize to the contestant, which could be from her/his sponsors or endorsement products or her/his personal items. 
(derived from Mo's name - host) The unknown amount inside the suitcase is automatically multiplied up to five times its original value. 
This segment is derived from the controversial and most talked about radio segment of DJ Twister, entitled "Forbidden Question". The caller answers a trivia question and can bid to add more money to the suitcase. Contestant can add a certain amount to what is inside the suitcase, and it is up to Mo to approve it, provided that the contestant can answer a rather easy trivia question. A question has a corresponding money prize. The money prize can be sponsored by a client. 
A man-on-the-street video recording is shown, offering the contestant prizes ranging from cash to simple funny things like a comb or a piggy bank. 
Lloyd Law College is a leading Law school in India. The institution is located in Greater Noida , Uttar Pradesh. It offers five years integrated course in B.A LL.B and 3 years LL.B course with specialisation in different areas of Law. 
The college has also been working on many research programmes that aim to influence policy formulation in the area and also influence legal reformation. Research activities such as rights awareness among school children, ragging, etc. have also been undertaken by the college. 
LLoyd Law College has been Ranked 17 By India Today 2020 , Ranked 18 By The Week (Indian magazine)  2020 Respectively as the Top Emerging Law school in India. 
Lloyd Law College is located in Knowledge Park - II, Greater Noida (U.P/ NCR). The law college is spread over 4.5 acres of non-residential campus comprising three multi-storey blocks. 
The campus had its first four-story building in 2003 and currently has main academic block comprising sixteen lecture theatres / class rooms, as well as four story facility centre containing 3000 textual collection, journal subscription of last 56 years and regular intake of newspapers & magazines. 
It organises various mooting competitions and extra-curricular activities related to the field of law. Moot Court activities are a thrust area of Lloyd Legal education. The mooting activity in Lloyd is a serious business with a severe competition among the students to be part of the mooting teams. 
Students are admitted to the institute through a written common test, which is generally conducted in the month of May. Apart from the score in the LET a student must have passed the 10+2 or equivalent examination in any stream with at least 45% marks with English as a compulsory subject. The students after successfully clearing the respective law entrance exams have to give a personal interview after which the candidate is selected. 
Lloyd Law College launched the First Prof.N. R. Madhava Menon SAARCLAW Mooting Competition & Law Students Conference in 2016, under technical support from MILAT-Menon Institute of Legal Advocacy, Trivandrum. 
The college since its inception in 2003 is providing conveyance facility to ensure safety, comfort and time management of the day boarding students. It is available from all locations of Delhi and whole of NCR region. 
4. 7th Christ National Moot Court Competition-Team Status- semifinalists with overall 3rd Rank in the Competition. 
6. 16th Amity National Moot Court Competition, 2017. Team Status, semifinalists with overall 3rd Rank in the Competition. The Memorial was 3rd best Memorial. 
8. 1st Dr. Gurjeet Singh Memorial National Moot Court Competition 2017 National Law University and Judicial Academy Assam. Team Status- Second Best Memorial 
9. IV Edition North Cap University National Moot Court Competition, 2017. Team Status: Best Speaker Award to Twinkle Hussain. 
3. Aakash Keshari and Ankit Goyal, B.A.LL.B. III Year: Presented Paper at the NLSIU Seminar on Sustainable Energy Future in India, 2017 
4. Nikhil Sood and Anshul Saxena, B.A.LL.B. III Year: Presented Paper At the National Conference on Cyber Law and IT Protection, 2017, NLSIU and Lovely Professional University 
http://www.chancefac.net/A-cs_pgs_rebuild/Lima_Sites/LS_Pg1.htm http://www.chancefac.net/A-cs_pgs_rebuild/Lima_Sites/LS_Pg2.htm http://www.chancefac.net/A-cs_pgs_rebuild/Lima_Sites/LS_Pg3.htm http://www.chancefac.net/A-cs_pgs_rebuild/Lima_Sites/LS_Pg4.htm http://www.chancefac.net/A-cs_pgs_rebuild/Lima_Sites/LS_Pg5.htm 
Birma Seamount is named after SS Birma, a Russian steamship that responded to the RMS Titanic's distress signal following her collision with an iceberg on 15 April 1912. 
He has published over 40 short stories, as well as essays and criticism. His work has appeared in Granta, the Irish Times and the Los Angeles Review of Books and has been translated into more than a dozen languages. 
In 2010, he edited Sharp Sticks, Driven Nails, an anthology of new short stories by twenty-two Irish and international writers, for The Stinging Fly Press. 
He translated Mihail Sebastian's autobiographical novel For Two Thousand Years. It tells the story of the author's early years as a Jew in Romania during the 1920s. It was published in 2016. 
He has written an unpublished novel but reduced it to a long short story and believes "if you've got something to say and you can say it with less, that's the way to go." 
He has acknowledged being influenced in his writing style by Charles Bukowski, Anton Chekhov, Fyodor Dostoyevsky, Ernest Hemingway, Jack Kerouac, and Ivan Turgenev. 
Eve Patten, in The Irish Times, praised his "ambitiousness with the short story shape", and "his break from the grip of ingrained Irish modes". 
Michel Faber, in The Guardian, described his control of tone, dialogue and narrative contour as "masterful". 
His second collection, The Pleasant Light of Day was shortlisted for the Frank O'Connor International Short Story Award. He was the first Irish writer to receive this honour. 
It was built in 1973, and inaugurated on August 26 of that year. Eight people died during mass panic when the stadium's inauguration, which broke out when a spectator shouted that the stadium was collapsing. In reality the vibrations felt were reportedly caused by a low-flying aircraft. Although the death toll in different official reports varies, it is generally accepted that this remains the worst disaster in the history of Brazilian football. 
The first goal of the stadium was scored on August 29, 1973, by Cruzeiro's Dirceu Lopes, when Tiradentes and Cruzeiro drew 1-1. 
Elizabeth Mary "Liz" Ready (pronounced "reedy") (born October 7, 1953) is a Vermont politician who is most notable for her service in the Vermont Senate from 1989 to 2001 and as Vermont Auditor of Accounts from 2001 to 2005. 
Ready was educated in Burlington and graduated from Rice Memorial High School.  She attended the University of Vermont and Burlington College, from which she received a Bachelor of Arts degree in education. Ready later attended Norwich University, where she studied Public Administration. 
For several years Ready taught basic literacy skills to adults in rural Addison County. She then became a consultant to the Vermont Department of Education, where she was credited with founding the Adult Diploma Program and working with vocational centers throughout Vermont to design programs for adult students. 
In 1988, Ready founded the Addison County Community Trust, an organization which works to develop affordable housing, protect farmland, and preserve natural resources. She served as the Trust's Director for 12 years. 
A Democrat, Ready served in several local offices, including auditor, planning commissioner and selectman in Lincoln and as a member of the Addison County Regional Planning Commission. 
In 1988, Ready was elected to the Vermont Senate. She won re-election five times and served from 1989 to 2001.  During her Senate service she was on the Natural Resources Committee for twelve years and served as chairperson for four.  In addition, she served on the Agriculture Committee for eight years, the Finance Committee for six, and the Appropriations Committee for six. For six years she also served as a member of the Joint Fiscal Committee. 
In 2000, Ready was the successful Democratic nominee for Auditor of Accounts, defeating Republican John S. Hall of St. Johnsbury and two minor candidates. 
Ready won re-election in 2002, defeating Republican Bruce Hyde of Fayston and three minor candidates. 
During this campaign, Ready was accused of having falsified her biography, with her State Senate biographical sketch and commercial publications including Marquis Who's Who in American Politics and the State Yellow Book incorrectly indicating that she had received a bachelor's degree from the University of Vermont rather than Burlington College, and that she had completed a master's degree from Norwich University. 
In the 2004 general election, Brock defeated Ready 52% to 42%, with 6% going to the candidate of the Liberty Union Party.  Ready's defeat was largely attributed to questions about her integrity that were raised as the result of her incorrect biography. 
After leaving office, Ready became Executive Director of the John W. Graham Emergency Shelter in Vergennes. 
Eye in the Sky is a science fiction novel by American writer Philip K. Dick, originally published in 1957. 
After an accident at the Belmont Bevatron, eight people are forced into several different alternate universes. These ersatz universes are later revealed to be solipsistic manifestations of each individual's innermost fears and prejudices, bringing the story in line with Dick's penchant for subjective realities. As well as his future discussions of theology and fears about McCarthy-era authoritarianism, the novel skewers several human foibles. 
The title refers to the eye of God, who appears as a character in the universe of religious fundamentalist Arthur Sylvester. 
While on a visit to the (fictional) Belmont Bevatron in the 1957 novel's near-future year of 1959, eight people become stuck in a series of subtly and not-so-subtly unreal worlds. The instigating incident is a malfunction of the particle accelerator, which places all of the injured parties in states of total or partial unconsciousness. 
Finally, the group arrives in a Marxist caricature of contemporary US society. The characters discover that Marsha Hamilton did not create this world. Instead, Charles McFeyffe is revealed as a Communist who is using his position as chief security officer to further the ideals of the Communist Party. 
After McFeyffe is knocked unconscious, the group believes they have returned to the real world. Jack Hamilton and Bill Laws form a small business that seeks advances in stereophonic technology. The disclosure of McFeyffe's Marxist allegiances is dismissed as unproveable. The novel ends ambiguously, as it is unclear if the group has returned to reality or is still living in someone else's universe. 
Anthony Boucher lauded the novel as "nicely calculated and adroitly revealed," saying that he had "never seen [its] theme handled with greater technical dexterity or given more psychological meaning." 
It is fed by several small streams of the eastern Cascade crest. It is the headwaters of Clear Creek, a tributary of the White River, blocked at the east end by the Wasco Dam.  The earthen dam was a 1959 irrigation project of the United States Bureau of Reclamation, 59 feet high and 1901 feet long at its crest. 
Dam construction began in 1963, capturing water from the Notwane River, at a time when the new capital city of Gaborone was in the planning stages. The original dam was complete in 1964. The dam is an earthcore fill structure. During the 1965-66 rainy season the reservoir filled and overflowed. 
In the drought-prone country, the water supply is a constant concern.   A neon signboard in the city informs residents how full the reservoir is.  The reservoir and the green buffer zone that surrounds it are the largest and most fragile ecosystem in the Gaborone area. A book published in 2004 noted that storm water drainage is poor in Gaborone, causing recurring street floods, and that pit latrines and overflowing sewage ponds endanger the water in the reservoir. 
Joanna Blythman (born 1956) is a British investigative food journalist and writer and a commentator on the British food chain who has covered subjects including salmon farming, supermarkets, intensive pineapple production, bird flu and the causes of obesity. 
Blythman was born in Springburn in Glasgow, the daughter of lecturer in Education, Marion Blythman and socialist campaigner and Scottish republican songwriter Morris Blythman. 
Blythman broadcasts regularly on issues relating to food (Tonight, BBC Breakfast, GMTV, The Money Programme, Dispatches, Time Shift and on Radio 4 The Food Programme and Woman's Hour). She writes a weekly restaurant review and an opinion column for the Sunday Herald, and has contributed to newspapers and magazines including The Observer Food Monthly, Daily Mail, Guardian, BBC Countryfile magazine, Olive magazine, The Oldie and The Grocer. 
Brett Milano (born 1957) is a Boston-based music critic and columnist. His fourth book, a biography of Game Theory's Scott Miller, was published in October 2015. 
According to the Boston Globe, Milano is a veteran music critic whose 2007 book, The Sound of Our Town: A History of Boston Rock and Roll, "should be required reading for anyone interested in understanding Boston's unique contribution to rock 'n' roll." 
Milano entered the Boston music scene in the 1980s as a music journalist. He was a long-time columnist for the Boston Phoenix, as well as the Boston Globe and Sound & Vision magazine. Milano has also written for publications such as Billboard, Pulse, and the College Media Journal. In 2013, he became the editor of OffBeat, where he has written about music since 2005. 
Turning his hand to fiction, he is the author of two short stories anthologized in the 2011 and 2012 volumes of Tales from the House Band, a series of books edited by Deborah Grabien. 
The Boston Globe wrote that Milano's book The Sound of Our Town (2007) depicts Boston's "diversity of scenes and attitudes, much of it driven by the constant influx of college students and transplants", creating a "healthy dissonance" that defined the Boston rock sound. 
The book was written over the course of two years, though Milano had been collecting material for several years beforehand. Milano's approach to the problem of structuring the book to reflect the typical chaos of a local music scene was "to at least give a mention to every great band I could ... without making it just a laundry-list of bands," in an effort to "catch the spirit of the time and places, and tell some of the more important band histories, and have it flow as a story." 
Milano's biography of Scott Miller, Don't All Thank Me at Once: The Lost Genius of Scott Miller, was published in October 2015. Milano described the book as one that not only tells the story of Miller and his bands Game Theory and The Loud Family, but also explores "the college and indie-rock explosion of the 1980s and 1990s," and how some influential artists "managed to fall through the cracks." 
Since September 2016, Milano and Rocker Magazine editor-in-chief Erin Amar have co-hosted a monthly rock and roll trivia night at various venues in the Boston area. 
This biographical article related to football in Ivory Coast is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Fat Pig is a play by Neil LaBute. The play premiered Off-Broadway in 2004 and won the 2005 Outer Critics Circle Award for Outstanding Off-Broadway Play. The play had its London premiere in 2008 and was nominated for Laurence Olivier Award for Best New Comedy. The play involves a romantic relationship between a plus-size woman and a young professional man, whose friend denigrates the woman as being "fat". 
Labute provides very few details about the specifics of the characters' lives, beside from the fact that they all work and are in approximately the same age group. 
Fat Pig premiered Off-Broadway at the Lucille Lortel Theatre in an MCC Theater production on November 23, 2004 in previews, officially on December 15. Directed by Jo Bonney, the cast was as follows: Ashlie Atkinson (Helen), Andrew McCarthy (Carter), Jeremy Piven (Tom), Keri Russell (Jeannie) (in her stage debut This production was hailed as a provocative comedy that made the audience think. David Amsden said in New York Magazine, 
 "You emerge from his plays either praising him for the metaphoric slap in the face or simply wishing you knew where he lived, so you can hunt down the bastard and deliver a literal slap of your own. The guy is doing something right, in short.... His cruel wit and chronicles of immoral moralizers have made him, arguably, the most legitimately provocative and polarizing playwright at work today."
The play was showcased during the Labute Festival at the Studio Theatre in Washington D.C. The play featured Tyler Pierce as Tom. Kate Debelack played the role of Helen. 
The play made its West Coast Bay Area production in San Jose, at City Lights Theatre Company of San Jose, under the direction of Tom Gough, its former Artistic Director. It held a successful run, opening from January 25, 2007, to February 25, 2007, and received high praise. 
The play made its New England debut in Boston from March 16, 2007 to April 7, 2007 at the Boston Center for the Arts by the SpeakEasy Stage Company. The cast included James Ryen(Tom), Liliane Klein (Helen), Michael Daniel Anderson (Carter), and Laura Latreille (Jeannie). 
The Los Angeles premiere was May 11, 2007 at the Geffen Playhouse's Audrey Skirball-Kenis Theater, with a cast including Kirsten Vangsness as Helen, Scott Wolf as Tom, Chris Pine as Carter, and Andrea Anders as Jeannie. The play, originally scheduled to run until June 10, 2007, was extended to July 1, 2007, with a new cast - original New York cast member Ashlie Atkinson as Helen, Joseph Sikora as Tom, Jon Bernthal as Carter, and Jamie Ray Newman as Jeannie. 
Its United Kingdom premiere runs from 27 May 2008 at the Trafalgar Studios, London, with a cast including Ella Smith as Helen, Robert Webb as Tom, Kris Marshall as Carter and Joanna Page as Jeannie. 
In August it was announced that both Marshall and Webb would be stepping down from their roles and be replaced by Kevin Bishop and Nicholas Burns, respectively. Also announced later in the same month was that Page would be stepping down from her role and would be replaced by Kelly Brook and Katie Kerr would replace Ella Smith in October 2008. 
The play made its East Bay Area premiere in Berkeley, CA at the Aurora Theatre Company. Previews began on October 30, 2009 and opening night was November 5, 2009. The play was directed by Barbara Damashek and featured Boston cast member Liliane Klein as Helen, Jud Williford as Tom, Peter Ruocco as Carter, and Alexandra Creighton as Jeannie. Originally scheduled to run through December 6, 2009, the play was extended 1 week through December 13, 2009. 
The production was hailed by SF Chronicle drama critic Robert Hurwitt, who wrote, "This is LaBute at the best of his bad-boy sensitive mode." Arielle Little wrote in The Daily Californian: 
Theatre Horizon produced the play April 9 - May 1, 2010.  It was directed by Matthew Decker and featured Ed Renninger as Tom, Melissa Joy Hart as Helen, Paul Felder as Carter and Erin Mulgrew as Jeannie. 
The show is currently, as of April 2010, being staged in Mexico City at the Teatro Fernando Soler, in Spanish, with the title "Gorda" (literally, 'fat woman'). The play is set in Mexico. 
Fat Pig made its Asian premiere at Hong Kong Cultural Centre Studio from August 20, 2010 to August 29, 2010. It was translated by Chong Mui-Ngam and directed by Wong Long-Bun. Four young local actors were cast in the lead roles. 
Josh Hamilton as Tom, HeatherJane Rolff as Helen, Dane Cook as Carter, and Julia Stiles as Jeannie were scheduled to star in a production at the Belasco Theatre on April 12, 2011 in previews and officially on April 26, 2011. This would have marked the Broadway directorial debut of Labute as well. However, before the show began it was postponed for financial reasons, with intent to reschedule it for the 2011-12 season instead. 
Ronald James Gibbs (born November 27, 1947 in Sampaloc, Manila, Philippines), popularly known by his on-screen name Ronaldo Valdez, is a veteran Filipino film and television actor whose career spanned for almost five decades. 
Valdez is the father of actor-comedian, TV host and singer Janno Gibbs and Melissa Gibbs. He is married to Maria Fe Gibbs. Valdez started his earlier career as a leading man and is currently known for portraying paternal roles and antagonists in both TV and film. He is also the first KFC Filipino Colonel. 
The 2011 South Holland District Council election took place on 5 May 2011 to elect members of the South Holland District Council in England. It was held on the same day as other local elections. 
The University of Rizal System (URS) is a system of colleges located in the Rizal province, Philippines. It operates multiple campuses, with the main campus being in Tanay, Rizal. 
It is committed to produce graduates in agriculture, engineering, science and technology, culture and arts, teacher and business education through instruction, research, extension and production services in Region IV. 
The university  has expanded from its Main campus in Tanay to offer programs to students in the campuses: Angono, Antipolo, Binangonan, Cainta, Cardona, Morong, Pililla, Rodriguez, Tanay, and Taytay. 
The Rizal Polytechnic College (formerly Rizal Technological and Polytechnic Institute or RTPI) was established as a provincial high school in 1944. It is located in the heart of the town of Morong. By virtue of Batas Pambansa Bilang 469, the school was converted into a tertiary institution and on March 1, 1995, Republic Act Number 7933 converted RTPI into a state college known as Rizal Polytechnic College (RPC). The College has an extension campus in Cainta which was opened in 1999. 
With the passage of Republic Act Number 9157 on June 2001 which lapsed into law on August 11, 2001, the University of Rizal System (URS) was established by integrating the Rizal State College, Rizal Polytechnic College and Rizal Technological University - Antipolo Annex. 
The Board of Regents is the highest decision-making body of the University of Rizal System. It is composed of 12 members. 
Skennar next purchased the Stanthorpe to Warwick service operated by Grimley's Coaches; the termini were the Stanthorpe Shell Garage and the Grand Hotel in Grafton Street, Warwick. The Warwick terminus moved in 1952 to the Shell Garage, and the service was later extended at its western end to Tenterfield. 
During the 1960s, Skennar based himself at Warwick, on the same property still used as a bus depot by Crisps Coaches. It was here that he started toying with conversion of front-engined coach chassis to rear-engined setups. One of these conversions utilised the lengthened chassis of a former fire engine, subsequently bodied (in timber) by Watt Brothers Coach builders in Brisbane. 
The Skennars Brisbane depot moved several times over the years. From North Quay, operations moved to Upper Roma Street, then to Barry Parade in Fortitude Valley (with a workshop in Doggett Street), and finally to the Brisbane Transit Centre. 
In 1989 the Skennars business began to be broken up. The Brisbane to Sydney service was sold to Lindsay's of Coffs Harbour, Brisbane to Gold Coast to Coachtrans,  Brisbane to the Sunshine Coast to Sunshine Coast Coaches and Gold Coast to Warwick to Pat's Coaches, Warwick. In 1990 the Brisbane to Roma via Toowoomba services of Pacific West were purchased. 
In 1992 the remaining services were sold; Brisbane to Moree and Toowoomba to Tenterfield both to Crisp Coaches, Warwick and Brisbane to Toowoomba, Roma and Charleville to McCafferty's Coaches. 
Skennars operated a fleet primarily of Denning and GBW bodied International coaches. Fleet livery was blue with yellow signwriting. 
Walter Walfred Johnson was born in Pueblo, Colorado on April 16, 1904.  He married Neva Morrow in 1922.  The couple had two children, Winnifred and Walfred.  Johnson developed real estate and insurance businesses in Pueblo. 
In 1940, Johnson was elected to the Colorado State Senate.  In 1948, he was elected Lieutenant Governor of Colorado.  In April 1950, Colorado Governor William Lee Knous resigned to become a federal district judge in Denver.  Johnson succeeded Knous as governor and completed the remaining nine months of Knous' term.  Johnson ran unsuccessfully against Republican Dan Thornton for a full gubernatorial term in 1950. 
In 1970, Johnson retired to Tempe, Arizona. He died there after a brief illness on March 23, 1987, 24 days short of his 83rd birthday, and is buried at Pueblo. 
Han Jong-in (born August 9, 1978) is a North Korean figure skater. He represented unified Korea at the 2006 Winter Olympics, where he had the honor of bearing the special Unification Flag alongside South Korean speed skater, Lee Bo-ra. 
The Karajan Academy is a music academy in Berlin, Germany, associated with the Berlin Philharmonic, that trains young orchestral musicians. 
In May 2017, at a meeting of the orchestra, it was agreed that the Academy would be renamed after Herbert von Karajan. 
Diadelia ochreovittata is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Breuning in 1970. 
Sergio Berger (born 1 January 1983 in Schiers) is a Swiss snowboarder. He placed 25th in the men's halfpipe event at the 2010 Winter Olympics. 
This biographical article related to snowboarding in Switzerland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Tropanisopodus tachira is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Monne and Monne in 2007. 
Jennifer Crittenden (born August 29, 1969) is an American screenwriter and producer. She started her writing career on the animated television series The Simpsons, and has since written for several other television sitcoms including Everybody Loves Raymond, Seinfeld and Veep. Her work has earned her several Emmy Award nominations. 
Crittenden was born on August 29, 1969. She was educated at The Thacher School in Ojai, California. She graduated from Wesleyan University in 1992. 
Crittenden joined the writing staff of Seinfeld for the final two seasons. She wrote the following episodes: 
Hallehurst is a historic mansion in Pulaski, Tennessee, U.S.. It was built in 1878 for Newton Harris White, a politician. It has been listed on the National Register of Historic Places since September 6, 2006. 
This article about a property in Giles County, Tennessee on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Chata Kalikapur is a census town within the jurisdiction of the Maheshtala police station in the Thakurpukur Maheshtala CD block in the Alipore Sadar subdivision of the South 24 Parganas district in the Indian state of West Bengal. 
Alipore Sadar subdivision is the most urbanized part of the South 24 Parganas district. 59.85% of the population lives in the urban areas and 40.15% lives in the rural areas. In the northern portion of the subdivision (shown in the map alongside) there are 21 census towns. The entire district is situated in the Ganges Delta and the subdivision, on the east bank of the Hooghly River, is an alluvial stretch, with industrial development. 
Note: The map alongside presents some of the notable locations in the subdivision. All places marked in the map are linked in the larger full screen map. 
Rameswarpur, Chata Kalikapur, Ganye Gangadharpur and Asuti  form a cluster of census towns on the southern side of Maheshtala, as per the map of the Thakurpukur Maheshtala CD block on page 153 of the District Census Handbook 2011 for the South 24 Parganas. 
According to the 2011 Census of India, Chata Kalikapur had a total population of 24,985, of which 12,709 (51%) were males and 12,276 (49%) were females. There were 3,318 persons in the age range of 0 to 6 years. The total number of literate persons was 16,715 (77.15% of the population over 6 years). 
According to the 2001 Census of India, Chata Kalikapur had a population of 20,087. Males constitute 51% of the population and females 49%. It has an average literacy rate of 57%, lower than the national average of 59.5%; with male literacy of 63% and female literacy of 52%. 15% of the population is under 6 years of age. 
The following municipalities and census towns in the South 24 Parganas district were part of the Kolkata Urban Agglomeration in the 2011 census: Maheshtala (M), Joka (CT), Balarampur (CT), Chata Kalikapur (CT), Budge Budge (M), Nischintapur (CT), Uttar Raypur (CT), Pujali (M) and Rajpur Sonarpur (M). 
Chatta Subid Ali Institute is a coeducational institution. It is affiliated with the West Bengal Board of Secondary Education. 
Sarsuna Block Primary Health Centre, with 15 beds, at Sarsuna, is the major government medical facility in the Thakurpukur Maheshtala CD block. 
The journal is abstracted and indexed in BIOSIS Previews, Chemical Abstracts, Excerpta Medica, Institute of Scientific & Technical Information of China, Chinese Science Citation Database, Scopus, and the Science Citation Index Expanded.  According to the Journal Citation Reports, the journal has a 2017 impact factor of 2.234. 
See tips for writing articles about academic journals. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
See tips for writing articles about academic journals. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
In 1964, Mayor Allen announced that an unidentified team had given him a verbal commitment to move to Atlanta, provided a stadium was in place by 1966. Soon afterward, the prospective team was revealed to be the Milwaukee Braves, who announced in October that they intended to move to Atlanta for the 1965 season. However, court battles kept the Braves in Milwaukee for one last season. 
In 1966, both the National League's transplanted Braves and the National Football League's Atlanta Falcons, an expansion team, began to use the facilities. In 1967, the Atlanta Chiefs of the National Professional Soccer League (re-formed as the North American Soccer League in 1968) began the first of five seasons played at the stadium. The venue hosted the second match of the NASL Final 1968 and two matches of the NASL Final 1971. 
Following the Olympics and the 1996 World Series, Fulton County commissioner, Marvin S. Arrington Sr., wanted to preserve the stadium as the home of a future Major League Soccer franchise and share the parking facilities between it and Turner Field but he was unable to push it through. 
Between 1996 and 1997, the inside of the stadium was demolished. The stadium was imploded on August 2, 1997; the remains were later removed and demolished. A parking lot, built for Turner Field now stands on the site, with an outline of the old stadium built in. The monument that marked the landing point of Hank Aaron's historic 715th home run stands in the same place it did when the stadium was on the site. 
Fulton County Stadium was designed by a joint-venture team of FABRAP (Finch Alexander Barnes Rothschild & Paschal) and Heery, Inc. 
Hickory Grove is a historic home located near Romney, Hampshire County, West Virginia. It was built in 1849, and is a three-story, red brick dwelling. It sits on a stone foundation and has a hipped, standing-seam metal roof with four large brick chimneys. The front facade features a Greek Revival style trabeated entrance. The north section was built in 1892, and replaced an earlier log structure. 
This article about a property in Hampshire County, West Virginia on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This Kentucky road or road transport-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Teliapsocus conterminus is a species of shaggy psocid in the family Dasydemellidae. It is found in North America. 
Hero is a 2015 Japanese mystery comedy-drama film directed by Masayuki Suzuki (ja) and based on the Japanese television drama series of the same name. It was released on July 18, 2015. 
A simple hit and run turns out to be anything but when prosecutor Kohei Kuryu realises the victim was a witness in a case against the yakuza. 
"I'm Gonna Love Her for Both of Us" is a single by Meat Loaf released in 1981. It is from the album Dead Ringer. 
Francisco Javier Galdeano (born 7 December 1949) is a Spanish racing cyclist. He rode in the 1971 Tour de France. 
This biographical article related to a Spanish cycling person born in the 1940s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Luanda Agreement is a 2002 ceasefire and normalization of relations between the government of Uganda and the Democratic Republic of the Congo (DRC). It sought to end ongoing conflict and had far-reaching implications for regional peace. The Luanda Agreement became a baseline for peace accords in Africa and is viewed favorably by outside entities, such as the United Nations and the European Union. 
The agreement was signed in 2002 between the governments of Uganda and the DRC. It established a ceasefire and normalized relations between the two countries. Prior to this agreement, the two countries experienced prolonged periods of armed conflict. While this agreement sought to rebuild regional stability, it is questionable as to whether lasting peace/reconstruction followed. 
The conflict in the Congo has been called the "center of Africa's world war". While DRC gained independence in the 1960s, it was accompanied by civil war. The initial conflict was brief, but a longer and bloodier struggle followed. In 1997, the First Congo War began, followed by the Second Congo War in 1998. Several other African countries became involved. 
The relationship between Uganda and the DRC was plagued by violence for decades. Uganda has been plundering the DRC of valuable minerals since the 1990s. The relationship is complicated by the ADF, a rebel group that attacked Western Uganda from the early 1990s well into the 2000s. Uganda President Yoweri Museveni blamed the DRC and the UN for the group's continued existence. 
The Luanda Agreement is a bilateral agreement that directly alters the terms of the Lusaka Agreement. However, both agreements call for the explicit consent of the DRC to allow Ugandan troops on their land. This then led to multiple disputes within the ICJ between Uganda and the DRC. In 1999, the DRC filed three claims asserting that Uganda violated international laws: 
(1) governing non-use of force, peaceful settlement of disputes, respect of sovereignty, and non-intervention  (2) rules of occupation, respect for sovereignty over natural resources, right to self-determination of peoples, and the principles of non-interference in domestic matters, and (3) violated international legal obligations to respect human rights, including the obligation to distinguish between civilian and military objectives during armed conflict"
Uganda filed three counter claims: (1) the DRC used force against Uganda, (2) the DRC allowed attacks on Ugandan diplomatic premises and personnel in Kinshasa in violation of the law of diplomatic protection and (3) the DRC violated the 1999 Lusaka Agreement. 
The court ruled that Uganda had violated DRC's territorial integrity and that Uganda was an occupying power, but granted Uganda's argument that the DRC had violated Ugandan diplomatic protection. 
The European Union issued a statement applauding the Luanda Agreement as a mechanism to aid peace efforts. However, the EU also recognized that the continued fighting among the Congolese people as a reason for Uganda to continue to protect people through its presence. 
This biographical article related to a Turkish association football midfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 2018, Giannopoulos signed with AEK Athens of the Greek Basket League. He parted ways with the team on June 21, 2020. 
With Greece's junior national teams, Giannopoulos played at the 2005 FIBA Europe Under-16 Championship and the 2006 FIBA Europe Under-18 Championship. He won the silver medal at the 2007 FIBA Europe Under-18 Championship. He also played at the 2008 FIBA Europe Under-20 Championship, and won the gold medal at the 2009 FIBA Europe Under-20 Championship. 
Giannopoulos became a member of the senior men's Greek national basketball team in 2017. He played at the 2019 FIBA World Cup qualification. 
Note: Only games in the primary domestic competitions are included. Therefore, games in cup or European competitions are left out. 
Marsh was born in England and graduated from the London School of Economics in 1928. After graduation, he studied wages and housing and conducted research for Sir William Beveridge. 
Canadians In and Out of Work was one of the first significant works to analyse class in Canada and remained the most comprehensive study of the subject until John Porter's release of The Vertical Mosaic. The work was not well received by the business community. Marsh and the Social Science Research Project proved to be an irritant to the university and funders and funding was not renewed when the grant ran out in 1940. 
He left the Advisory Committee to become welfare adviser to the United Nations Relief and Rehabilitation Administration from 1944-46. 
Marsh was hired by the University of British Columbia's School of Social Work in 1947. In 1959, he was named Director of Research. Marsh joined the Faculty of Education in 1964 as a professor of Educational Sociology. He retired in 1972 and was named Professor Emeritus the same year. 
The Washington Opera House is a 2 1/2 story structure near the western end of the main downtown shopping district of Maysville, Kentucky.  The sides and rear of the theater are of red brick while the facade is of buff brick trimmed with red brick, stone, and cast iron.    
The tradition of theater in Mason County dates back to at least 1797 according to the Washington, Kentucky newspaper, The Mirror.  The performance at the "Court House" is the first record of a stage performance west of the Alleghenies to disclose play titles, performance dates and prices.   By 1817, there was a theater in Limestone (Maysville) at the corner of 2nd Street and Fish Street (now Wall Street). 
A disastrous fire destroyed a significant amount of property on West Second Street in April 1850 including the Presbyterian Church, then known as the Old Blue Church.  The church congregation decided to rebuild on Third Street, leaving the Second Street lot vacant.  In 1851, two fire companies were formed to prevent a repeat of the town fire and an elegant theater, "The Opera House", was built on the site of the Old Blue Church. 
In 1898, fire struck again and "The Opera House" was destroyed.  Perhaps from remorse, the Washington Fire Company, organized at the time the theater was built - nearly five decades before, decided to rebuild it at a cost of $24,000 and the new structure was thereafter known as the "Washington Opera House". 
A number of famous artists and actors performed here including Marguerite Clark, Tom Mix, John L. Sullivan, and John Philip Sousa and his band.   The Washington Opera continues as a theater and is currently home to the Maysville Players. 
Sir Thomas Hilbourne Frank (6 December 1931 - 29 March 2020) was a politician from Antigua and Barbuda. He was a political leader of the Barbuda People's Movement, which favours greater independence of Barbuda from Antigua and supports the United Progressive Party.  
This article about an Antigua and Barbudan politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Gastrolobium bilobum, commonly known as heart-leaved poison,  is a bushy shrub which is endemic to south west Western Australia. 
The species is a member of the family Fabaceae and is probably the most toxic species in the genus Gastrolobium, containing high levels of monofluoroacetic acid. 
The species grows to a height of up to 4 metres. Between late winter and early summer (August to December in Australia) it produces yellow-orange pea-flowers with a central yellow area encircled by a band of red, and a maroon keel. The leaves are cuneiform, obovate or elliptic. 
The species was first formally described by botanist Robert Brown and published in Hortus Kew in 1811. 
In the nineteenth century as a plant within the group of gastrolobium, it was written about in the local press. This continued into the early and mid twentieth century, due to the affects on agriculture. 
The vernacular name has been common for over 140 years, and is inappropriate due to the leaves being wedge shaped, not heart shaped as the name suggests. 
It occurs in the south-west of the state, usually on granite-based soils on peaks and outcrops as well as along rivers. It is associated with karri and marri forest as well as mallee and heathland. 
The Governor of La Pampa Province (Spanish: Gobernador de la Provincia de La Pampa) is a citizen of La Pampa Province, in Argentina, holding the office of governor for the corresponding term. The governor is elected alongside a vice-governor. Currently the governor of La Pampa is Sergio Ziliotto. 
Herring launched into his career in 2006 when he captured the Late Model Championship at South Boston Speedway with nine wins in 17 starts. In the next year, he collected his second Late Model championship at Southern National Raceway Park with seven wins and 21 top-five finishes in 29 races. 
In 2012, he made his NASCAR Camping World Truck Series debut for Kyle Busch Motorsports at Iowa Speedway in September, and finished seventh. 
For the 2013 season, Herring ran six races for JGR, posting two sixth-place finishes and had only one DNF due to a crash at Bristol Motor Speedway. After not running any races in 2014, he qualified as a stand-in for JGR twice in 2015, but did not run a single race. At the same time, Herring became a Toyota Racing Development test driver, often testing experimental setups for NASCAR Cup Series cars. 
On December 6, 2020, it was revealed that Herring would become the new spotter for Joe Gibbs Racing's No. 19 of Martin Truex Jr. in the Cup Series starting in 2021. He replaced Clayton Hughes, who left JGR for Front Row Motorsports to be the spotter for the No. 34 of Michael McDowell after the retirement of McDowell's previous spotter Rocky Ryan. 
On 30 July 2013 Lotfi Ben Jeddou told the local Mosaique radio station "I have a great wish to resign, and I am ready to resign. A salvation government or national unity government must be formed to get Tunisia out of this bottleneck." 
 A group of armed gunmen attacked the house of Ben Jeddou in western region of Kasserine in May 2014. Ben Jeddou was not at his house during the attack. Four policemen were killed and one injured. A court sentenced 31 suspects involved in the deaths to a death sentence in October 2016.
The 2022 California State Assembly election will be held on Tuesday, November 8, 2022, with the primary election being held on June 7, 2022. All of the seats of the California State Assembly will be elected as part of the 2022 California elections. 
Born in Toronto, Welsman pursued courses in violin and piano performance at the Toronto College of Music before going to Leipzig in 1894 for further studies. His teachers included Richard Hofmann, Martin Krause, and Gustav Schreck. After completing his education, he returned to Canada in the spring of 1897. Some sources claim he studied the piano privately with Arnold Mendelssohn in Germany 
In 1906 Welsman formed the Toronto Conservatory Symphony Orchestra. Two years later the orchestra was reorganized to become a professional orchestra entitled the Toronto Symphony Orchestra, which Welsman conducted up through 1918. In the summers of 1923 and 1924 he worked in Huntsville, Ontario as the conductor for the Anglo-Canadian Leather Company Band. 
Frank Welsman, Canadian Conductor, by Mary E. Hughes, Trafford Publishing, 2006 and Kindle Edition (revised) 2020 https://imaginingviolet.blogspot.com 
IONISx  is a for-profit, educational technology company that offers massive open online courses (MOOCs) as well as online degrees and certifications. IONISx works with universities and other organizations to make some of their courses available online. IONISx was established in 2013, in collaboration with ISG Business School, ISEFAC Bachelor, EPITA, Epitech, IPSA, E-Artsup, Sup'Internet and ETNA. 
Lacrosse in Spain has its origins in the 2000s in Madrid. It is currently governed by the Spanish Lacrosse Association. 
Each team would play home and away against the other two teams of its conference and will play also one more game home and other away against two different teams, totalling six games played per team. The inter-conference games were decided taking the distance of the teams as main criteria. 
The seven first qualified teams overall will qualify directly to the quarterfinals while the two bottom teams will play themselves a previous game to qualify. 
In multiprocessor computer systems, software lockout is the issue of performance degradation due to the idle wait times spent by the CPUs in kernel-level critical sections. Software lockout is the major cause of scalability degradation in a multiprocessor system, posing a limit on the maximum useful number of processors. To mitigate the phenomenon, the kernel must be designed to have its critical sections as short as possible, therefore decomposing each data structure in smaller substructures. 
In most multiprocessor systems, each processor schedules and controls itself, therefore there's no "supervisor" processor, and kernel data structures are globally shared; sections of code that access those shared data structures are critical sections. This design choice is made to improve scaling, reliability and modularity. Examples of such kernel data structure are ready list and communication channels. 
A "conflict" happens when more than one processor is trying to access the same resource (a memory portion) at the same time. To prevent critical races and inconsistency, only one processor (CPU) at a given time is allowed to access a particular data structure (a memory portion), while other CPUs trying to access at the same time are locked-out, waiting in idle status. 
In a multiprocessor system, most of the conflicts are kernel-level conflicts, due to the access to the kernel level critical sections, and thus the idle wait periods generated by them have a major impact in performance degradation. This idle wait time increases the average number of idle processors and thus decreases scalability and relative efficiency. 
Taking as parameters the average time interval spent by a processor in kernel level critical sections (L, for time in locked state), and the average time interval spent by a processor in tasks outside critical sections (E), the ratio L/E is crucial in evaluating software lockout. 
Typical values for L/E range from 0.01 to 0.1. In a system with a L/E ratio of 0.05, for instance, if there are 15 CPUs, it is expected that on average 1 CPU will always be idle; with 21 CPUs, 2.8 will be idle; with 40 CPUs, 19 will be idle; with 41 CPUs, 20 will be idle. Therefore, adding more than 40 CPUs to that system would be useless. In general, for each L/E value, there's a threshold for the maximum number of useful CPUs. 
To reduce the performance degradation of software lockout to reasonable levels (L/E between 0.05 and 0.1), the kernel and/or the operating system must be designed accordingly. Conceptually, the most valid solution is to decompose each kernel data structure in smaller independent substructures, having each a shorter elaboration time. This allows more than one CPU to access the original data structure. 
Many uniprocessor systems with hierarchical protection domains have been estimated to spend up to 50% of the time performing "supervisor mode" operations. If such systems were adapted for multiprocessing by setting a lock at any access to "supervisor state", L/E would easily be greater than 1, resulting in a system with the same throughput as the uniprocessor despite the number of CPUs. 
Land of Liberty is a 1939 American documentary film written by Jesse L. Lasky Jr. and Jeanie Macpherson. The film tells the history of the United States from pre-Revolution through 1939. The film was released on June 15, 1939, by Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer. 
While much of their recorded material consisted of covers of popular songs by acts such as the Beatles, not to mention other Latin American rock bands, such as Los Brincos, they began to write their own material as their sound evolved. Some of their original material would be characterized by ghostly downcast melodies and arrangements. Their albums are sought after among collectors, particularly their final LP, which is their most experimental. 
Takeoff! is a collection of short stories, including parodies and pastiches of other science-fiction authors. 
Steve Brown reviewed Takeoff! for Thrust, calling Garrett "one of the more under-rated writers in the field" of science fiction, noting that the collection features "Most of the odd little bits of his humorous writing". 
Spider Robinson reviewed Takeoff! for Analog Science Fiction/Science Fact, and commented that "If you are a newcomer to or a very casual reader of SF, you may miss a lot of the jokes [...] but the well-read fan will find a lot of laughs here. and of course the Freas illos are, as always, a joy." 
Tom Easton reviewed Takeoff! for Analog Science Fiction/Science Fact, and commented that "a collection of parodies, pastiches, reviews in verse, and groaners guaranteed to rouse at least a grin. Don't miss it." 
Baird Searles reviewed Takeoff! for Isaac Asimov's Science Fiction Magazine, and commented that "I'm happy to say that while there are moments when Garrett descends to that level between freshman and junior, a lot of it is amusing even if I didn't do a lot of thigh slapping and gut busting." 
Tom Staicar reviewed Takeoff! for Amazing Stories, and commented that "Takeoff! is a delightful collection which people who know Randall Garrett have awaited for years." 
Lynn Bryant reviewed Takeoff! in Space Gamer/Fantasy Gamer No. 83. Bryant commented that "They provide an entertaining chance to enjoy some more works of a writer whose works are beginning to gain well deserved recognition as classics." 
Dialog is an online information service owned by ProQuest, who acquired it from Thomson Reuters in mid-2008. 
Before joining the government, he was an executive with a Davao City-based agricultural products manufacturer and a local cooperative which he co-founded. He also established a school in Davao and was a columnist for local newspaper SunStar Davao. 
Abella finished high school at Ateneo de Davao University in 1964. In 1968, he graduated with a BA in pre-medicine from the same university. In 1980, he pursued his postgraduate studies at Silliman University where he graduated with a master's degree in divinity in 1984. He also earned a master's degree in social development from the Asian Institute of Management in 2005. 
Abella started his career in advertising. He served as Creative Director for Adformatix in Makati between 1975 and 1977. He then moved back to Davao to work as a columnist for Davao City newspaper San Pedro Express and as a professor at his alma mater Ateneo de Davao. 
Abella returned to secular life in 2002 and pursued a career in agri-business. He served as Chief Executive Officer of AZ Agri-Products and as Chief Operating Officer of F&P Agri-Inputs. He also established his own businesses: One Accord Credit Cooperative and Southpoint School in Davao City. 
On October 27, 2017, Abella was replaced by Harry Roque, a representative of Kabayan party-list group as presidential spokesperson, citing personal reasons. Abella was subsequently appointed as Undersecretary for Strategic Communications and Research at the Department of Foreign Affairs on October 27, 2017 until he resigned on October 8, 2021 to file his candidacy for president of the Philippines. 
As chief of ordnance during the American Civil War, Gorgas managed to keep the Confederate armies well supplied with weapons and ammunition, despite the Union blockade, and even though the South had hardly any munitions industry before the war began. In this effort he also worked closely with the Fraser, Trenholm shipping company that brought in shipments of ordnance by means of blockade runners. He kept diaries during the Civil War which are now a popular subject of study for historians. 
In the procurement of arms Gorgas also corresponded with Charles Prioleau, who headed Trenholm's Liverpool office, arranging for the shipping of arms and other supplies to the Confederacy. Most of the arms sent to the Confederacy departed from Liverpool. During the summer of 1861, Gorgas stockpiled supplies and prepared his first load of cargo while the Trenholm company procured a suitable ship for the voyage. A 1,200 ton iron-hulled steamer, the Bermuda, was chosen to make the voyage. 
After the war, Gorgas purchased an interest in the Brierfield Furnace in Bibb County, near Ashby in Alabama, which had helped supply the Confederate Naval Ordnance Works in Selma. The other directors appointed him to manage the iron works and he moved his family to the furnace site.  Due to high operating and management costs he was forced to lease the iron works after just a couple of years in operation. 
In 1870 Gorgas accepted a position as the 2nd vice chancellor of the newly established University of the South in Sewanee, Tennessee. His position there was marked by discord with the board of trustees and the stress of keeping the university financially afloat. A student residence hall built as part of the Sewanee Military Academy was later renamed "Gorgas Hall" in his honor. 
Gorgas died at the age of 65 in Tuscaloosa in 1883, and was buried at Evergreen Cemetery. His widow Amelia served as the university's librarian for 23 years after his death and the main university library is named the Amelia Gayle Gorgas Library in her honor. Their oldest son, William Crawford Gorgas (born 1854) served as  Surgeon General of the U.S. Army and is credited with implementing preventive measures against yellow fever and malaria that allowed for the completion of the Panama Canal. 
Peggy is a 1950 American comedy film directed by Frederick De Cordova, and starring Diana Lynn, Charles Coburn, and Charlotte Greenwood. 
Uzzal is involved in the Film Producers and Distributors Association and a member of the Film Censor Board. 
He is very active in politics. He was senior vice president of Jatiyatabadi Samajik Sangskritik Sangstha (Jasas), cultural wing of Bangladesh Nationalist Party (BNP).  
These are the results of the women's floor competition, one of six events for female competitors in artistic gymnastics at the 1988 Summer Olympics in Seoul.  The qualification and final rounds took place on September 19, 21 and 25th at the Olympic Gymnastics Hall. 
Eighty-four gymnasts competed in the floor event during the compulsory and optional rounds on September 19 and 21.  The eight highest scoring gymnasts advanced to the final on September 25.  Each country was limited to two competitors in the final.  Half of the points earned by each gymnast during both the compulsory and optional rounds carried over to the final.  This constitutes the "prelim" score. 
Mathew D. "Mat" Staver is an American lawyer and former pastor of Seventh-day Adventist and Protestant churches who became a Southern Baptist. He is a former dean of Liberty University's law school. In 1989, he founded the nonprofit organization Liberty Counsel, where he serves as chairman. ProPublica called him "a leading Christian legal theorist." 
Staver received a B.A. in theology from Southern Missionary College, an M.A. in religion from Andrews University, and a Juris Doctor from the University of Kentucky. During college he began a process which led him to later leave the SDA church and eventually attend a Southern Baptist church. 
He was the pastor of three churches in Kentucky that belonged to an evangelical Protestant denomination known as the Christian Church. 
In 1990, he criticized the ACLU's efforts that led to removal of a Latin cross from the top of the St. Cloud, Florida water tower, stating that Liberty Counsel would be "a Christian antithesis to the ACLU." 
A Young Earth creationist who believes that intelligent design should be taught in public schools, Staver also denies Darwinian evolution. 
He has argued before the Supreme Court of the United States twice, before most of the federal courts of appeals, and has testified before the United States Congress. 
Staver served as the dean of the Liberty University School of Law from 2006 to 2014. Staver has been a guest speaker at the Values Voter Summit in Washington, D.C. 
In 2011 he was added to the Commission on Accountability and Policy for Religious Organizations, which was established by Iowa Senator Chuck Grassley. 
In October 2015, Staver claimed that 100,000 people gathered in Peru to support Kim Davis in support of her refusal to issue marriage licenses. The event was shown to have happened more than a year earlier and was unrelated to Davis. Liberty Counsel issued a press release, stating that Staver had relied on a member of the Congress of the Republic of Peru for the information on the rally. 
In late 2018 he voiced his opposition to LGTBQ rights by requesting that references to gender identity and sexual orientation be removed from a senate bill that would make lynching a federal crime. Staver "pushed back against mainstream media coverage, and explained that while no one can or should oppose a bill banning lynching, there were provisions in it that served an ill purpose." 
In 2020, he represented a Tampa, Florida pastor who was arrested for holding church services when the county had mandated churches to close. Charges against the pastor were later dropped. 
Princeps pastorum (Latin for 'Prince of the shepherds') is the title of an encyclical letter promulgated by Pope John XXIII on 28 November 1959. It is derived from a biblical passage: I Peter 5:4. In its English translation the letter opens with the phrase On the day when "the Prince of the shepherds" entrusted to Us His lambs and sheep.  It refers to Jesus Christ. 
It celebrates the success of Roman Catholic missions to promote the faith, encourages the fostering of native clergy in the countries to which the missions extended and emphasises the importance of lay Catholics as representatives of the church in non-Catholic countries. The encyclical points out that while social welfare initiatives are to be supported, the primary task of missions should be to spread Catholic doctrine. 
Compathia is the fifth album release from experimental indie rock band, Six Organs of Admittance, released in 2003. 
Personnel: Ben Chasny - acoustic & electric guitars, vocals, percussion & bells, electronics, tapes Ethan Miller - sitar on "Somewhere Between", electric destruction guitar on "Only the Sun Knows". Ryan Hildebrand - stones, grass & bell on "Gone Astray" 
This article about a 2000s experimental rock album is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Lifan X70 is a compact SUV produced by the Chinese manufacturer Lifan Motors, division of Lifan Group. 
The vehicle was presented at the Lifan Global Dealers' Conference on 21 September 2017 in Lijiang and has been sold since spring 2018, first in Russia. Later, the vehicle was offered in China and South America. 
This article about a modern automobile produced after 1975 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The body of the snail is milk-white, all but the gills and liver, which are light brown. The tentacles are cylindrical, rather short. The eyes are proportionally large, placed on the tentacles, close to their outer bases. The foot nis arrow and thin. 
Basalia serius is a moth of the family Erebidae first described by Michael Fibiger in 2008. It is known from Tamil Nadu in south-central India. 
The Balamorghab ambush occurred on 27 November 2008, when vehicles carrying Afghan security forces were attacked by Taliban insurgents led by Ghulam Dastagir. The ambush took place near Balamorghab in Badghis Province, in northwestern Afghanistan, and resulted in heavy casualties for the government forces. It was described as "one of the most humiliating attacks the Afghan security forces had ever suffered". 
Badghis province had seen a marked increase in insurgent activity, In 2007 the number of Taliban militants was estimated at 200, by 2008 it had grown to over 2,000. In March 2008, an Afghan intelligence operation succeeded in arresting Mawlawi Ghulam Dastagir, one of the principal Taliban commanders in Badghis. In September a delegation of elders from Badghis met Afghan President Hamid Karzai, and persuaded him to release Dastagir, claiming that "he wasn't an enemy of the state". 
Fred Perry and Dorothy Round were the defending champions, but Perry was ineligible to compete after turning professional at the end of the 1936 season. Round partnered with Don Butler but lost in the third round to Don Budge and Alice Marble. 
Alta Vista High School is a public charter high school in Tucson, Arizona. It is operated by The Leona Group. 
The most interesting fact about Zerezindo is his Germanic name and the implication of his headstone that he was a Catholic at a time when most Visigoths were Arian Christians. This is especially noteworthy considering his high rank; a Catholic Goth had managed to ascend to the uppermost military rank in an Arian noble society. 
Phalonidia parvana is a species of moth of the family Tortricidae. It is found in Japan on the island of Honshu. 
In computer science, abstract interpretation is a theory of sound approximation of the semantics of computer programs, based on monotonic functions over ordered sets, especially lattices. It can be viewed as a partial execution of a computer program which gains information about its semantics (e.g., control-flow, data-flow) without performing all the calculations. 
Its main concrete application is formal static analysis, the automatic extraction of information about the possible executions of computer programs; such analyses have two main usages: 
Abstract interpretation was formalized by the French computer scientist working couple Patrick Cousot and Radhia Cousot in the late 1970s. 
Consider the people in a conference room.  Assume a unique identifier for each person in the room, like a social security number in the United States.  To prove that someone is not present, all one needs to do is see if their social security number is not on the list. Since two different people cannot have the same number, it is possible to prove or disprove the presence of a participant simply by looking up his or her number. 
Sometimes a loss of precision is necessary to make the semantics decidable (see Rice's theorem and the halting problem). In general, there is a compromise to be made between the precision of the analysis and its decidability (computability), or tractability (computational cost). 
In practice the abstractions that are defined are tailored to both the program properties one desires to analyze, and to the set of target programs. The first large scale automated analysis of computer programs with abstract interpretation was motivated by the accident that resulted in the destruction of the first flight of the Ariane 5 rocket in 1996. 
The problem is evident: we did not keep track of the equality relationship between x and y; actually, this domain of intervals does not take into account any relationships between variables, and is thus a non-relational domain. Non-relational domains tend to be fast and simple to implement, but imprecise. 
When one chooses an abstract domain, one typically has to strike a balance between keeping fine-grained relationships, and high computational costs. 
The 2006 Danish National Badminton Championships were held in Vejen, from February 3  to February 5, 2006. 
Gandicheruvu or Gandi Cheruvu is a village in Rangareddy district in Telangana, India. It falls under Hayathnagar mandal. 
This article about a location in Ranga Reddy district, Telangana is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Three different groups of researchers, led by Giancarlo Cusumano, Joshua Haislip, and Nobuyuki Kawai respectively, carried out the investigation of the phenomenon and presented their results in Nature magazine on March 9, 2006.  
The Blohm & Voss P.208 was a design project for a tailless swept-wing propeller-powered interceptor designed by the German company Blohm & Voss towards the end of the Second World War. 
The P208.01 was developed in 1944, when in Germany there were already jet aircraft in production. The decision to fit a conventional engine to the aircraft was made because the existing jet engines had not yet reached the desired performance. Thus the project went ahead in such a way that the design could be re-fitted with a jet engine when the technical difficulties were solved, eventually leading to the Blohm & Voss P 212 jet aircraft project. 
The engine was fitted at the back of the cockpit with the propeller pushing the plane forward. The tail unit was incorporated into the swept wings, which provided an improved performance. In order to withstand the added stress the wings had steel reinforcements. 
A variant powered by an Argus As 413 unit giving a maximum of 4.000 PS (made of two Junkers Jumo 213 engines). The plane had a larger radiator and the wingtip booms had small vertical fins at the trailing edge. 
Dystrichothorax vittipennis is a species of ground beetle in the subfamily Psydrinae. It was described by Sloane in 1911. 
La France, number 102, was a locomotive of the Great Western Railway.  It was bought by G.J. Churchward to evaluate French locomotive practice, and particularly the effect of compounding. 
The EP was recorded at Skylab Recording Studios in Gainesville, Florida. The material on the EP was written in vocalist Jeremy McKinnon's garage, and was recorded all in one day live-in-studio. Samples of tracks titled "Camo", "Second Guess" and "Heartless" were posted online around the same time. 
The band self-released the EP, it was limited to 2,000 copies. The EP helped the band get signed to Indianola. In 2012, guitarist Neil Westfall said the band had no plans to re-release the EP. A music video for "Breathe Hope in Me" was directed by Daniel Harrison and filmed during the band's high school days. The video was leaked onto the Internet in April 2011. 
Grandin Village traces its origin to 1906 with the establishment of the Virginia Heights Land Corporation. This land corporation was responsible for the initial development of Virginia Heights after the opening of the Memorial Bridge, which serves as a connection into downtown Roanoke. 
Development at the T intersection at Grandin and Memorial began with the construction of the original Virginia Heights Elementary School in 1907. By 1911, the Roanoke Street Railway Company completed a streetcar line between Raleigh Court/Virginia Heights and downtown. With this streetcar extension, development of the commercial establishments of the present-day Grandin Village accelerated. 
In 1919, Virginia Heights was annexed into the city of Roanoke. The majority of the structures in the district were constructed between 1917 and 1945. During this period, the Grandin Village emerged as a major retail and service area serving the residents of southwest Roanoke. 
On July 31, 1948, streetcar service to the area was abandoned, which also marked the end of streetcar transit altogether in the city of Roanoke. Much of the post-1950s development within the district was designed to accommodate the automobile. After a period of decline in the mid-20th century, the district has since rebounded and has become a local retail and dining destination. 
Acalolepta fruhstorferi is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Stephan von Breuning in 1960. It is known from Sumatra. 
 Derek Austin Graham (born 3 September 1941) is a retired distance athlete from Northern Ireland. The first Northern Irish runner to break 4 minutes for the mile, he was ranked number 1 in the U.K. and Ireland over 2 miles/3000 m, 3 miles/5000 m and cross country at various periods in the 1960s. 
This biographical article relating to athletics in Northern Ireland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A Kosovar Albanian, Bajrami was born in Dumosh, SFR Yugoslavia (now Kosovo) in 1975. He relocated to Switzerland where he began practicing Seido karate and eventually kickboxing. 
On March 3, 2001, he lost another decision to Ernesto Hoost at 2 Hot 2 Handle: Simply the Best in Amsterdam, Netherlands. Then, in another rematch, he bested Samir Benazzouz by decision for the second time at the K-1 World Grand Prix 2001 in Nagoya on July 20, 2001. 
Despite racking up thirteen victories in K-1, Bajrami's run in the promotion came to an end in 2004. On September 18, 2004, he lost to Vitali Akhramenko via decision after five rounds of fighting in Basel, Switzerland. He then went 1-1 in 2005 with a split decision win over James Phillips and a loss at the hands of Karl Glyschinsky. 
2007 was another mixed year for him. He knocked out Alessandro D'Ambrossio in the first round at the Night of Fighters 4 event in Bern, Switzerland but then dropped a decision to giant Russian Alexander Ustinov in Moscow a month later. 
In what is generally considered to be a biased hometown decision, Bajrami defended his ISKA strap against Indian challenger Singh Jaideep in Lucerne on July 2, 2011. He was floored by Jaideep in round one but received a long count and was able to recover. 
Bajrami made the third defence of his ISKA world title by knocking out Takenori Onda with a high kick in the fourth round of their contest in Lucerne on June 2, 2012. Since 2015 he is in a relationship with Rudina Magjistari. 
Veitch was the younger son of James Veitch and grandson of John Veitch. He spent some time farming on the Cape of Good Hope in South Africa, before returning to England to join the family nursery company in 1856. 
In 1863, following the death of his father, he took over the Exeter branch of the family nursery business, which became Robert Veitch & Sons. Robert moved the nursery to New North Road in 1864, and opened another seed warehouse in the High Street. He was joined in 1880 by his son, Peter, who had travelled extensively in his youth. Peter brought his experiences of French and German nurseries into the company as well as an element of flair from the Chelsea, London nursery. 
Robert landscaped many Exeter parks as well as the Higher Cemetery. He was laid to rest during 1885 in the old St Leonards cemetery, which is an annexe of the Higher Cemetery. 
Ashford is a town in Cattaraugus County, New York, United States. The population was 2,132 at the 2010 census. The town is on the county's northern border. 
The town was first settled circa 1816, and was founded in 1824 from Ellicottville by Henry Frank Sr., a Revolutionary War veteran from Philadelphia. 
The north boundary is formed by Cattaraugus Creek, and the north town line is the border of Erie County. 
New York State Route 240, a north-south route in the eastern part of the town, links the town to the suburbs of Buffalo, as does U.S. Route 219 in the western part of the town. 
The northern border is formed with the towns of Concord and Sardinia in Erie County, and the south border is created by the towns of Ellicottville and East Otto. To the west is the town of East Otto. The east boundary is formed by the towns of Machias and Yorkshire. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 2,223 people, 857 households, and 634 families residing in the town.  The population density was 43.3 people per square mile (16.7/km2).  There were 1,023 housing units at an average density of 19.9 per square mile (7.7/km2).  The racial makeup of the town was 96.99% White, 1.53% African American, 0.54% Native American, 0.18% Asian, 0.09% from other races, and 0.67% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 0.76% of the population. 
There were 857 households, out of which 33.6% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 61.7% were married couples living together, 8.3% had a female householder with no husband present, and 26.0% were non-families. 21.5% of all households were made up of individuals, and 7.6% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.59 and the average family size was 3.03. 
In the town, the population was spread out, with 26.8% under the age of 18, 5.7% from 18 to 24, 28.7% from 25 to 44, 27.1% from 45 to 64, and 11.7% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 38 years. For every 100 females, there were 98.3 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 98.5 males. 
The median income for a household in the town was $41,313, and the median income for a family was $44,509. Males had a median income of $32,392 versus $21,500 for females. The per capita income for the town was $19,136. About 4.0% of families and 6.3% of the population were below the poverty line, including 5.9% of those under age 18 and 6.5% of those age 65 or over. 
  The 2012 Rotherham Metropolitan Borough Council election took place on 3 May 2012 to elect members of Rotherham Metropolitan Borough Council in South Yorkshire, England. This was on the same day as other 2012 United Kingdom local elections. The Labour Party gained five seats, and one was gained by an Independent. The British National Party lost both of the seats it was defending, and the Conservative Party only held one of its five seats, in Sitwell ward. 
Edward H. Bastian (born June 6, 1957) is an American business executive. He is the ninth and current chief executive officer of Delta Air Lines, serving in this role since May 2, 2016. 
Bastian grew up in Poughkeepsie, New York, the oldest of nine children. His father was a dentist and his mother was a dental assistant. The couple operated a dental practice from within the family home. He graduated from Our Lady of Lourdes High School in Poughkeepsie in 1975. 
In 1979, Bastian received a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting from St. Bonaventure University in Cattaraugus County, New York. 
Bastian began his career as an auditor in New York City at Price Waterhouse, now PricewaterhouseCoopers (PWC). During a 1981 annual review, he uncovered a $50 million fraud scheme involving ad powerhouse J. Walter Thompson. This prompted a U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission investigation, leaving many PWC executives with marred careers. A few years later, Bastian was named partner at age 31. 
Bastian left Delta in 2005 to become senior vice president and chief financial officer at Acuity Brands. Six months later, at the request of then-Delta CEO Gerald Grinstein, he returned to the airline to serve as chief financial officer. In 2007, he was appointed to president, a position he held until assuming the role of CEO in May 2016. His transition to CEO was the first time Delta had chosen a chief executive officer from within the company since 1987. 
Bastian has been divorced twice. A father of 4, he splits his time between Atlanta, where Delta Air Lines is headquartered, and Florida. 
The 29th Corps was activated in February 1949 from 11th Column, Huadong Field Army. The Corps was composed of the 85th Division, 86th Division and 87th Division. 
In November 1969 the Army Corps HQ moved to Putian. The Army Corps Headquarters also took command of 92nd Army Division, 2nd Independent Division of Fujian Provincial Military District, 2nd and 3rd Garrison Division of Fuzhou Military Region. 
In April 1975, 2nd Independent Division of Fujian Provincial Military District detached from the Army Corps. By then the army corps was composed of: 
Angela Hanka (May 13, 1891 - February 1, 1963) was an Austrian figure skater who competed in ladies' singles. 
A list of the films produced in the Cinema of Mexico ordered by year of release in the 1920s. For an alphabetical list of articles on Mexican films see Category:Mexican films. 
Lee Ji-eun (born May 16, 1993), professionally known as  IU, is a South Korean singer, songwriter and actress. 
Sepioloidea pacifica, also known as the Pacific bobtail squid, is a species of cuttlefish native to the southern Pacific Ocean; it occurs off New Zealand in the west and in the Nazca and Sala y Gomez submarine ridges in the east. 
The type specimen was collected off New Zealand and is deposited at the National Museum of New Zealand in Wellington. 
The Imperial Sword (Latin: Gladius Imperatoria, German: Reichsschwert) is one of the four most important parts of the Imperial Regalia (Reichskleinodien) of the Holy Roman Empire. During a coronation, it was given to the emperor along with the Imperial Crown (Reichskrone), Imperial Sceptre (Reichszepter), and the Imperial Orb (Reichsapfel). All four parts of the Imperial Regalia are displayed in the Imperial Treasury at the Hofburg Palace in Vienna, Austria. 
The Imperial Sword was made for Emperor Otto IV in the twelfth century, possibly for his coronation as King of the Romans in 1198. Its predecessor, the sword of Otto III, is also preserved, in the Essen Abbey treasury. 
The first known explicit mention of the sword dates to 1315, in a letter of a lady-in-waiting of Elisabeth of Aragon, wife to Frederick III. It may also be referenced in an inventory of 1246, which mentions merely zwey swert mit zweyn scheiden, gezieret mit edelem gesteyne (two swords, with two scabbards ornamented with gems). The first pictorial representations of the sword date to the fifteenth century, but the first detailed depiction only to the seventeenth century. 
The scabbard of the sword is adorned with 14 gold plates engraved with depictions of monarchs. These pictures date to the eleventh century, and are thus about a century older than the sword itself. The figures have been identified as depicting the consecutive German monarchs from Charlemagne to Henry III, who was crowned in 1046. 
Shadow: Dead Riot is a 2006 horror film directed by Derek Wan and starring Tony Todd and Carla Greene. 
Led by Chris Chambliss, his 1969 team won the Pacific-8 Conference Championship and played in the College World Series, first appearance for the university.  
Islam is the second largest religion in Norway after Christianity. As of 2020, the number of Muslims living in Norway was 182,826 (3.4% of the population of 5,402,171). The majority of Muslims in Norway are Sunni, with a significant Shia minority. Fifty-five percent of Muslims in the country live in the counties of Oslo and Akershus. The vast majority have an immigrant background, with Norwegians of Pakistani descent being the most visible and well-known group.  
In June 2018, the parliament of Norway passed a bill banning clothing covering the face at educational institutions as well as daycare centres, which included face-covering Islamic veils. The prohibition applies to pupils and staff alike. 
Studies conducted for a TV channel in 2006 found that 18% of Norwegian Muslims reported visiting the mosque once a week. A similar study in 2007 reported that 36% of Muslim youth visit the mosque less than once a month. 
According to a 2007/2008 survey of students at upper secondary schools in Oslo, 25% of Muslims pray regularly while 12% attend religious services weekly. 
According to a survey in 2016, about 98% of Norwegian Muslims believed that Human rights are important, about 94% believed Democracy is important, and 95% believed that Muslims should live in peace with Non-Muslims. In the same poll a minority of 47% said that it is not important to follow Sharia law. 
According to a survey of 4,000 Muslims in 2017, only two percent agreed to statements such as "Islam allows the use of violence" and that the September 11 attacks on America in 2001 can be justified. 
About 70 people have left Norway to become foreign fighters in Syria or Iraq, while around 20 have returned. 
In May 2019 it was announced that those who had joined the Islamic State who only had residence permits in Norway would have their permits annulled to prevent them from returning to Norway. And in September 2019, 15 foreigners in Norway had their residence permits revoked. 
In 2004, it was estimated that 500-1000 Norwegians have converted to Islam. Many Norwegians, both men, and women have converted in order to marry Muslims. 
Muslims in Norway are a very fragmented group, coming from many different backgrounds. Kari Vogt estimated in 2000 that there were about 500 Norwegian converts to Islam. The rest are mostly first or second-generation immigrants from a number of countries. The largest immigrant communities from Muslim countries in Norway are from Pakistan, Iraq and Somalia: 
An unknown, but presumably high, proportion of these immigrant populations is Muslim. In other words, the largest group of Norwegian Muslims originate in Pakistan, but no single nationality constitute as much as a quarter of the total population.[citation needed] 
The Turkish, Pakistani and Iranian communities are quite established in Norway. 55% of Iranians have lived in Norway for more than 10 years. The Iraqis are a more recent group, with 80% of the Iraqi community having arrived in the past 10 years.[citation needed] 
In the 1990s there was a wave of asylum seekers from the Balkans, mostly Bosniaks. In recent years most immigrants arrive as part of family reunification.[citation needed] 
According to the Verdens Gang newspaper, during the 1990s around 500 people converted to Islam in Norway and this number increased to around 3,000 in 2019. 
Mosques have been important, not just as places of prayer, but also as a meeting place for members of minority groupings. Several mosques also do different forms of social work, e.g. organising the transport of deceased members back to their countries of origin for burial. The mosques are mostly situated in regular city blocks, and are not easily visible features of the cities. 
While less than 10% of Muslims were members of an Islamic organization in 1980, this figure rose to 50% in 1990, and increased to 55% by 2007. 
Various Ahmadi mosques include Noor Mosque, opened in Oslo August 1, 1980 and Baitun Nasr Mosque in Furuset, Oslo. There are about 1,700 Ahmadi Muslims in Norway. The majority of the Ahmadi Muslims in Norway are from Pakistan. 
In June 2017, Thee Yezen al-Obaide revealed plans to create a mosque in Oslo named Masjid al-Nisa (The Women's Mosque). In an interview, al-Obaide described the mosque as "a feminist mosque where women have as much space as men. Both men and women should be able to lead prayers, and all genders should be able to pray in the same room."  The mosque will also be open to LGBT people and has been compared to the Ibn Ruschd-Goethe mosque in Germany and the Mariam Mosque in Denmark. 
Since 2007, the Islamic Cultural Centre stages an Eid Mela annually that attracts around 5,000 visitors. The event involves food, concerts, and other activities. 
In a 2014 poll conducted by the Norwegian Directorate of Integration and Diversity, a majority of Norwegians held negative views over the wearing of the hijab outside the home. Stronger disagreement (75%) was expressed towards the hijab being part of the police uniform in Norway. Concerning the full-cover niqab, 86% expressed a negative or very negative opinion. 
In June 2018, the parliament of Norway passed a bill banning clothing covering the face at educational institutions as well as daycare centres, which included face-covering Islamic veils. The prohibition applies to pupils and staff alike. 
In April 2019, telecom company Telia received bomb threats after featuring a Muslim woman taking off her hijab in a commercial. Although the police considered unlikely that the threat would be carried out, delivering such threats is still a crime in Norway. 
Following the 2015 Copenhagen shootings, Norwegian Muslims were among those taking part in a vigil on 21 February 2015 evening, in which they joined hands with Norwegian Jews and others to form a symbolic protective ring around the Norwegian capital's main synagogue. 
In 2010, the Norwegian Broadcasting Corporation after one year of research, revealed that antisemitism was common among Norwegian Muslims. Such antisemitism was condemned by Muslim organizations in Norway. 
A 2005 study analyzed the portrayal of Muslims in the 8 largest newspapers of Norway. It found that Muslims were generally portrayed negatively, even more negatively than other immigrants, and only 3% of the articles portrayed Muslims positively. 
In a 2014 poll conducted by the Norwegian Directorate of Integration and Diversity, 5 of 10 Norwegians considered Islamic values to be either completely or partially incompatible with Norwegian society. 
According to a 2020 poll conducted by the Norwegian Directorate of Integration and Diversity, a slight majority of people of Norway (52%) consider Islam incompatible with fundamental values of the Norwegian society. This result had been similar for the last 15 years. By comparison, only a minority (22%) considered Buddhism incompatible with Norwegian values. 
The Second is the second studio album by Canadian-American rock band Steppenwolf, released in October 1968 on ABC Dunhill Records. The album contains one of Steppenwolf's most famous songs, "Magic Carpet Ride". The background of the original ABC LP cover was a shiny "foil", in contrast to later (MCA Records) LP issues and the modern CD sleeve. 
Featuring a style that incorporates psychedelic music and hard rock, the release has received critical acclaim both when it came out as well as in later years. For example, AllMusic critic Bruce Eder stated that, though "highly derivative" of their first album, The Second had "very hard and edgy" tracks with the band "in excellent form". 
This is a working list to collect migrant organizations of migrants from Austria-Hungary to the United States of America. These migrants belonged both to the first and second wave of 19th century US migration and were from diverse ethnic backgrounds. 
Although ethnicity was not the sole category by which Austro-Hungarian migrants associated, it is a practical guideline to order them because mostly language was and is an important criterion. In many cases though, ethnic definitions (like in the South Slav case) were not clear. Some organizations merged and split on ethnic grounds, others co-operated across ethnic definitions. Therefore, some organizations are listed under several categories. 
Usually, Austro-Hungarian migrant organizations in the US were mutual benefit societies and working class oriented, and many turned eventually into life insurance companies. Some were rather political, others initiated by interested parties in the so-called homeland (Austria-Hungary or one of its regions). 
Slovenian Mutual Benefit Association (Slovenska dobrodelna zveza, American Mutual Life Association (AMLA) since 1966). Founded 1910. 
Tackhead Sound Crash is a remix album by the industrial hip-hop group Tackhead. It was released on November 13, 2006 on Beat and On-U Sound Records. 
 All tracks are written by Keith LeBlanc, Skip McDonald, Adrian Sherwood and Doug Wimbish, except where noted.
The Public Radio Exchange (PRX) is a non-profit web-based platform for digital distribution, review, and licensing of radio programs. The organization is the largest on-demand catalogue of public radio programs available for broadcast and internet use. 
The PRX site and its services launched in September 2003 after a two-year planning, research, and development phase supported by the Corporation for Public Broadcasting, the National Endowment for the Arts, and the Ford Foundation. PRX received additional support from the NTIA Technology Opportunities Program, the MacArthur Foundation, the Open Society Institute, the Surdna Foundation, and Google Grants. PRX offices are located in Cambridge, MA. 
On April 9, 2008, The MacArthur Foundation selected PRX as one of its 2008 recipients of the MacArthur Award for Creative and Effective Institutions. In late November of that year, PRX soft-launched PRX 3.0. The launch included their Remix Radio project which provides a sampling of the content available for licensing on the site. 
In 2010 PRX launched two iPhone apps: the This American Life app on February 1 and the WBUR Boston app on July 7. That same year, PRX won a Peabody Award for The Moth Radio Hour. PRX was also announced as a winner of the 2010 Knight News Challenge for Story Exchange, a crowdfunding journalism project, on June 16. On September 8, 2010, PRX announced $2.7M in new funding from the Corporation for Public Broadcasting, the MacArthur Foundation, and the Ford Foundation. 
On December 8, 2011, PRX announced $2.5M in funding from Knight Foundation to create the Public Media Accelerator. In May 2014, PRX received a Peabody Award for the Reveal show "The VA's Opiate Overload". 
On August 15, 2018, PRX and Public Radio International announced they would merge, though both networks would maintain separate identities and programming. The PRI brand was retired the following year. 
Formerly known as Public Radio Remix. As of 2011, two radio stations, KPBZ in Spokane, Washington and WREM in Canton, New York, air a full-time schedule of programming from PRX, branded as Public Radio Remix. Both stations are owned by the same organizations as their markets' primary National Public Radio affiliates. PRX Remix also airs on Sirius XM Channel 123. 
Several other public radio stations air some, but not all, Public Radio Exchange programming in their schedules. 
On May 22, 2007, PRX had 12,167 available radio pieces, 28,149 members, including 445 radio stations, and 2,782 individual producers. 
This biographical article relating to an American archery figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Fish species found in lake Blouin are: brown bullhead, yellow walleye, black walleye, Northern pike, Burbot, White sucker, Longnose Sucker, and Yellow perch. 
Kogawara Station is served by the Aoimori Railway Line, and is 53.5 kilometers from the terminus of the line at Aomori Station. It is 670.8 kilometers from Tokyo Station. 
Kogawara Station has two opposed side platforms serving two tracks connected by a footbridge. There is no station building, but only a small shelter on one of the platforms, and the platforms are not numbered. The station is unattended. 
This Aomori Prefecture railroad station-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Modern-day Route 150 was once a Missouri supplemental route. The current designation was assigned in its entirety by 1949. 
Route 150 underwent an improvement project, including reconstruction of the I-49/US 71 interchange and widening. The three-phase project began in the summer of 2010 and was completed in 2012. 
In this program celebrities are filmed in various parts of Japan in cafeteria-like settings. The hosts display catchy video images, and when they come across something interesting, they press a pause button to stop the video and add some comic lines. Often celebrities who are unfamiliar with specific travel venues are selected and the resulting gaffes are part of the hilarity. Celebrities who have appeared on this program include Masanari Ueda, Mami Terakawa, Keita Sugiura, and Sakaue Ryo. 
In 2018 Chidori was selected to host this show and by October 2018 the program achieved a target audience viewership of 7% of those watching television in Japan. Moreover, in April 2019 the broadcast time was extended to 60 minutes. However, by 2021 it has been reported that its viewership dropped to somewhere between 3.2% and 5.8%. 
Two DVDs featuring their program highlights have been marketed so far and this show continues to be aired on over twenty TV stations throughout Japan.  
Substantive naturalism is a form of formative epistemology that emphasizes how all epistemic facts are natural facts.  Natural facts can be based on two main ideas.  The first is that all natural facts include all facts that science would verify.  The second is to provide a list of examples that consists of natural items.  This will help in deducing what else can be included. 
One consistent aspect of Akao's thought was his respect for the power of the United States, having opposed the Pacific War from a nationalist perspective on the grounds that the United States was too powerful for Japan and therefore that fighting a war with it was foolhardy. 
In the 1942 election, Akao ran for the Tokyo 6th district seat in the National Diet as a "non-recommended candidate," meaning he was not recommended by the single national political party, the Imperial Rule Assistance Association (IRAA). Nevertheless, Akao won the election and received the second most votes in Tokyo and the fourth most votes of anyone in Japan. Like other independent candidates, Akao dutifully joined the IRAA upon winning his seat. 
In 1989, following the death of Emperor Hirohito, Akao ran for a seat in the House of Councilors for a 15th time, at the age of 90. Akao died of heart failure on February 6, 1990, at the age of 91, in Toshima, Tokyo. 
This biographical article relating to a basketball figure from the People's Republic of China is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Earl "the Pearl" Strickland (born June 8, 1961 in Roseboro, North Carolina) is an American professional pool player who is considered one of the best nine-ball players of all time. He has won over 100 championship titles and has a high run of 408 in Straight pool. In 2006 he was inducted into the Billiard Congress of America's Hall of Fame. He is also known as one of the sport's most controversial players for his outspoken views and his sometimes volatile behavior at tournaments. 
Strickland started playing pool at the age of 8.[citation needed] After intensive practice, he entered his first professional tournament aged 16. Strickland rose to national prominence in 1983 with a victory in Lake Tahoe. This was followed in 1984 by the Caesars Palace Pro Billiard Classic in Las Vegas. 
According to sources, Strickland played "like a polished gem." He was beginning to be a dominant force on the tournament trail and recognized as a future world champion. He had the "skill, endurance, patience, temperament, and tenacity of which champions are made." Because of his dominance, Strickland was named The National Billiard News Player of the Year in 1984. He won the 1988 World Open championship, after a momentous final confrontation between himself and Mike 'Captain Hook' Sigel". 
A 45-second shot clock was used to monitor each shot because the tournament was being recorded for broadcast for a seven-week series. At the conclusion, Sigel commented he could feel the pressure of being clocked. Strickland, on the other hand, said they "could have made it only 30 seconds between shots, and it wouldn't have mattered." 
At the 2004 Derby City Classic, a week-long multiple tournament event held every January in Louisville, Kentucky, Strickland was one of six competitors in a nine-ball ring game. Veteran Grady Mathews, when introducing Strickland, says that when Strickland is in the house, "A hush ensues, and there is an expectation" due to his brilliant shot-making capabilities and unpredictable behaviour. 
Strickland is a multiple winner of the prestigious Player of the Year Award, and his career highlights include five wins at the U.S. Open Nine-ball Championships (tied with Shane Van Boening for the most all time), and the WPA World Nine-ball Championships. Strickland is the only WPA World Nine-ball Champion ever to win the event in consecutive years. He was also an ever-present player for the American team in the annual Mosconi Cup tournament, from its inauguration in 1994, up until 2009. 
Asked about the possibility of banning Strickland from future events for his behaviour, Matchroom Sports founder Barry Hearn stated he would always want Strickland to participate in the firm's events, since his presence "guarantees drama and unpredictability." Strickland, though, would be dropped by the United States team for the 2009 Mosconi Cup and was not selected again for the next three years before returning to the team in 2013. 
The site aggregated content from various online educational and instructional resources (such as courses, articles, and videos), which could be filtered by subjects and topics, course cost, and other factors. 
Curiosity was originally founded by Gabe Vehovsky, Discovery Communications chief of digital strategy and digital businesses.  
In November 2014, Curiosity was spun out of Discovery with Vehovsky as CEO; Discovery remains a content partner for the service.  
At the same time, the company raised $6 million in a Series A funding round from a number of Chicago-based investors, including Pritzker Group Venture Capital, Origin Ventures, Chicago Ventures, and Corazon Capital. 
In 2020, the website was discontinued. It was initially integrated with the Discovery website, wherein all traffic to the Curiosity http would be redirected to Discover.  
Later in September 2020 it is found that the redirection has stopped as well, and the link to the Curiosity website does not work anymore. 
The Sadang  is a river of Sulawesi in South Sulawesi province, Indonesia. It is one of the major rivers which flow into the Strait of Macassar. 
Her work was acquired by Artbank in 2018 in a collection which detailes Mununggurr's life and her familial ties. At the top, her maternal grandfather Mungurrawuy Yunupingu is pictured, and further down her uncles Galarrwuy and Mandawuy are shown. Her mother, Gulumbu Yunupingu, is represented through the stars which show what she had painted on the ceiling of the Musee du Quai Branly in Paris, France. Lastly, Dhambit herself is represented as a monolithic rock on Elcho Island. 
 The Nokia 3220 is a GSM, Series 40 mobile phone from Nokia. The Nokia 3220 was introduced on 31 May 2004 as a "fun" device with LED lights and Xpress-on covers. It was the first entry-level phone that offered full access to the Internet, with an XHTML browser and POP3/IMAP email client. The tri-band camera phone uses GPRS and EDGE for its internet connections. 
In November 2004, Nokia introduced a Near Field Communication (NFC) shell for the 3220, making the 3220 Nokia's first ever model with NFC technology, provided the add-on is included. 
Supported formats: Image: JPG, JPEG, BMP, WBMP, PNG, GIF. Sound: MID, AMR, MP3 (only firmware v5.10 or higher). Java: JAR, JAD. Theme: NTH 
Hsu was born on 22 March 1994  in Hpakant, Kachin State, Myanmar to parents Tun Aung Kyi, a jade trader and his wife Yin Yin Thaung, who was of Kachin-Rakhine descent. She is the third daughter of five siblings. Hsu moved to Yangon from Hpakant with her family in 2007. She attended high school at Basic Education High School No. 1 Dagon. She was currently studies in Botany at the distance education of Dagon University. 
Hsu officially entered the film industry in 2015 with the film Sate Naung Kyoe (Mind Bond) playing the leading role with Lu Min. She then starred in film Ywar Ko Pyan Kae Arr Luu (Come back to the village, Arr Luu) where she played the main role with Nyi Htut Khaung and Thun Sett in 2016. The film was a domestic hit, and led to increased recognition for Hsu Eaint San. 
In 2016, she took on her first big-screen main role in the comedy-drama film Facebook Ywar (Facebook Village), alongside Lu Min, Khine Thin Kyi and Yu Thandar Tin. The film was popular in Myanmar and which premiered in Myanmar cinemas in 2016 stayed in local theaters for a record five weeks. 
In 2016, she portrayed her role as Mal Mal Pwa in the popular big-screen film Nga Academy (My Academy) which premiered in Myanmar cinemas on 10 March 2017. In 2017, she starred in the big-screen film Facebook Ywar 2 (Facebook Village 2), will be showing in Myanmar cinemas on next year. 
On 5 April 2021, warrants for her arrest were issued under section 505 (a) of the penal code by the State Administration Council for speaking out against the military coup. Along with several other celebrities, she was charged with calling for participation in the Civil Disobedience Movement (CDM) and damaging the state's ability to govern, with supporting the Committee Representing Pyidaungsu Hluttaw, and with generally inciting the people to disturb the peace and stability of the nation. 
Goeldi's antbird (Percnostola goeldii) is a species of bird in the family Thamnophilidae. It is found in Bolivia, Brazil and Peru. Its natural habitat is subtropical or tropical moist lowland forests. 
Goeldi's antbird was previously placed in the genus Myrmeciza. A molecular phylogenetic study published in 2013 found that Myrmeciza, as then defined, was polyphyletic. In the resulting rearrangement to create monophyletic genera this species was moved to the resurrected genus Akletos which had been introduced by the Polish ornithologist Andrzej Dunajewski in 1948. 
Bhimavaram Bullodu is a 2014 Telugu romance film written by Kavi Kalidas and directed by Udayasankar. Produced by Daggubati Suresh Babu on his home banner Suresh Productions, the film features Sunil and Ester Noronha in the lead roles. Anoop Rubens composed music for this film while Santosh Rai Pathaje and Marthand K. Venkatesh handled the cinematography and editing departments respectively. 
The story follows a young brain tumor patient who wants to wipe off the rowdyism around himself and the troubles he faces once he starts the work and discovers that he is not a cancer patient. The film released worldwide on 21 February 2014. Upon release, the film received mostly negative reviews from critics, but had good box office collections. 
Cereal is an independent biannual travel and style magazine based in Bath, United Kingdom. Each issue focuses on a select few destinations, with stories and interviews on design, art and style. 
Cereal was founded by Rosa Park (editor-in-chief) and Rich Stapleton (creative director) in 2012 as a quarterly publication. With Volume 9 (2015), Cereal changed to a biannual release schedule, publishing in March and September every year. 
Alongside the magazine, Cereal publishes regular digital stories on their website, update online city guides, publish physical city guide books, and publish a number of other books. 
Volume 10 introduced a series of essays, short stories and poems as a pull-out literary supplement called Weekend, which published writing  around a theme, such as Ego or Taste. Since Volume 13, the essays and poems were incorporated into the magazine itself. 
Volume 15 (Spring Summer 2018) introduced the format of presenting a unifying theme for the issue as a whole, which, in this instance, was sustainability. This angle ran through many of the interviews, as well as the choice of features and essays. For Volume 16, the theme was collecting. Designers were interviewed on their personal collections, and essays discussed collecting stones, memories and stories. 
There have been numerous alterations to the design and layout of the magazine volume to volume, the most conspicuous perhaps being the adoption of the grey front cover from Volume 13 onward. The most recent change was a full redesign of the layout of the magazine by Vancouver-based Studio Faculty for Volume 16. 
Cereal creates and publishes regular stories specifically for their online site, with exclusive commissioned writing and photography. 
In 2016 Cereal launched their City Guide series, with physical guide book editions for London, Paris, New York, Los Angeles, and Copenhagen. Each guide features a selection of places to stay, eat, drink and visit within the city, illustrated by original photography. 
In October 2018, new editions for London, Paris and New York were published by Abrams with an expanded 200 page format and new design. An extended selection of recommendations, essays, interviews with notable locals of the city, a weekend itinerary, and souvenir suggestions were also included. 
In 2017 Cereal released their first hardcover, coffee table book titled These Islands: A Portrait of the British Isles. The book focuses on a selection of destinations around the British Isles, exploring each place with photo essays, poems, stories, and writing. Rather than recommending to readers where to stay or what to do, it describes the places in visual, poetic language, as an ode to the destination. 
These Islands was edited by Rosa Park, and was written by Richard Aslan, Charlie Lee-Potter, and Lucy Brook. Photography was created by Rich Stapleton, Finn Beales, Jonathan Gregson, and Kate Holstein, while the layout was designed by Studio Faculty. The book was created over a process of three years. 
Palm is a visual study of Palm Springs, California by Rich Stapleton. It was captured on 35mm black and white film, and focuses on the desert landscapes, mid century modernist architecture, and palm trees of the area as its subject. It was published in September 2017. 
A Balloon Away is an illustrated children's novel by Rosa Park, which follows a girl called Sona, a silver balloon, and her new friend Grey the bear, as they travel to destinations around the world. It was published in January 2017. 
Cereal is renowned for its vision, its signature calm and pared-back aesthetic, and its beautiful layout, photography and writing. Stack Magazines described it as "arguably the world's most beautiful travel magazine" 
CBC Radio 3 Sessions, Vol. 1 is a compilation album released in 2004, compiling tracks from live sessions performed on CBC Radio 3. 
While popularized by Mrs. Clinton in her 1998 TODAY Show interview, the phrase did not originate with her.  In 1991 the Detroit News wrote: 
Thatcher-era Britain produced its own crop of paranoid left-liberal films. ... All posited a vast right-wing conspiracy propping up a reactionary government ruthlessly crushing all efforts at opposition under the guise of parliamentary democracy. [Emphasis added.]
An Associated Press story in 1995 also used the phrase, relating an official's guess that the Oklahoma City bombing was the work of "maybe five malcontents" and not "some kind of vast right-wing conspiracy." 
On January 27, 1998, Hillary Clinton appeared on NBC's The Today Show, in an interview with Matt Lauer. 
Former President Clinton, when asked on Meet the Press (September 27, 2009) whether the vast right wing conspiracy was involved in the attacks on President Barack Obama, said "Oh, you bet.  Sure it is.  It's not as strong as it was, because America's changed demographically, but it's as virulent as it was ... when they accused me of murder and all that stuff." 
In some of his books, Krugman has used the phrase ("Yes, Virginia, there is a vast right-wing conspiracy") to refer not to a conservative Republican-leaning campaign against Clinton (or Obama), but more generally to "an interlocking set of institutions ultimately answering to a small group of people that collectively reward loyalists and punish dissenters" in the service of "movement conservatism."  The network of institutions provide 
obedient politicians with the resources to win elections, safe havens in the event of defeat, and lucrative career opportunities after they leave office. They guarantee favorable news coverage to politicians who follow the party line, while harassing and undermining opponents. And they support a large standing army of party intellectuals and activists.
In Krugman's view, the network of foundations that fund conservative scholarship, the national and regional think tanks and advocacy groups, talk radio media outlets, and conservative law firms through which they pushed their agenda to move the Republican Party to the right, far surpass in funding, size, inter-connectedness or influence anything the Democratic Party or the American political left/liberal movement have at their disposal. 
In April 2014, the Clinton Presidential Center published the original 1995 memo on the conspiracy. The memo's author, Chris Lehane, wrote, "As for the premise of the memo, I absolutely stand by it. Not only was it right about the right wing then, it is more accurate than ever today." 
In 2016, Hillary Clinton said she still believed in the "vast right-wing conspiracy", adding that it was "even better funded" 18 years later. However, she opined, "At this point it's probably not correct to say it's a conspiracy because it's out in the open." 
In October, after footage of Donald Trump boasting about his sexual exploits emerged and multiple women accused Trump of sexual misconduct, Melania Trump defended her husband and said, "This was all organized from the opposition." Writers for the Los Angeles Times and The Washington Post noted that Melania's response "echoed" Hillary's original use of the phrase "vast right-wing conspiracy." 
Eugene Volokh's blog The Volokh Conspiracy is said to have derived its name from as a reference to the "Vast right-wing conspiracy" statement. 
The climate in the suburb is mainly Continental climate, because there are significant annual temperature variations. It has hot summers and cold winters. 
This article about a Southeastern Anatolia Region of Turkey location is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 29th Women's Boat Race took place on 14 March 1974. The contest was between crews from the Universities of Oxford and Cambridge and held on The Isis. 
This biography of a member of a European royal house is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The ice sheet covered up to 2.5 million square kilometres at the Last Glacial Maximum and probably more than that in some previous periods, when it may have extended into the northeast extremity of Oregon and the Salmon River Mountains in Idaho. It is probable, though, that its northern margin also migrated south due to the influence of starvation caused by very low levels of precipitation. 
Unlike the Laurentide Ice Sheet, which is believed to have taken as much as eleven thousand years to fully melt, it is believed the Cordilleran ice sheet, except for areas that remain glaciated today, melted very quickly, probably in four thousand years or less. This rapid melting caused such floods as the overflow of Lake Missoula and shaped the topography of the extremely fertile Inland Empire of Eastern Washington. 
Because of the weight of the ice, the mainland of northwest North America was so depressed that sea levels at the Last Glacial Maximum were over a hundred metres higher than they are today (measured by the level of bedrock). 
These effects are important because they have been used to explain how migrants to North America from Beringia were able to travel southward during the deglaciation process due purely to the exposure of submerged land between the mainland and numerous continental islands. They are also important for understanding the direction evolution has taken since the ice retreated. 
Even today, the region is notable for its rapid changes in sea level, which, however, have little effect on most of the coast due to the numerous fjords. 
 FUNET was created in 1984 to link Finnish universities. The .fi top-level domain was registered 1986. FICIX was created in 1993 to interconnect Finnish IP networks and commercial sales of Internet connection began. 
Since July 2010, Finland has become the first country in the world to make Internet access a legal right. 
Broadband Internet access in Finland was launched commercially in 2000 in the form of ADSL. As of 2008, typical ADSL connections in Finland are 1024/512 kbit/s or 2048/512 kbit/s. Faster speeds, such as 8/1 Mbit/s, 24/1 Mbit/s and faster are also widely available.[citation needed] 
In October 2009, Finland's Ministry of Transport and Communications committed to ensuring that every person in Finland can access the Internet at a minimum speed of one megabit per second starting July 2010. 
In the city of Oulu, Oulun Puhelin Plc (OPOY) has for a longer time offered full-rate ADSL (8/1 Mbit/s) and VDSL (10/10 Mbit/s, actually Cisco Long Reach Ethernet). 
With aggressive marketing, Saunalahti brought full-rate ADSL (8/1 Mbit/s) to the capital area and Turku on 2004-08-03. Saunalahti announced ADSL2 services (12 Mbit/s) on 2004-10-21, available in the capital area and Turku. Saunalahti also announced the first ever ADSL2+ services (24 Mbit/s) in Nordic countries on 15 November 2004, first available only in the Tampere region.[citation needed] 
Some ISPs are using a voluntary child pornography censorship list administered by the police. The list has been criticised because it has contained legal adult content, that little has been done to actually shut down the illegal websites and, as the list is secret, it can be used for any censorship. More recently, a government-sponsored report has considered establishing similar filtering in order to curb online gambling. 
Paronymus budonga is a butterfly in the family Hesperiidae. It is found in western Uganda and north-western Tanzania. The habitat consists of forests. 
 Phoenix loureiroi (commonly known as the mountain date palm, vuyavuy palm, or voyavoy palm,) is a species of flowering plant in the palm family, indigenous to southern Asia, from the Philippines, Taiwan, India, southern Bhutan, Burma, Thailand, Cambodia, Vietnam, Pakistan, and China. It occurs in deciduous and evergreen forests and in clear terrain from sea level to 1,500 m altitude. 
The fruit is a single-seeded drupe, bluish-black when ripe, produced on erect, yellow inflorescences, usually hidden within the leaf crown. The species is noted for its variability in different habitats. 
There are two varieties, based on the presence or absence of sclerotic, tannin-filled cells along the midribs and margins of leaflets: 
Fibers from P. loureiroi var. loureiroi, known locally as "vuyavuy palm" (also spelled "voyavoy"), are used to make the distinctive vakul headgear and kanayi vests of the Ivatan people in the Batanes Islands of the northern Philippines. 
Little Ireland was a slum district of the township of Manchester in Lancashire, England in the early 19th century, and also the nickname of Cleator Moor in Cumbria. It was inhabited for about 20 years from about 1827 to 1847 and was given its name from the presence of many poor Irish immigrants. It was south of Oxford Road railway station and enclosed by the railway line and the loop in the river. 
It is commemorated by a red plaque on 8 Great Marlborough Street, about half-way between New Wakefield Street and Hulme Street. 
This article about a property in Andrew County, Missouri on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Akwasi Bretuo Assensoh is a Ghanaian academic and journalist. He is an emeritus professor of African American and African Diaspora Studies at Indiana University, Bloomington, Indiana. 
Assensoh was born on 1 April 1946 at Dunkwa-On-Offin, Gold Coast to Opanin Kwabena and Abena Amoateng. He moved to the United States of America in 1978. He obtained his bachelor's degree in History and Politics from Dillard University in 1981. In 1982, he was awarded his master's degree by the New York University and his doctorate degree in 1984 by the same university. 
Assensoh begun as an assistant editor for the Daily Listener, Chronicle, and Digest in Monrovia, Liberia. In 1968, he was promoted to editor, and a year later he was made sub editor of The Pioneer, a newspaper in Kumasi, Ghana. From 1970 to 1972, Assensoh worked as a syndicated columnist for Compass News Features in Luxembourg. 
After his completing his doctoral research in 1984, Assensoh was appointed associate professor of History at Dillard University. He worked in this capacity from 1984 to 1988, and in 1986, he doubled as Director of honors programs. He became the assistant editor of King Papers Project and a visiting assistant professor of History at Stanford University in 1988. 
Assensoh married Irenita Benbow on 19 March 1981. Together, they have two children. He later married Dr. Yvette Alex-Assensoh and together, they have two sons. 
Liptena eukrinoides is a butterfly in the family Lycaenidae. It is found in Uganda (the western shores of Lake Victoria) and north-western Tanzania. The habitat consists of forests. 
USS Hydrangea (1862) was a steamer  acquired by the Union Navy during the American Civil War. She served the Navy in various ways: as a tugboat, a dispatch boat, a ship's tender, and as a gunboat in waterways of the Confederate States of America. 
Hydrangea, a wooden steam tug, was built as Hippodame in 1862 at Buffalo, New York, and purchased by the Navy at New York City, from her owner, C. TV. Copeland, 16 October 1863. She commissioned at New York Navy Yard 18 April 1864, Ens. C. W. Rogers in command. 
Reporting to Hampton Roads, Virginia, for duty with the North Atlantic Blockading Squadron, Hydrangea spent May towing monitors and acting as tender to Onondaga. She then took up station in the James River, where she acted as a tug and mail boat. 
Making two trips a day from Deep Bottom, near the front lines, to the large supply base at City Point, Virginia, she helped support the Union efforts to break the military stalemate around Richmond, Virginia. 
Hydrangea was then transferred to the South Atlantic Blockading Squadron 23 July 1864, and after repairing reported to Port Royal, South Carolina, 30 September. 
Hydrangea decommissioned at New York City 1 September 1865, and was sold 25 October to S. and J. M. Flanagan. Redocumented Norman 4 January 1866, she returned to private service and was stranded and lost off Cape May, New Jersey, 17 November 1886. 
This article incorporates text from the public domain Dictionary of American Naval Fighting Ships. The entry can be found here. 
The song "Same Shit" was released on February 15, 2015. The lead single "Good Girl" produced by Grammy Winning Producer Magnedo, was released on June 16, 2015 as a digital download on iTunes. On July 17, 2015 Obie Trice premiered a leak from The Hangover called "Dealer" featuring Young Buck & fellow Detroit rapper Tone Tone. 
Vermilion was initially settled in the early 19th century and incorporated as a village in 1837. The city took its name from the nearby Vermilion River. It developed as a fishing and small-boat harbor. In 1847, the Congress of the United States built the Vermilion Lighthouse to aid navigation on Lake Erie. 
As commerce grew in larger nearby cities, the Vermilion River proved inadequate to large commercial traffic. Later, recreational boating became very popular. During the early 20th century, the area became known as a resort community, featuring many beaches and cottages. Most structures were eventually converted to year-round use; many still are used as summer homes or vacation houses. Linwood Park in Vermilion is a good example. 
Merging with the nearby village of Vermilion-on-the-Lake in 1960, Vermilion became a city, straddling Lorain and Erie Counties. 
A local non-profit group, Friends of Harbour Town, actively promotes tourism and the historical connection to Vermilion's roots as a maritime community, using the slogan "Harbour Town 1837". 
Of the 4,183 households,  30.8% had children under 18 living with them, 56.5% were married couples living together, 11.3% had a female householder with no husband present, 4.7% had a male householder with no wife present, and 27.5% were not families; 22.9% of all households were made up of individuals, and 10.1% had someone living alone who was 65 or older. The average household size was 2.50, and the average family size was 2.91. 
The median age in the city was 43.5 years; 22.6% of residents were under 18, 7.1% were between 18 and 24, 22.6% were 25 to 44, 31% were  45 to 64, and 16.8% were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the city was 48.6% male and 51.4% female. 
As of the census of 2000, 10,927 people, 4,254 households, and 3,113 families were residing in the city.  The  racial makeup of the city was 94.8% White, 0.2% African American, 0.2% Native American, 0.3% Asian, 0.08% from other races, and 1.6% from two or more races. Hispanics of any race were 2.8% of the population. 
Of the 4,254 households,  32.4% had children under 18 living with them, 59.8% were married couples living together, 9.8% had a female householder with no husband present, and 26.8% were not families. About 22.4% of all households were made up of individuals, and 8.4% had someone living alone who was 65 or older. The average household size was 2.54, and the average family size was 2.97. 
In the city, the age distribution was 25.3% under  18, 6.9% from 18 to 24, 27.5% from 25 to 44, 27.6% from 45 to 64, and 12.6% who were 65 or older. The median age was 39 years. For every 100 females, there were 93.8 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 91.3 males. 
The median income for a household in the city was $29,926, and for a family was $57,311. Males had a median income of $41,269 versus $25,195 for females. The per capita income for the city was $23,635. About 4.1% of families and 5.4% of the population were below the poverty line, including 5.6% of those under age 18 and 6.8% of those age 65 or over. 
Over 150,000 people visit Vermilion for the Woollybear Festival; it includes the longest parade in Ohio. 
Vermilion harbor features sandy beaches, recreational boating, jet skis, canoeing, and sailboats. Shipbuilding was once the major industry there.[citation needed] 
Vermilion is home to over 12 parks and facilities, including the Vermilion River Reservation, featuring the Bacon Woods and Mill Hollow areas on each side of the Vermilion River, which runs through the reservation and directly out to Lake Erie.  Picnic shelters and trails are located in Vermilion.[citation needed] 
Lake Ridge Academy, a private grade school and high school in nearby North Ridgeville, offers daily school bus service for Vermilion students. 
The Lucy Idol Center, located on the edge of town, offers nonresidential care for disabled children and adults. Bowling Green State University (Firelands campus) and Lorain County Community College, both accredited schools offering four-year and advanced degrees, are located within a 20-minute drive of Vermilion. 
Ortharbela jurateae is a moth in the family Cossidae. It is found in Tanzania, where it has been recorded from the Uluguru Mountains. The habitat consists of lowland and submontane miombo woodlands. 
This article relating to the moth subfamily Metarbelinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This geographical article about a location in Denizli Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article about a football midfielder from Uruguay born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Different versions of the stemma codicum of the Metaphysics have been proposed since 1970, most remarkably by Dieter Harlfinger in 1979. 
This is a list of notable indie pop artists. Bands are listed by the first letter in their name (not including the words "a", "an", or "the"), and individuals are listed by last name. 
VMRDA Health Arena also known as  (Health Arena)  is an urban park in the city of Visakhapatnam. The park is located at the foot hill of the Kailasagiri with 2.km Jogging Track. the total area of the park is 20 acres and it was the first type of health park in Andhra Pradesh with the facilities of Yoga, Gym and cycle track . 
A tobacco fatwa is a fatwa (Islamic legal pronouncement) that prohibits the usage of tobacco by Muslims. All contemporary rulings condemn smoking as potentially harmful or prohibit (haram) smoking outright as a result of the severe health damage that it causes. Arab Muslims tend to prohibit smoking (despite Saudi Arabia ranking 23rd in the world for the percentage of its population that smokes) and, in South Asia, smoking tends to be considered lawful but discouraged. 
Fatwas condemning smoking have been issued in Egypt, Indonesia, Kuwait, Malaysia, Morocco (pre-colonial), Oman, Qatar, Pakistan, the Philippines, Saudi Arabia, and the UAE, among others. 
In recent years, tobacco fatwas (Islamic legal pronouncements) have been issued due to health concerns. 
In practice, at least one recent survey found that observant Muslims tend to avoid smoking. A study of young Muslim Arab-Americans found that Islamic influences were correlated with some diminished smoking. Conversely, an Egyptian study found that knowledge of an anti-smoking fatwa did not reduce smoking. Overall, the prevalence of smoking is increasing in Islamic countries. 
The prominent scholar Yusuf al Qaradawi argues that smoking is no longer an issue of dispute among Islamic scholars due to the knowledge of health risks. 
In 1996, Sheikh Ahmed Bin Hamad Al Khalili, the Grand Mufti of Oman, issued a fatwa prohibiting smoking and the sale of tobacco, comparing smoking to "sipping poison" Sheikh Al Khalili cited a verse from the Quran, "do not kill yourselves for God Almighty is most merciful to you," to justify his ruling. 
The Supreme Council of Darul Ifta of the Philippines, headed by Grand Mufti Sheikh Omar Pasigan, stated in June 2010 that smoking cigarettes is haram. 
The Grand Mufti of Saudi Arabia, Sheikh Muhammad ibn Ibrahim Aal Al-Sheikh, has ruled that "smoking is impermissible on the basis of authentic quotations, sound judgments, and the opinions of reputable physicians." The Mufti cites a sahih hadith (verifiable saying of the Prophet) saying "do not harm yourself or others." He further referenced a Quranic verse saying that the Prophet "forbids that which is unwholesome."  
In addition to issuing a fatwa against smoking, the United Arab Emirates instructed imams in all mosques to read a sermon against smoking on June 11, 1999 following Friday prayers. 
Gummel received his Diploma in physics (1952) from Philipps University in Marburg, Germany. He received his M.S. (1952) and Ph.D. (1957) degrees in theoretical semiconductor physics from Syracuse University. Gummel joined Bell Laboratories in 1956; his doctoral advisor, Melvin Lax, had moved from Syracuse University to Bell the previous year. At Bell, Gummel made important contributions to the design and simulation of the semiconductor devices used throughout modern electronics. 
In 1983, Gummel received the David Sarnoff Award "for contributions and leadership in device analysis and development of computer-aided design tools for semiconductor devices and circuits". In 1985, Gummel was elected to the United States National Academy of Engineering for "contributions and leadership in the analysis and computer-aided design of semiconductor devices and circuits.". In 1994, he was the first recipient of Phil Kaufman Award. 
This German engineer, inventor or industrial designer biographical article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bleeding canker of horse chestnut is a common canker of horse chestnut trees (Aesculus hippocastanum, also known as conker trees) that is known to be caused by infection with several different pathogens. 
Infections by the gram-negative fluorescent bacterium Pseudomonas syringae pathovar aesculi are a new phenomenon, and have caused most of the bleeding cankers on horse chestnut that are now frequently seen in Britain. 
In the past few years, the bacterial pathogen Pseudomonas syringae pv. aesculi has emerged as a new and virulent agent for this disease in Western Europe.  Specific to horse chestnut trees, this pathogen infects the bark (cambium) around the trunk and main branches.  As it spreads, it cuts off the water supply to the crown; and when it completely encircles the trunk, the tree will die. 
This particular infective agent emerged in the past few years, and has now spread rapidly to infect many trees in Western Europe. 
Initially the outbreak was attributed to Phytophthora, until DNA tests suggested that a pathovar of Pseudomonas syringae was responsible; and this hypothesis was confirmed in 2007 with tests satisfying Koch's postulates. 
The disease has risen markedly in the UK since 2003, and now approximately one half of all horse chestnuts in Great Britain are affected and showing symptoms to some degree.  The disease is spreading at an alarming rate in the Netherlands,  where one third of all horse chestnuts are affected to a greater or lesser extent. A similar upsurge is reported in Belgium and France. 
Chemical methods can be used to help the tree maintain health and avoid progress of the disease. Management strategies are currently being developed. A study performed in 2015 examined the infection on trees and found that 41 F1 progeny parent tree source had the most promising lines of viability for resistance. 
Larger scale tests of the Heat method with electric blankets of Chestnut Tree Treatment  are currently being investigated for public Chestnut Trees in the Dutch Amsterdam Region, see the map here:  
 The Horse Chestnut is considered an economically and socially important tree. It is estimated that there are 470,000 trees in Great Britain.  Many are urban, in parks and gardens.  They are desirable because they can tolerate many conditions including dry sandy soils, wet clays and chalk.  The tree is economically important because it contains aescin which can be used for its anti-inflammatory properties. Wildlife also benefit from the nuts the tree provides. 
The town holds an annual fiesta in honor of its patron saint, San Antonio de Abad (Saint Anthony the Abbot). 
The town's accessibility to all kinds of land transportation has made Villasis a bustling center of trade and commerce. It is intersected by the Manila North Road from north to south, allowing all major bus lines plying the Manila-Region I CAR route to pass through the town 24-hours a day. The main agricultural crops of the town are rice, corn, cassava, and varieties of vegetables and fruits. Raising livestock is another livelihood of the townspeople who raise poultry, swine, goat and cattle. 
There are 56 registered small to medium-sized industries in Villasis. These include rice mills, metalcraft industries, cement production, poultry raising and piggeries and an ice-plant. 
The heritage Saint Anthony the Abbot Parish Church, built in 1763, is part of the Roman Catholic Diocese of Urdaneta (from the Archdiocese of Lingayen-Dagupan). Feast Day: January 17; Parish Priest: Father Arturo F. Aquino & Parochial Vicar: Father Dionisio B. Luzano. 
Tyler Cecil Hornby-Forbes (born 8 March 1996) is an English professional footballer who plays for Colne, as a right-back and right winger. 
Hornby-Forbes was a youth player at Preston North End and progressed through the academy. However, at the end of the season, Hornby-Forbes was released by the club following his end of his scholarships and moved to Fleetwood Town in the summer of 2014. 
In September 2019 he signed for AFC Fylde on non-contract terms. In January 2020, he was loaned out to Spennymoor Town for the rest of the season, before the deal was made permanent in June 2020. In August 2021, he signed for Northern Premier League Division One West side Colne. 
Among Glover's first teachers were Marian Rawles and Eloise Rawles Wilkinson. At the Bristow Hardin School of Music in Virginia he was a private piano student of Bristow Hardin in addition to pursuing studies in music theory, composition, and ensemble performance. Later instructors included Guy Maier and Hans Barth. 
The festival was established in 2001. The first year it took place as a rather small event featuring six artists on each of the two days of the festival. 
In 2006, 43 bands performed on 17 and 18 August. As an exception the festival lasted only for two days and the headliners were Muse and Franz Ferdinand. 
Reznor later posted on the band's blog that it was their worst show of the tour, with the worst audience alongside a picture of a Bratwurst. 
The Rainbow Cadenza is a science fiction novel by J. Neil Schulman which won the 1984 Prometheus Award for libertarian science fiction. 
The novel tells the story of Joan Darris, a laser art composer and performer, and her interactions with her society. 
The main themes of the novel are social libertarianism vs. societal control, freedom of self, and what is permissible for the greater good. 
Upon the 1986 publication of the Avon mass-market paperback Laserium coordinated an all-classical-music Rainbow Cadenza show which played at the Griffith Observatory and other planetarium venues in the United States and Canada. 
 Beth Wickenberg writing for the Arizona Daily Star praised the novel's feminist content coming from a male writer: 
Greg Costikyan reviewed The Rainbow Cadenza in Ares Magazine #16 and commented that "The Rainbow Cadenza is a personal novel of an artist attempting to survive and grow despite the oppression of the state, and attempting to discharge obligations to friends despite all legal and emotional obstacles. Jan Darris is, to my mind, one of the most appealing heroines of modern science fiction." 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
The actress Salka Viertel was his sister. Steuermann married Clara Silvers, a pianist and noted music librarian, in 1949. 
The 2016 StarCraft II World Championship Series (WCS) is the 2016 edition of the StarCraft II World Championship Series, the highest level of esports competition for StarCraft II. The tournament series' Global Finals were won by South Korean professional player Byun "ByuN" Hyun Woo. 
Unlike previous seasons which ranked players purely by WCS points, 2016's WCS guaranteed 8 slots of the Global Finals to each of the two regions, guaranteeing a larger non-Korean presence. The prize pool for the Global Finals was doubled, from $250,000 in 2015 to $500,000 in 2016. Additionally, a group stage was introduced for the first time for the first stage of play, with four groups of four players feeding into a bracket from the quarterfinals to the finals. 
Eight players from each of the two WCS regions qualify to the event based on their WCS Points-based rankings. Winners of WCS Circuit stops, GSL Code S events, and SSL Premier events receive automatic qualification. The sixteen players are then seeded into four four-player groups for the first round based on their region-specific ranking. A draw is held for the quarterfinals bracket, with winners of each group facing second-place finishers of other groups. 
The WCS Global Finals were held at the Anaheim Convention Center in Anaheim, California as part of BlizzCon 2016. They featured a group stage as the first round of play, played out the week prior to the main event, followed by bracket play from the quarterfinals onward at the convention center itself. 
Vitamin D toxicity, or hypervitaminosis D is the toxic state of an excess of vitamin D. The normal range for blood concentration is 20 to 50 nanograms per milliliter (ng/mL).  However, the toxic state is known to be a value of 100 ng/ml or more in a clinical setting. 
An excess of vitamin D causes abnormally high blood concentrations of calcium, which can cause overcalcification of the bones, soft tissues, heart and kidneys. In addition, hypertension can result. Symptoms of vitamin D toxicity may include the following: 
A mutation of the CYP24A1 gene can lead to a reduction in the degradation of vitamin D and to hypercalcaemia (see Vitamin_D: Excess). 
Vitamin D oral supplementation and skin synthesis have a different effect on the transport form of vitamin D, plasma calcifediol concentrations. Endogenously synthesized vitamin D3 travels mainly with vitamin D-binding protein (DBP), which slows hepatic delivery of vitamin D and the availability in the plasma. In contrast, orally administered vitamin D produces rapid hepatic delivery of vitamin D and increases plasma calcifediol. 
All of these affect gene transcription and overwhelm the vitamin D signal transduction process, leading to vitamin D toxicity. 
Evidence suggests that dietary vitamin D may be carried by lipoprotein particles into cells of the artery wall and atherosclerotic plaque, where it may be converted to active form by monocyte-macrophages. This raises questions regarding the effects of vitamin D intake on atherosclerotic calcification and cardiovascular risk as it may be causing vascular calcification. Calcifediol is implicated in the etiology of atherosclerosis, especially in non-Whites. 
Recommendations stemming for a single standard for optimal serum 25(OH)D concentrations ignores the differing genetically mediated determinates of serum 25(OH)D and may result in ethnic minorities in Western countries having the results of studies done with subjects not representative of ethnic diversity applied to them. Vitamin D levels vary for genetically mediated reasons as well as environmental ones. 
Possible ethnic differences in physiological pathways for ingested vitamin D, such as the Inuit, may confound across the board recommendations for vitamin D levels. Inuit compensate for lower production of vitamin D by converting more of this vitamin to its most active form. 
Complex regulatory mechanisms control metabolism. Recent epidemiologic evidence suggests that there is a narrow range of vitamin D levels in which vascular function is optimized. Levels above or below this range increased mortality. Animal research suggests that both excess and deficiency of vitamin D appears to cause abnormal functioning and premature aging. 
Valerio Pinton (born 14 February 1978) is an Italian rower. He competed at the 2000 Summer Olympics and the 2004 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to Italian rowing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Tibollo was born and raised in Toronto, Ontario. He is an alumnus of St. Michael's College School in Toronto, Ontario. He attended the University of Toronto where he received his undergraduate degree in 1982. He then obtained a law degree from the University of Windsor in 1985. Tibollo was called to the bar of the Law Society of Upper Canada in 1987. In 1995, Tibollo completed the program of instruction for lawyers: negotiation workshop at Harvard Law School. 
Tibollo was formerly the principal at Tibollo and Associates Professional Corporation and has been a practicing lawyer for the last 30 years.[citation needed] The law firm is located in Woodbridge, Ontario. 
Tibollo is the honorary chairman of the Caritas School of Life, a residential therapeutic community that provides services to men suffering from mental health and addictions problems.[citation needed] 
Tibollo was instrumental in creating Italian Heritage Month and is the founder of the Festival of Light, an annual multicultural festival celebrating diversity of culture and religion in Canada. 
Colon Township is a civil township of St. Joseph County in the U.S. state of Michigan. The population was 3,405 at the 2000 census. The village of Colon is located within the township. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 3,405 people, 1,332 households, and 943 families residing in the township.  The population density was 98.5 per square mile (38.0/km2).  There were 1,759 housing units at an average density of 50.9 per square mile (19.6/km2).  The racial makeup of the township was 97.71% White, 0.50% African American, 0.23% Native American, 0.23% Asian, 0.12% from other races, and 1.20% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 0.68% of the population. 
There were 1,332 households, out of which 31.7% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 56.0% were married couples living together, 10.1% had a female householder with no husband present, and 29.2% were non-families. 24.6% of all households were made up of individuals, and 11.9% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older.  The average household size was 2.55 and the average family size was 3.03. 
In the township the population was spread out, with 26.6% under the age of 18, 8.2% from 18 to 24, 26.2% from 25 to 44, 24.1% from 45 to 64, and 14.9% who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 37 years. For every 100 females, there were 99.7 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 96.5 males. 
The median income for a household in the township was $34,890, and the median income for a family was $40,972. Males had a median income of $32,593 versus $21,827 for females. The per capita income for the township was $16,904.  About 7.1% of families and 10.4% of the population were below the poverty line, including 14.8% of those under age 18 and 6.5% of those age 65 or over. 
The outer plexiform layer (external plexiform layer) is a layer of neuronal synapses in the retina of the eye. It consists of a dense network of synapses between dendrites of horizontal cells from the inner nuclear layer, and photoreceptor cell inner segments from the outer nuclear layer. It is much thinner than the inner plexiform layer, where amacrine cells synapse with retinal ganglion cells. 
The synapses in the outer plexiform layer are between the rod cell endings or cone cell branched foot plates and horizontal cells. Unlike in most systems, rod and cone cells release neurotransmitters when not receiving a light signal. 
"In the Arms of Love" is a song featured in the 1966 film, What Did You Do in the War, Daddy? The song's music was composed by Henry Mancini with lyrics by Jay Livingston and Ray Evans and was performed by Andy Williams. "In the Arms of Love" peaked at #49 on the Billboard Hot 100 and was Williams' second of four number ones on the Easy Listening chart, where it stayed at the top for two weeks in October 1966. The song also reached #33 in the UK. 
Grinin was born in Ozerki. In 1934, he began his football career at the factory team Oziory, and then in the youth team of Dinamo Moscow. In 1938, he made his debut in the starting line of Dinamo. In 1939, he went to the military club CSKA Moscow. From 1947 he served as team captain. In September 1952, he joined the Kalinin city team, but in the next year he returned to Moscow. In May 1953, Aleksey ended his playing career. 
This biographical article related to a Russian association football forward born in the 1910s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Japanese eagle ray (Myliobatis tobijei), also known as the cowhead eagle ray or kite ray, is a ray species in the family Myliobatidae. 
The Japanese eagle ray grows to be up to 150 centimeters long, and has a disc at least 114 centimeters wide. It is yellow-brown in color, and usually contains darker spots. It has rather long stinging spines, and its claspers are less than one-tenth the width of its disc. Each jaw of the species contains 7 rows of teeth. 
The Japanese eagle ray is demersal, usually inhabiting sea floors and feeding on benthic animals. In particular, it is known to eat crustaceans, fish, and sometimes benthic plants. Like all mylobatids, the species is ovoviparous. Embryos initially feed on yolk. They later receive nourishment by indirectly absorbing uterine fluid from their mother. Little else is known about the biology of this species. 
The Japanese eagle ray lives in the waters of East Asia, particularly in Japan, Korea, and China. It is also found in Indonesia and the Philippines. It is a tropical marine species, and lives in depths of over 220 meters. 
The species is sometimes caught as a bycatch. It is also sometimes caught intentionally for its meat, as well as for its cartilage. Little else is known about its population and threats. There are currently no conservation measures taking place for this species, and it is listed as Vulnerable by IUCN. 
The 2007 Colchester Borough Council election took place on 3 May 2007 to elect members of Colchester Borough Council in Essex, England. One third of the council was up for election and the council stayed under no overall control. 
Before the election the Conservatives had 30 of the 60 seats on the council, while the Liberal Democrats had 21, Labour had 7 and there were 2 independents. 
The Conservatives narrowly failed to gain a majority on the council after failing to take Wivenhoe Quay from Labour by two votes after two recounts. This meant the Conservatives remained on 30 councillors, while the Liberal Democrats stayed on 21 seats. Labour's loss of Shrub End to the Conservatives meant they dropped to 6 councillors, while the Greens failed to win any seats despite getting 32% of the vote in Castle ward. Overall turnout at the election was 34.7%. 
This article about a location in the Hadhramaut Governorate of  Yemen is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Incorporated Elements is a music production company founded in the late 1990s by producer/DJ, Ric Robbins (also known as DJ Form). Incorporated Elements works in many areas of production, including artist production and development and music for film, television, video games, and advertising.  Incorporated Elements works out of the Nashville, Tennessee, based studio named the Inc.Spot. 
Robbins' ultimate vision for Incorporated Elements is that it becomes a company that helps up-and-coming producers, artists, songwriters, engineers, and bands fully realize their goals and dreams in the music industry.  I.E. is making plans to open a multi-use complex in the Franklin, Tennessee, area to offer writing rooms, studios, training, and practice rooms.  They want to aid in launching the next generation of music professionals. 
Incorporated Elements has been nominated for 3 Grammy Awards for their work with the hip-hop group, Grits, and R&B/Pop singer, Ayiesha Woods. 
As a production team, Incorporated Elements has also been nominated for 9 Dove Awards, winning three. 
The 1st Magritte Awards ceremony was held in 2011 with Anne Coesens receiving the award for her role in Illegal. As of the 2020 ceremony, Veerle Baetens is the most recent winner in this category for her role in Mothers' Instinct. 
Lepyrus gemellus is a species of true weevil in the beetle family Curculionidae. It is found in North America. 
The men's K-2 1000 metres event was a pairs kayaking event conducted as part of the Canoeing at the 1960 Summer Olympics program on Lake Albano. 
The 23 crews first raced in three heats on August 26. The top three finishers from each heat advanced directly to the semifinals while the remaining 14 teams were relegated to the repechage heats. 
Canada's time in heat two not shown in the official report while Luxembourg and Switzerland are switched in the official report in heat three though the athletes for both countries were in the correct finishing position in the report. 
The top three finishers in each of the three repechages, which took place on August 27, advanced to the semifinals. 
The top three finishers in each of the three semifinals (raced on August 28) advanced to the final while the remaining teams were eliminated. 
The records for genealogical research are available at the state archive "Statny Archiv in Bratislava, Slovakia" 
Yoshizawa competed at the 2010 Winter Olympics for Japan. In the 500 metres, he advanced to the quarterfinals, where he finished 4th, failing to advance. In the 1500 metres, he placed 5th in his opening heat, advancing to the semifinals, where he finished 6th, again failing to advance. His best overall finish was in the 500, where he placed 14th. 
Yoshizawa's best performance at the World Championships came in 2004, when he placed 5th as a member of the Japanese 5000 metre relay team. He also won a bronze medal at the 2004 World Short Track Speed Skating Team Championships for Japan. 
This biographical article on a speed skater in Japan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
One third of Sefton Metropolitan Borough Council in Merseyside, England is elected each year, followed by one year without election. 
Adeline Georgiana Isabel Wolff was born in 1862. She was the only daughter of Henry Drummond Wolff, a diplomat and Conservative MP. Recorded in Who's Who as a traveller and linguist, she compiled a book of Indian folklore, Tales of the Sun, or, Folklore of Southern India, and a work entitled The English Baby in India and How to Rear it. However she was best known as a novelist. 
Her most famous novel was a response to Grant Allen's The Woman Who Did. The first edition of Cleeve's The Woman Who Wouldn't (1895) sold well but received hostile reviews. She said of this: 
If one young girl is kept from a loveless, mistaken marriage, if one frivolous nature is checked in her career of flirtation by remembrance of Lady Morris, I shall perhaps be forgiven by the public for raising my feeble voice in answer to The Woman Who Did. 
This article about an English writer, poet or playwright is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Gargoyle is a name shared by two fictional characters appearing in American comic books published by Marvel Comics. 
The first Gargoyle, Yuri Topolov, appears in The Incredible Hulk #1 (May 1962), and was created by Stan Lee and Jack Kirby. 
The appearance of Gargoyle in Rampaging Hulk #1 is merely part of one of Bereet's fictional techno-art films.[citation needed] The first Gargoyle received an entry in the The Official Handbook of the Marvel Universe Deluxe Edition #17, where his real name was revealed. 
The second Gargoyle, Isaac Christians, is a human/demon hybrid and a member of the Defenders. He was created by writer J. M. DeMatteis and artist Don Perlin. Perlin's design was inspired by a sequence in Prince Valiant in which the titular hero disguises himself as a gargoyle. During his long run on The Defenders, Gargoyle also was the co-star of Marvel Team-Up #119, written by his co-creator DeMatteis, who later described the issue as "one of my favorite favorite stories". 
 In 1985 Marvel published a four-issue Gargoyle limited series, written by DeMatteis and drawn by Mark Badger. DeMatteis said of the series, "It was a psychological fantasy. You take the interior life and make it concrete... give it substance... and play with it". Explaining why he decided to do a limited series starring Gargoyle, he said, 
I'd always wanted to do that character the right way. We'd had him in Defenders for years and Don Perlin and I were... We came to like him so much, as a person... this was a classic case of the character coming alive for us. We came to like Isaac Christians, this little old man inside the Gargoyle's body, so much that it began to mellow out the way we portrayed the outer shell, the gargoyle aspect. And, before you know it, he's this cute little funny animal. Which he was never intended to be.
In a 2013 interview DeMatteis said that Gargoyle "is a character I still have tremendous fondness for". 
As a member of the Defenders, Gargoyle helped the Squadron Supreme defeat the Overmind and Null the Living Darkness. The Gargoyle briefly fell under the control of an Afghan wizard, and he was forced to battle the Defenders. 
Christians later returned to Christianboro, and was later released from the Gargoyle body and the original demon spirit re-inhabited it. Christians, to prevent the chaos being wreaked by the gargoyle, re-assumed the body with the help of a druid and killed his original human body to prevent the demon from returning. 
Moondragon, under the influence of the Dragon of the Moon, later separated Christians' life force from the gargoyle body. The body was to be used as a vessel for the Dragon of the Moon, and it became larger and more grotesque. The gargoyle body was carbonized and transformed into a statue of ash, when the Defenders defeated Moondragon and the Dragon of the Moon. 
Christians' life force came to reside in a crystal talisman. He reconciled with the spirit of Moondragon, and journeyed with Pamela Douglas to Titan, where he witnessed the rebirth of Moondragon. The former Defender known as Cloud created a new body for Christians, with the ability to change back and forth between his gargoyle and human form. 
Alongside the Presence, Starlight, Jack of Hearts, and others, he returned to Earth from the Stranger's laboratory world. 
When the final confrontation between Gabriel, Devil Hunter, and Hellstrom left Gabriel irretrievably insane, only capable of babbling incoherently, Hellstrom left him in the care of the Gargoyle. 
Alyosha Kravinoff later captured Gargoyle and placed him in his zoo for animal-themed superhumans which also consisted of Bushmaster, Tiger Shark, Kangaroo, Aragorn (the version that was owned by the Vatican Black Knight), Vulture, Mongoose, Man-Bull, Dragon Man, Swarm, Mandrill, Grizzly, Frog-Man, and Rhino. 
Isaac Christians later opened up a restaurant called Isaac's Oysters in Greenwich with Eugene Patilio as his busboy. Both of them were approached by Iron Man for help in rescuing James Rhodes from Korvac. 
Rhacostoma is a genus of aequoreid hydrozoans. It is monotypic with a single species, Rhacostoma atlanticum. It has been reported from the Atlantic coastline of North America, Colombia, western and central Africa. The polyp stage is unknown. 
Bruno Cerella (born July 30, 1986) is an Italian-Argentine professional basketball player for Reyer Venezia of the Italian Lega Basket Serie A (LBA) and the EuroCup Basketball. 
Along with David Moss, he helped the team reach the semifinals of the 2009 Italian Cup, and to a third place finish in the Italian League's regular season, before being eliminated in the playoffs by Emporio Armani Milano. After a few LBA seasons, he joined Emporio Armani Milano in 2013, and with them he participated in Europe's premier basketball competition, the EuroLeague, for the first time in his career. 
Cerella was a member of the senior men's Italian national basketball team in 2008, although he never played in an official competition. 
Although rarely a starter, and not a prolific scorer, Cerrella is invaluable for his teams as a luxury bench option, who will reliably perform his defensive duties, who will contribute with steals, and who will rarely turnover the ball on offense. 
Education Service Area Office is a Thai agency in Office of the Basic Education Commission of Thailand, Ministry of Education founded in 2009,Its responsibilities include the administration of education from primary education or secondary education in each responsibility area include Primary Education Services Area and Secondary Education Services Area 
Camp Adams was a former American Civil War training camp that existed in 1861 in Quincy, Massachusetts. It was first occupied on 5 July 1861 by Cobb's Light Artillery. On 8 August the unit relocated to Baltimore, Maryland and established Camp Andrew. 
A hair prosthesis (or cranial prosthesis) is a custom-made wig specifically designed for patients who have lost their hair as a result of medical conditions or treatments, such as alopecia areata, alopecia totalis, trichotillomania, chemotherapy, or any other clinical disease or treatment resulting in hair loss. The terminology is used when applying for medical insurance or tax deduction status.  
Doctors have been prescribing these prostheses since the 1950s.  Cranial prostheses also help to protect disease-weakened immune systems from the sun, and to regulate body temperature. 
This word "resolution" is the core of Kierkegaard's idea behind the leap of faith. His question is: Who can make a positive or negative resolution for another? A resolution is best made by the single individual in the quietness of his or her soul through the inward struggle rather than the struggle with external forces. 
This discourse has to do with a psychological view regarding the process of decision making and making of vows for "existing" single individuals and has nothing to do with the crowd or with "noisy voting". 
"The Diary has a date here and there, but the year is always omitted. This might seem to preclude further inquiry, but by studying the individual dates, I believe I have found a clue. Of course every year has a seventh of April, a third of July, a second of August and so forth; but it is not true that the seventh of April falls every year on Monday. I therefore have made certain calculations and have found that this combination fits the year 1834." Either/Or, Part I, Preface, p. 10 Swenson
 Later, in Stages on Life's Way he wrote a "Morning" entry in the diary on May 4 about birth and on May 5 at "Midnight" an entry on Periander. Then on "June 18 at Midnight" he wrote about guilt. His mother Ane Kierkegaard was born on June 18. Then on July 7 at midnight he wrote about Regine. There is a genealogy of his family on the internet. He used dates in his discourses also. 
 He kept to his familiar formula while writing his preface by dedicating his discourse to his father, who was a clothing merchant living in Copenhagen and writing to my reader, not my readers, because his books were for each single individual to read if she or he wanted to read it. His preface said, in part, 
Kierkegaard goes on to tell "the secret of perfection: that to need God is nothing to be ashamed of but is perfection itself." Another way to say that is we become perfect when we learn that we are not perfect. Once that happens the individual struggles with himself rather than with the world. He uses Moses as an example of an individual who knew he was capable of nothing at all but he was confronted by the crowd that demanded a demonstration. He sums up this battle for the self this way: 
How should a man be content so long as he fails to obtain complete unity in his inmost being? For as long as two voices alternately speak in him, what is right for one must be wrong for the other. Thus he is always complaining. But has any man ever been completely at one with himself? Nay, is not the very thought a contradiction? That a man shall attain this inner unity is the impossible and inconsistent pretension put forward by almost all philosophers
 The single individual can know very many things but not do much of anything that relates to the knowing. One can reflect on what the Bible says or one could decide to do something in relation to what they know. Kierkegaard put it this way in his Concluding Postscript (1846) and again in his journals. 
 So we pray to God about what we want and need. Kierkegaard's first discourse says this about needs, 
 How does the crowd decide what it wants and needs compared with the decision of the single individual? The crowd hears stories and wonders if they are true. Repetition of the story increases its validity. Kierkegaard thinks people should reflect on those stories for a longer period of time and choose for themselves if they are believable. He wrote the following in 1846: 
Kierkegaard was noticed by The Western Literary Messenger, Sept 1849, which wrote that everything exists for Kierkegaard in this one point, the human heart and as he reflects this changing heart in the eternal unchangeable, in that which became flesh and dwelt among us he has found a lively group of readers among the ladies. 
 Critics have concentrated on the personality of Kierkegaard to a greater degree than on his writings, especially his discourses. Early interpreters of his works were Georg Brandes, Harald Hoffding and O. P. Monrad according to this article written in 1915. 
Thomas Merton wrote a book in 1955 called No Man Is An Island in response to the interest scholars had in the category of the single individual because he thought this idea would lead people away from the Church. He writes very similarly to what Kierkegaard stated. Here is part of his prologue. 
Rollo May discussed Kierkegaard's ideal of creating oneself in his 1975 book, The Courage to Create. He agrees with Kierkegaard's assessment that the self is always only in the process of becoming that which it will be. Determinism, or the accidents of life, are what they are, but the thinking and self-creating that goes on with each single individual is what allows each of us to face our own fantasies. 
John 12:32: And I, when I am lifted up from the earth, will draw all to myself. Lord Jesus Christ, whether we are far away or nearby, far away from you in the confused human throng, in worldly business, in earthly cares, in temporal joy, in purely human loftiness, or far away from all this in solitude, in forsakenness, in unappreciation, in lowliness-and closer to you: draw us, draw us wholly to yourself.
Founded by Paul St. John in 2011, the Canadian Lacrosse League (CLax) was a men's semi-professional indoor lacrosse league based exclusively in Ontario, Canada. CLax ceased operation on August 31, 2016 after the league's single-entity ownership group, Charlesway Corporation Limited and Rodney 'Demon' Hill, deemed the league's business model to be no longer viable. 
Similar to the National Lacrosse League, and unlike other Canadian box lacrosse leagues that play in the summer, CLax played its regular season games in the winter with its playoff games and championship culminating in the early spring. CLax opened its inaugural season with six teams in three cities: Brampton Inferno and Peel Avengers in Brampton, Ontario; the Iroquois Ironmen and Ohsweken Demons in Hagersville, Ontario; and the Durham TurfDogs and Oshawa Machine in Oshawa, Ontario. 
The league's original intentions were to feature eastern and western leagues. This plan was modified to have multiple Ontario teams and one Quebec location in the first year. 
It was announced on October 3, 2012 that the league would be expanding to three new markets: Barrie, Toronto, and St. Catharines. The Oshawa Machine would be moving to Toronto to become the Toronto Shooting Stars; the Peel Avengers would relocate to St. Catharines and the city of Barrie would be awarded an expansion team. It was also announced that the Durham Turf Dogs would be changing their name to the Oshawa Turf Dogs. 
In November 2013, the defending champion Iroquois Ironmen announced that they were ceasing operations and would no longer compete in CLax. That was followed in December with the news of 2013 finalists, Toronto Shooting Stars also folding. The Brampton Inferno would become a touring team based out of Southwestern Ontario called the SouthWest Cyclops for 2014. 
McCormick was great friends with Mike "King" Kelly and was also very well liked by Cap Anson, two of the great personalities of early baseball. Anson was McCormick's captain-manager in 1885 and 1886, when Chicago won its last 19th-century pennants. 
About Anson, McCormick reportedly said the following in 1887, soon after being sold by Chicago to Pittsburgh: "Before I played ball with Anson I used to think he was a big dub, but I thought him a pretty fair fellow afterward. He never said much to me. If any one wants to get Anson mad let him say he is in one of those trances [presumably, mellow moments during a game]. Kelly used to make him wild by shouting in from the outfield: 'Have you got them again?'" 
At 19th all-time, McCormick has the 2nd highest Jaffe Wins Above Replacement Score (JAWS) of any eligible pitcher not in the Baseball Hall of Fame. 
He died in Paterson, New Jersey at the age of 61, and is interred at Laurel Grove Memorial Park in Totowa, New Jersey. 
Lathouris has worked on the television series Police Rescue. He appeared in George Miller's film Mad Max (1979) as a car mechanic. He also ran film and drama workshops for the Australian Film Commission. 
New Byth is a small inland planned village in the Banff and Buchan committee area of Aberdeenshire, Scotland, that lies a few miles northeast of Cuminestown. It was founded in 1763 by the then Laird of Byth, James Urquhart. 
Gertrude M. "Trudy" Coxe (born 1948) is an American environmental activist and historic preservationist who is the current CEO of the Preservation Society of Newport County and the former Secretary of Environmental Affairs in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts. 
As an employee of Save the Bay, Coxe helped organize the first annual Save the Bay swim in 1977, later serving as executive director of Save the Bay from 1979 to 1990. She ran an unsuccessful campaign as a Republican for Congress against Jack Reed in 1990. From 1993 to 1998 she served as Massachusetts' Secretary of Environmental Affairs under Governor Weld and Governor Cellucci. After leaving this position, she became C.E.O. of the Preservation Society of Newport County. 
Coxe currently serves on various non-profit boards, including: "National Recreation and Park Association, the Appalachian Mountain Club, Grow Smart Rhode Island, the Rhode Island Commodores, the Metcalf Institute for Marine & Environmental Reporting, the Wheeler School, the Newport County Chamber of Commerce, Child and Family Services and the Attractions Council of Newport County." 
Coxe is the recipient of honorary doctorate degrees from the University of Rhode Island, the Massachusetts Maritime Academy, and Roger Williams University. 
Squamous cell carcinoma antigen recognized by T-cells 3 is a protein that in humans is encoded by the SART3 gene. 
2do4: Solution structure of the RNA binding domain of squamous cell carcinoma antigen recognized by T cells 3 
Archepsila esterensis is a species of beetles in the family Buprestidae, the only species in the genus Archepsila. 
In October 2019, Wurtele and her husband, Trevor, both jointly announced their retirement from professional racing. 
While earning her masters Wurtele reconnected with friend and high school classmate, Trevor Wurtele. They were engaged prior to moving together to Norway and were married after returning to Canada. 
This article related to an American film of the 1920s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a property in Montgomery County, Pennsylvania on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a location in the Mexican state of Durango is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jay Wade Edwards (born September 12, 1968) is an American film director, television producer and editor. 
His anthology web series, Kino-Edwards Picture Show, won Best Web Content at the 2016 Hollywood Reel Independent Film Festival. 
The following private and parochial schools were operating in Baltimore at the beginning of the 2010-2011 school year. 
The information recorded in the above table was obtained from each school's website during school year 2010-2011. Schools providing only early childhood education were not included. 
Cardinal Gibbons School, a Roman Catholic high school for boys located in Baltimore since 1962, closed its doors at the end of the 2009-2010 school year. 
Talleyville is an unincorporated community in New Castle County, Delaware, United States. Talleyville is located at the intersection of U.S. Route 202, Mt. Lebanon Road, and Silverside Road to the north of Wilmington. Its ZIP code is 19803. 
The population of the ZCTA for ZIP code 19803 was 21,022 at the 2000 census.  The William Hicklen House was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1983. 
In 1855, the British Government sent Clegg to Demerara in British Guiana to report on the sea walls there, and to superintend their restoration. He was author of a treatise on coal gas, 1850.  
Cleg died in Putney, Surrey, 25 July 1856 at age 42. He had a wife and young children. At the time of his death, Clegg was devising a plan for removing all the gas manufactories in London to a location on the Essex shore.  
Among the published works of which Garafola is the author, editor, or translator are the following books, articles in other books, and scholarly journal articles. In addition to these are scores of book reviews and papers included in the proceedings of academic conferences and meetings. 
Garafola has delivered dozens of lectures and public presentations on a great many topics in dance history. Those listed here are but a sampling of this body of work, intended to indicate the breadth of her interests and the extent of her reach. 
In addition to glowing reviews of her books and accolades from her peers, Garafola has been the recipient of a number of prestigious awards and fellowships. Among them are the following. 
In 1980, Garafola married Eric Foner, the Dewitt Clinton Professor of History at Columbia University. They have one daughter, Daria. A former dancer with the Norwegian National Ballet in Oslo, she received a Ph.D. in Art History from Columbia University in 2020 and is currently employed at the Morgan Library and Museum in New York. 
Readstown is a village in Vernon County, Wisconsin, United States. The population was 415 at the 2010 census. 
At the 2010 census there were 415 people, 186 households, and 99 families living in the village. The population density was 234.5 inhabitants per square mile (90.5/km2). There were 213 housing units at an average density of 120.3 per square mile (46.4/km2). The racial makup of the village was 96.4% White, 1.4% African American, 0.2% Native American, 1.0% Asian, and 1.0% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.2%. 
Of the 186 households 25.3% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 39.2% were married couples living together, 9.7% had a female householder with no husband present, 4.3% had a male householder with no wife present, and 46.8% were non-families. 38.7% of households were one person and 23.1% were one person aged 65 or older. The average household size was 2.20 and the average family size was 2.99. 
The median age in the village was 44.9 years. 20.7% of residents were under the age of 18; 5.5% were between the ages of 18 and 24; 24.1% were from 25 to 44; 30.7% were from 45 to 64; and 19% were 65 or older. The gender makeup of the village was 46.0% male and 54.0% female. 
The age distribution was 21.0% under the age of 18, 7.6% from 18 to 24, 24.3% from 25 to 44, 24.8% from 45 to 64, and 22.3% 65 or older. The median age was 43 years. For every 100 females, there were 85.4 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 80.3 males. 
The median household income was $21,250 and the median family income  was $28,125. Males had a median income of $26,250 versus $18,889 for females. The per capita income for the village was $12,957. About 9.3% of families and 21.2% of the population were below the poverty line, including 27.8% of those under age 18 and 21.4% of those age 65 or over. 
Blomfield was born in Auckland to painter Charles Blomfield and his wife Ellen. She learnt painting from her father and C. F. Goldie and specialised in floral paintings and portraits; later in her life she also painted landscapes. 
She exhibited with the Otago Art Society and the Auckland Society of Arts. One of her oil paintings of Dunedin is in the Hocken Collections. 
Blomfield married William Kendon in 1908 and following her marriage exhibited as Bessie Kendon or Elizabeth Kendon. 
It is a complex concept, with no single-word English translation, that fuses "object and subject" as interdependent parts of each human's consciousness and epistemological process. It connotes "impression, disposition, conditioning, forming, perfecting in one's mind, influencing one's sensory and conceptual faculty" as well as any "preparation, sacrament" that "impresses, disposes, influences or conditions" how one thinks, conceives or feels. 
Kalupahana states that "the elimination of dispositions is epistemological suicide," as dispositions determine our perspectives. The development of one's personality in the direction of perfection or imperfection rests with one's dispositions. 
In January 2002, as a consequence of a financial crisis, Nacional was forced to return the aircraft and ceased all operations a few weeks later. 
Darryl L. Foster is an American activist, author and Christian minister. He began his ministry in the Church of God in Christ (COGIC), the largest African American Pentecostal Christian denomination in the world. An advocate of sexual holiness, he founded, and is executive director of. Witness Freedom Ministries, which provides biblical direction to men and women seeking to change their sexual orientation and refrain from same-sex relationships. 
Foster was born into a family of Church of God in Christ preachers. His father was a pastor in the denomination, as was his grandfather, Ezekiel Foster, Sr whom he acknowledges as a major influence in his life. Foster was raised in Marlin, Texas, until his graduation where he enlisted in military service in 1982. 
He founded Witness Freedom Ministries in Waco in 1996 and began developing programs to reach and assist Christian men and women with their personal struggles with sexuality. A conference was launched in 1998, and in 1999 Foster relocated the ministry to Atlanta, Georgia with a specific focus on people of color. 
In 1998, he became associated with the ex-gay movement Exodus International. He became one of the few prominent African American leaders in the ex-gay movement. Foster and other leaders of the movement defend their outreaches as part of the church's mission to provide help to people who "struggle" with homosexuality. 
In June 2007, Foster launched Gay Christian Movement Watch, a controversial blog which began calling attention to the "gay christian movement". 
Blake said the attention the site has received is out of proportion, considering the thousands of COGIC leaders. "Thirty allegations of sexual misbehavior is too many, but it should be looked at in that context," he said. 
Foster chronicled his 11 years of homosexual experiences in the semiautubiographical Touching A Dead Man: One Man's Explosive Story of Deliverance from Homosexuality, published in 2002. 
This is a list of occurrences of space elevators in fiction. Some depictions were made before the space elevator concept became fully established. 
Spencer Paysinger (born June 28, 1988) is a former American football linebacker. He was signed by the New York Giants as an undrafted free agent in 2011. 
His uncle, Carter Paysinger, was the head football coach at BHHS from 1990 to 2009. His father, Donald Paysinger, worked with BHHS as an assistant or head coach for nearly 32 years until 2013. 
After not getting selected in the 2011 NFL Draft, Paysinger signed with the New York Giants as an undrafted free agent. As a rookie Paysinger did not get much playing time. In 15 games he racked up 12 tackles. He was a part of the Super Bowl XLVI winning team. In the next three seasons with the New York Giants, he racked up 104 tackles in 47 games. In the 2014 season he was able to get to the quarterback for the first time mustering up his first and only NFL career sack.[clarification needed] 
Paysinger signed a one-year contract with the Miami Dolphins on April 2, 2015. He was re-signed by the Dolphins on March 31, 2016. In these two seasons with the Miami Dolphins Paysinger went for a total of 57 tackles. 
On June 9, 2017, Paysinger was signed by the New York Jets. Before he could get any playing time with the team in the regular season, he was released on September 1, 2017. 
On December 5, 2017, Paysinger signed with the Carolina Panthers. He played in three games, before being released by the team on December 29, 2017. He then retired from football. 
At the beginning of each episode it states that the show was inspired by true events and hence Paysinger's life but the show takes creative control and while the main story is based on Paysinger's life the actual details are tweaked. An example is in the show the main character's name is Spencer James instead of Spencer Paysinger. 
The Lake House tells the story of six extraordinary children, endowed with the power to fly after genetic engineering merged their DNA with that of birds, and who have to fight for their lives against scientists who want to kill them, thinking that they are monsters of despair. With them comes the help of Dr. Frannie O'Neil and suspended FBI agent Thomas "Kit" Brennan. 
Although the names are different, as well as aspects of their back stories and behavior, the six children in the follow-up series have personalities that are directly analogous to the ones in When the Wind Blows and The Lake House. 
Before the main story of the first Maximum Ride book, Patterson remarks that the only similarity is the name between the Max in the story and the Max in The Lake House. He then remarks. "Most of the similarities end there. Nor do Frannie and Kit or any of the other kids play any part in it. I hope you enjoy the ride anyway." 
Going back to their lives, the children are forced to put up with harassment from various reporters and paparazzi. After a visit from one of the reporters, it is revealed that Max knows about the Hospital from working at the School, but was trained not to talk about it on the threat of death. Upset, she goes to Oz for comfort. He tells her that she is "drop dead gorgeous". Shortly after, the two begin a sexual relationship. 
After Kane attempts to kidnap Max and Matthew at their new home, the siblings escape and meet up with the rest of the flock. The children then fly to Frannie's house for protection. That night, Hospital workers try to break into Frannie's house. She calls the police and sets her house on fire. She and the children then escape through the basement and meet up with Kit. 
In 2010, Amy von der Gonna received the $2,500 Prince of Wales Scholarship, the most prestigious award in SD 57. 
The wrestling team placed third at the BC Summer Games, and sixth at the BC Provincial Championships. Two participants later competed in the Canadian National Championships. The boys' snowboarding team won the British Columbia high school ski and snowboarding zonal championship in March 2008. The senior boys basketball team reached single 'A' provincials in 2010 and 2011, placing 12th and 14th respectively. 
He is a chief historian at the Foreign and Commonwealth Office and a visiting professor at Newcastle University. In 2001 he was a fellow at the Norwegian Nobel Institute. He is a member of the Norwegian Academy of Science and Letters. 
"Norway", in Neville Wylie (Editor), European Neutrals and Non-Belligerents During the Second World War (Cambridge University Press, 2002). 
The Baltic Nations and Europe: Estonia, Latvia and Lithuania in the 20th century, eds. John Hiden and Patrick Salmon (Routledge, 2014). 
This article about a British historian or genealogist is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Tan Romeo (born 9 April 1985) is a Singaporean actor and has been named as one of the 8 Dukes of Caldecott Hill. Tan came into prominence after finishing in fourth place on the tenth season of the television series Star Search in 2010. 
Kelly has hosted and produced several radio programs. Several are still airing on stations across the United States and Canada; production and distribution of his current shows went on a brief hiatus in the late 2000s but have since resumed.  He worked at KTSP in the Minneapolis/St. Paul market from 1972 through 1975. During the 1970s and '80s, Kelly enjoyed much success as a radio personality on Los Angeles radio stations KHJ, KTNQ, KOST and KODJ. 
Christopher Taylor White (born 7 March 1943) is an English singer, songwriter, musician, and record producer. 
White's music career spans more than 50 years. He came to prominence in the mid-1960s as the bass guitarist and occasional lead vocalist of the English rock band The Zombies. White is one of the main composers of the Zombies' music, and made major lyrical contributions to the band's songs. He was inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame in 2019. 
His song "I Love You", originally recorded by the Zombies in 1965, was a hit for the band People! in 1968. 
Following the demise of the Zombies, White contributed songwriting and production work to Colin Blunstone's solo career and Rod Argent's new band, Argent. With Argent he co-wrote their 1972 hit "Hold Your Head Up". In 2007, as part of the band White Circle, he co-wrote, co-produced and performed on the album The Key with his son Matthew White and wife Vivienne Boucherat. 
Also in 2007/2008, White co-produced and played on the album Featherhead for his youngest son, the London-based singer-songwriter JJ White. In March 2008, White began a series of live performances with the other three surviving members of the Zombies, including the first complete performances of the album Odessey and Oracle, in celebration of the 40th anniversary of its release. 
Chris and his wife Vivian Boucherat provide backing vocals on the 2016 album My Religion by John Verity. 
Since 2019, Chris has been releasing previously unheard material under the series name The Chris White Experience featuring performances from a host of well-known artists. As of July 2021, he has released five volumes of songs, and a previously unreleased album by the band Sparrow. 
White currently resides in London. He is married to Viv Boucherat, and while they have no children together, White is father to three sons; Matthew, Jamie and Sacha. 
Bred by Charles Reed, owner of the Fairview Stud Farm in Gallatin, Tennessee, his dam was Bradamante and his sire was the U.S. Racing Hall of Famne inductee, Longfellow, who was the Leading sire in North America sixteen times between 1861 and 1878. The Bard was purchased and raced by Alexander Cassatt, President of the Pennsylvania Railroad, and, in racing, the owner of Chesterbrook Farm in Berwyn, Pennsylvania and President of Monmouth Park Racetrack. He was trained by John Huggins. 
The Bard raced at age two in 1885, notably winning the Red Bank Stakes at Monmouth Park, the Bouquet Stakes at Sheepshead Bay Race Track, and the Capital Stakes at the Ivy City Racetrack in Washington, D.C. 
From 1885 through 1888, The Bard won 27 races and earned $84,990. On April 4, 1889, the New York Times reported that: "The Bard may not be seen on the turf again this year, owing to the trouble with his leg, which caused him to stop racing suddenly last year." Although his owner hoped he might recover in time to compete in the Brooklyn Derby and Suburban Handicap, he did not. 
On May 16, 1889 the Times again wrote that The Bard had still not raced and later reports show him standing at stud at his owner's Pennsylvania breeding farm. 
The mainstay of Alexander Cassat's horse breeding operation, and after his death in 1906, for his son Edward, The Bard sired a number of successful runners including Gold Heels, the 1902 American Champion Older Male Horse, and the filly, Poetess, winner of the 1897 Alabama Stakes. 
This biographical article relating to a Czech ice hockey centre is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Indian-made foreign liquor (IMFL) is the official term used by governments, businesses and media in India to refer to all types of hard liquor manufactured in the country other than indigenous alcoholic beverages such as feni, toddy, arrack and others. 
IMFL is also referred to spirits that are produced in foreign countries and imported to India in bulk quantities and bottled in an Excise Bonded Warehouse by the Importers. 
He was the author of a novel, Bitter Orange, about families split by conflict in Northern Ireland, and a history of the British Army's involvement there. 
This biographical article related to television journalism in the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
David Ngodiga (born 23 October 1962) is a Nigerian footballer. He competed in the men's tournament at the 1988 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to Nigerian football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Another common plural in the Amarna letters is HI.A, , found in personal names (Abdi-Heba), and the plural. 
As wedges inscribed on a horizontal baseline, the wedges are usually centered, following the large vertical stroke; the horizontal baseline is not always exactly at the midpoint of the vertical stroke. The following wedges are either full-size, (or sometimes oversized); the wedges are also sometimes any percentage less than a full 3/4-wedge, or 1/2-wedge. 
Angled wedges are often much smaller expressed wedges, from 1/2 to 1/3? size. For space considerations, the angled wedges can be extremely high-angled, towards vertical, thus saving "horizontal text space"; alternatively, the wedges could be spaced out, allowing for the consumption of more 'line-text-space'. 
The Tulsa Drillers are a minor league baseball team based in Tulsa, Oklahoma. The team, which plays in the Double-A Central, is the Double-A affiliate of the Los Angeles Dodgers major-league club. They were previously members of the Texas League from 1977 to 2020. 
The Drillers set up shop at Oiler Park, which was renamed Driller Park.  However, it was obvious that the old stadium was at the end of its useful life, and plans were already underway for a replacement.  Tulsa County completed 8,000 seat Robert B. Sutton Stadium in 1981, naming it for its chief benefactor, a local oil executive.  Sutton, however, was convicted in 1982 of fraud, and as a result the County renamed the park Tulsa County Stadium, and renamed it Drillers Stadium in 1989. 
In conjunction with Major League Baseball's restructuring of Minor League Baseball in 2021, the Drillers were organized into the Double-A Central. 
The Drillers were Texas League champions four times: in 1982, 1988, 1998 and in 2018. They won the Eastern Division championship in 1999 and 2002. The Drillers also appeared in the Texas League playoffs during the 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, and 2017 seasons. 
ESPN SportsCenter anchor John Anderson has often alluded to team alumni as "former Driller(s)" on-air. Anderson was a weekend sports anchor for Tulsa CBS affiliate KOTV before joining ESPN. 
For 13 years the Tulsa Drillers' radio (and sometime television) announcer was Mark Neely, but in January 2009 it was announced that Neely had been hired to be the new TV play-by-play announcer for the San Diego Padres.  In February the Drillers announced that Neely's replacement would be Dennis Higgins, former announcer for the Wichita Wranglers.  Since the 2005 season, the Drillers have been broadcast on KTBZ (AM), Sports Radio 1430, "The Buzz" in Tulsa. 
Gabriela von Habsburg (born 14 October 1956) is an abstract sculptor, working mainly in stainless steel as well as stone-printed lithography. She was the ambassador of Georgia to Germany from 2009 to 2013. She is the granddaughter of Charles I, the last emperor of Austria. 
After graduating in 1976, Gabriela von Habsburg studied philosophy for two years at the Ludwig Maximilian University of Munich. From 1978 to 1982, she studied art at the Munich Academy of Arts with Robert Jacobsen and Eduardo Paolozzi. 
Since 2001, she has been an art professor at the Academy of Arts of Tbilisi, Georgia while also teaching at the Summer Academy of Arts in Neuburg an der Donau, Germany until 2005. She found the creativity and cheerfulness of her students in the face of the adversity then prevalent in Georgia inspiring. During her tenure there she was granted Georgian citizenship. Her five hectare vineyard in Georgia produces wine. 
Since March 2010 Gabriela von Habsburg has represented Georgia at the International Council of the Austrian Service Abroad. 
Wikipedia does not currently have an article on "roll rate", but our sister project Wiktionary does: 
The director of ISAW is Alexander Jones (classicist). He succeeded the founding director Roger Bagnall in September, 2016. Jennifer Chi was the founding exhibitions director and chief curator, who guided the visual arts program until 2018. 
ISAW offers hosts visiting research scholars conducting postdoctoral research. There are three types of appointment for visiting scholars: 
Scholars in all three categories are expected to be in residence at ISAW for the duration of their appointment and to participate in the intellectual life of the community, including presenting a public lecture. 
In order to support its mission of communicating information about antiquity to the public, ISAW organizes public exhibitions. Past exhibitions include: 
Most exhibitions have been accompanied by illustrated catalogs, many of which are co-published by ISAW and Princeton University Press. 
ISAW houses a research library of approximately 40,000 non-circulating print volumes. The ISAW Library is a branch library of the NYU Division of Libraries, with facilities located on four floors of ISAW's facilities on East 84th Street. The library is open to members of the ISAW and NYU communities, as well as to scholars from other institutions who can demonstrate a need to access materials in the collection for their research. 
Particular areas of strength in the ISAW Library's print collection include Greek and Roman material culture and history, Papyrology, Egyptology, Mesopotamian Archaeology and Assyriology, Central Asia and Iran, and Early China. 
The library is engaged in providing access and support for new and emerging forms of digital scholarship, scholarly communication, and pedagogy in ancient studies. The library's digital initiatives include the Ancient World Digital Library (AWDL) and a joint project with ISAW Digital Programs to help catalog the online and open access resources. 
ISAW has produced or sponsored both print and electronic publications related to the ancient world. These include: 
Meanwhile, an eccentric billionaire industrialist has privately financed the construction of many massive orbital arcologies. Via asteroid mining these space stations have become the world's single richest entity. The UN cuts funding for the zero-sleep lab and the industrialist hires their entire staff to work in his primary station. 
When they track down the location they find the hidden Immortal headquarters isolated in deep space. Peron's gang manages to evade security and stowaway aboard a supply ship bound for the headquarters. Upon arrival they are immediately captured by the superior security at HQ. Here they meet the other scientist characters from Part I and are congratulated for coming so far. They are invited to become equal partners in the quest to solve a new problem. 
Explorer S-45 was an American satellite, which was lost in a launch failure in 1961. The satellite was intended to operate in a highly elliptical orbit, from which it was to have provided data on the shape of the ionosphere, and on the Earth's magnetic field. It was part of the Explorer program, and would have been designated Explorer 10 had it reached orbit. A second identical satellite, Explorer S-45A, also failed to achieve orbit when it was launched. 
Explorer S-45 was launched aboard a Juno II launch vehicle, serial number AM-19F. The launch took place from Launch Complex 26B at the Cape Canaveral Air Force Station (CCAFS) at 00:13:16 GMT on 25 February 1961. The launch vehicle malfunctioned after the second stage separated, and contact with the payload was lost. The third stages subsequently failed to ignite, resulting in the satellite failing to achieve orbit. 
The men's marathon at the 2006 Asian Games in Doha, Qatar was held on 10 December 2006 at the Marathon Street Circuit in Doha Corniche. 
The team's statistical leaders included Tom Greene with 976 passing yards, Joe Stagnone with 223 rushing yards and 18 points scored, and Dave Stecchi with 331 receiving yards. 
In telecommunication, circuit restoration is the process by which a communications circuit is established between two users after disruption or loss of the original circuit.  The loss may be widespread due to a natural disaster like an ice storm or hurricane, or local by being cut underground in construction or damaged in a thunderstorm or car accident. 
Circuit restoration is usually performed in accordance with planned procedures and priorities. Restoration may be effected automatically, such as by switching to a hot standby, or manually, such as by manual patching. 
The Palm Beach Police Department is a municipal police agency responsible for law enforcement within the town of Palm Beach, Florida. 
Andronikos Doukas was born circa 1057, the third son of Constantine X Doukas and Eudokia Makrembolitissa. He studied under Michael Psellos, and several works survive that were compiled by the prominent scholars of the day to aid him in his studies: one treatise on geometry by Psellos and two philosophical essays by John Italos. Psellos also compiled a laudatory monody on Andronikos after the latter's death. 
According to Psellos's monody, Andronikos was married to an unnamed woman, who died soon after his own death. He had no descendants. 
Stigmella amelanchierella is a moth of the family Nepticulidae. This species was described by James Brackenridge Clemens in 1862 from mines on Amelanchier species found in June and July. This original (type) material was not preserved and there are no known bred specimens. 
Vacated mines have been collected in Ohio, Kentucky and North Carolina in the United States. These mines were described as long, linear and transparent. The frass is deposited in a rather broad line through the middle. The cocoon is pale brownish ocherous. 
There is no reference to the formation of a blotch, which the two other species known from Amelanchier produce (Stigmella taeniola and Ectoedemia nyssaefoliella). 
Unfortunately, there is not enough evidence to know if this species should be placed in Stigmella or Ectoedemia. 
Komenda-Edina-Eguafo-Abbrem is one of the constituencies represented in the Parliament of Ghana. It elects one Member of Parliament (MP) by the first past the post system of election. Komenda-Edina-Eguafo-Abbrem is located in the Komenda/Edina/Eguafo/Abirem district of the Central Region of Ghana. 
The seat is located entirely within the Komenda/Edina/Eguafo/Abirem district of the Central Region of Ghana. Both the district and the constituency share common borders. It is in the south western corner of the region. It shares its northern and western borders with the Western Region of Ghana. To the north east is the Hemang Lower Denkyira constituency and to the east, the Cape Coast constituency. The Atlantic Ocean or Gulf of Guinea is to the south. 
As Paa Kwesi Nduom, who was a Minister of state in the New Patriotic Party Kufuor government was contesting the elections, the NPP decided not to field a candidate in this constituency but to back Nduom of the CPP instead. 
In philosophy and theology, infinity is explored in articles under headings such as the Absolute, God, and Zeno's paradoxes. 
...how sad is the descent in the land of silence, the wakeful sleeps, he who did not slumber at night lies still forever. The scorners say: The dwelling place of the inhabitants of the West is deep and dark, it has no door, no window, no light to illuminate it, no north wind to refresh the heart, the sun does not rise there, but they lie every day in darkness - the guardian has been taken away to the land of infinity...
An early engagement with the idea of infinity was made by Anaximander who considered infinity to be a foundational and primitive basis of reality. Anaximander was the first in the Greek philosophical tradition to propose that the universe was infinite. 
A group of thinkers of ancient Greece (later identified as the Atomists) all similarly considered matter to be made of an infinite number of structures as considered by imagining dividing or separating matter from itself an infinite number of times. 
In Book 3 of the work entitled Physics, written by Aristotle, Aristotle deals with the concept of infinity in terms of his notion of actuality and of potentiality. 
... It is always possible to think of a larger number: for the number of times a magnitude can be bisected is infinite.  Hence the infinite is potential, never actual; the number of parts that can be taken always surpasses any assigned number.
Sed omne continuum est actualiter existens. Igitur quaelibet pars sua est vere existens in rerum natura. Sed partes continui sunt infinitae quia non tot quin plures, igitur partes infinitae sunt actualiter existentes.But every continuum is actually existent. Therefore any of its parts is really existent in nature. But the parts of the continuum are infinite because there are not so many that there are not more, and therefore the infinite parts are actually existent.
The parts are actually there, in some sense. However, on this view, no infinite magnitude can have a number, for whatever number we can imagine, there is always a larger one: "There are not so many (in number) that there are no more." 
Among the scholastics, Aquinas also argued against the idea that infinity could be in any sense complete or a totality. 
Aristotle deals with infinity in the context of the prime mover, in Book 7 of the same work, the reasoning of which was later studied and commented on by Simplicius. 
The Jains were the first to discard the idea that all infinities were the same or equal. They recognized different types of infinities: infinite in length (one dimension), infinite in area (two dimensions), infinite in volume (three dimensions), and infinite perpetually (infinite number of dimensions). 
Galileo Galilei (February 1564 - January 1642 )   discussed the example of comparing the square numbers {1, 4, 9, 16, ...} with the natural numbers {1, 2, 3, 4, ...} as follows: 
It appeared by this reasoning as though a "set" (Galileo did not use the terminology) which is naturally smaller than the "set" of which it is a part (since it does not contain all the members) is in some sense the same "size". Galileo found no way around this problem: 
So far as I see we can only infer that the totality of all numbers is infinite, that the number of squares is infinite, and that the number of their roots is infinite; neither is the number of squares less than the totality of all numbers, nor the latter greater than the former; and finally the attributes "equal," "greater," and "less," are not applicable to infinite, but only to finite, quantities.
The idea that size can be measured by one-to-one correspondence is today known as Hume's principle, although Hume, like Galileo, believed the principle could not be applied to the infinite. The same concept, applied by Georg Cantor, is used in relation to infinite sets. 
Famously, the ultra-empiricist Hobbes ( April 1588 -  December 1679 )  tried to defend the idea of a potential infinity in light of the discovery, by Evangelista Torricelli, of a figure (Gabriel's Horn) whose surface area is infinite, but whose volume is finite.  Not reported, this motivation of Hobbes came too late as curves having infinite length yet bounding finite areas were known much before. 
Locke ( August 1632 - October 1704  ) in common with most of the empiricist philosophers, also believed that we can have no proper idea of the infinite.  They believed all our ideas were derived from sense data or "impressions," and since all sensory impressions are inherently finite, so too are our thoughts and ideas.  Our idea of infinity is merely negative or privative. 
He considered that in considerations on the subject of eternity, which he classified as an infinity, humans are likely to make mistakes. 
Unlike the traditional empiricists, he thought that the infinite was in some way given to sense experience. 
... I can see in space the possibility of any finite experience... we recognize [the] essential infinity of space in its smallest part."  "[Time] is infinite in the same sense as the three-dimensional space of sight and movement is infinite, even if in fact I can only see as far as the walls of my room.
...infinity is produced in the relationship of the same with the other, and how the particular and the personal, which are unsurpassable, as it were magnetize the very field in which the production of infinity is enacted... 
Levinas also wrote a work entitled Philosophy and the Idea of Infinity, which was published during 1957. 
Daniel Jordan Kibblesmith (born October 9, 1983) is an American writer and comedian who has written for television, comic books, and websites. As a writer for The Late Show with Stephen Colbert he is a five-time Emmy nominee. 
Kibblesmith is of Jewish ancestry through his mother. He attended Oak Park and River Forest High School. 
Originally from Oak Park, Illinois, he lives in New York City with his wife, Jennifer Wright, whom he married in 2017. Prior to meeting his wife, he was listed as one of Elle.com's Most Eligible Bachelors  
The "Blauvelt Bypass," a quarter-mile paved path for bicyclists and pedestrians, was completed in July 2019 to connect two segments of Greenbush Road along NY 303 in Blauvelt. The bicycle path was built to limit accidents on NY 303, which has no shoulder at its intersections with Greenbush Road.  
Antirrhinum vexillo-calyculatum (syn. Sairocarpus vexillocalyculatus (Kellogg) D.A. Sutton) is a species of New World snapdragon found only in California and occasionally Oregon. This wildflower is known by several common names, including wiry snapdragon, sailflower snapdragon, and Brewer's snapdragon. 
The plant twines along other plants or objects with its branchlets. It produces lavender snapdragon flowers 1 to 2 centimeters wide. The flower has a prominent lower lip and it may be streaked with darker purple. This species is most abundant in the low-elevation mountains of northern and central California, where it grows in rocky areas and especially in serpentine soil. 
In 1990 Konsolaki discovered a Mycenaean building in Methena, from which she described over 150 'cult images', including small clay figures of animals, and of horses with riders. 
Konsolaki has investigated the Mycenaean Magoula Acropolis near Galatas, adjacent to the islands of Poros. Here she discovered several Mycenaean buildings, and showed that the Troezen area was of great importance in ancient times and had connections with the Minoan civilization. 
Marty Vincent Turco (born August 13, 1975) is a Canadian former professional ice hockey goaltender who played 11 seasons in the National Hockey League (NHL). He played nine seasons with the Dallas Stars and one season each with the Chicago Blackhawks and Boston Bruins. Due to his puck-handling prowess, Canadian hockey personality Don Cherry named Turco "the smartest goalie in the NHL". Turco currently serves as an in-studio analyst at NHL Network. 
After playing minor hockey for the S.S. Marie Legion program in his hometown, Turco was undrafted by the Ontario Hockey League (OHL). He signed as a 17-year-old with the Cambridge Winterhawks Jr. B. team in 1992 and played two seasons with the Ontario Hockey Association (OHA) team before accepting an NCAA scholarship to play college hockey for the University of Michigan, a member of the Central Collegiate Hockey Association (CCHA). At Michigan, Turco won two NCAA championships. 
In December 2011, Turco signed a contract with EC Red Bull Salzburg of the Austrian Erste Bank Eishockey Liga (EBEL). It was a short-term contract and Turco was only expected to play December 16 and 18 in the European Trophy Finals/Red Bull Salute. However, the following month, he signed a subsequent contract with EC Salzburg lasting through the end of the EBEL season, including an "NHL-out" clause that lasted until the NHL trade deadline, which occurred on February 27. 
On March 5, 2012, Turco signed a contract with the Boston Bruins. He cleared waivers on March 7 and joined the Bruins. He was signed after it was learned that the Bruins' back-up goaltender, Tuukka Rask, would be out four-to-six weeks with a lower abdominal strain. Because he was signed after the NHL trade deadline, Turco was not eligible to participate in the 2012 playoffs. 
Turco played for Team Canada at the 2002 World Championship, he won a silver medal in 2005 but did not play. He suit up at the 2006 Winter Olympics as a third goalie. 
Before signing with EC Salzburg, Turco worked as an analyst for the NHL Network, providing in-studio analysis during the show On the Fly. Turco joined NHL Network's team after the Blackhawks were eliminated by the Vancouver Canucks during the 2011 playoffs. Turco says a full-time job in television might be in his future, but that he would like to play again and is not ready to retire. Turco joined Team Canada for the 2011 Spengler Cup after not playing regularly for nine months. 
Turco also appeared in two commercials for the NHL. In a 2006 commercial for the NHL's "Game On!" promotion, Turco can be seen in back of a family's car to remind the father that the NHL season is starting. Turco can also be seen in the NHL's "Road Trip" commercial, which was debuted during the 2007 NHL All-Star Game in Dallas. Turco can be seen sleeping as fellow goaltenders Roberto Luongo and Ryan Miller set him up to cover himself in shaving cream as a result of a prank. 
Turco and his wife Kelly have two daughters, Hailey (born early 2002) and Katelyn (born April 2004), and one son, Finley (born August 2008) with the family residing in Highland Park, Texas. He also owns a home in his hometown of Sault Ste. Marie, Ontario, where he spends much of his summer.  Along with his cousin, Mark Muzzin, Turco co-founded Kingsville Brewery, located in Kingsville, Ontario, in 2016. 
Peter Hicks received a bachelor's degree from London University in 1985. During the 1985-1986 academic year, he completed a Greek paleography course at the University of Rome's La Sapienza. Hicks received a doctoral degree, on the manuscript tradition of Greek bucolic poems during the Renaissance, at Cambridge University's St. John's College in 1993. 
Emily Murphy was born in Cookstown, Ontario, the third child of Isaac Ferguson and Emily Gowan. Isaac Ferguson was a successful businessman and property owner. As a child, Murphy frequently joined her two older brothers Thomas and Gowan in their adventures; their father encouraged this behaviour and often had his sons and daughters share responsibilities equally. 
Murphy grew up under the influence of her maternal grandfather, Ogle R. Gowan, a politician who founded a local branch of the Orange Order in 1830, and two uncles, one a Supreme Court justice and the other a senator. Her brother also became a lawyer and another member of the Supreme Court. Another uncle was Thomas Roberts Ferguson, an MP, and she was related to James Robert Gowan, who was a lawyer, judge, and senator. 
Murphy benefited from parents who supported their daughter's receiving a formal academic education. She attended Bishop Strachan School, an exclusive Anglican private school for girls in Toronto where, through a friend, she met her future husband Arthur Murphy, who was 11 years her senior. 
In 1887, they married, and subsequently had four daughters: Madeleine, Evelyn, Doris and Kathleen. Doris died. After Doris' death, the family decided to try a new setting and moved west to Swan River, Manitoba, in 1903 and then to Edmonton, Alberta, in 1907. 
While Arthur was working as an Anglican priest, Murphy explored her new surroundings and became increasingly aware of the poverty that existed. 
At the age of 40, when her children became independent and began their separate lives, Murphy began to actively organize women's groups where the isolated housewives could meet and discuss ideas and plan group projects. In addition to these organizations, Murphy began to speak openly and frankly about the disadvantaged and the poor living conditions that surrounded their society. 
Her strong interest in the rights and protection of women and children intensified when she was made aware of an unjust experience of an Albertan woman whose husband sold the family farm; the husband then abandoned his wife and children who were left homeless and penniless. At that time, property laws did not leave the wife with any legal recourse. 
Murphy's success in the fight for the Dower Act, along with her work through the Local Council of Women and her increasing awareness of women's rights, influenced her request for a female magistrate in the women's court. 
Murphy's request was approved and she became the first woman police magistrate in the British Empire. 
Her appointment as a judge, however, became the cause for her greatest adversity concerning women within the law. In her first case in Alberta on 1 July 1916, she found the prisoner guilty. The prisoner's lawyer called into question her right to pass sentence since she was not legally a person. The Provincial Supreme Court denied the appeal. 
In 1919, Murphy presided over the inaugural conference of the Federated Women's Institutes of Canada, which passed a resolution calling for a female senator to be appointed. The National Council of Women and the Montreal Women's Club also supported the resolution, selecting Murphy as their preferred candidate. 
The women's petition set out two questions, but the federal government re-framed it as one question, asking the Supreme Court: "Does the word 'person' in Section 24 of the British North America Act include female persons?"  
Despite the ruling, Murphy never did serve in the Senate. After the ruling, the first seat to open up in the Senate was in Quebec - Murphy lived in Alberta. As well, the Prime Minister at the time, William Lyon Mackenzie King, was a Liberal, and Murphy was a partisan Conservative. She was passed over in favour of philanthropist Cairine Wilson in 1930.  
After the Conservatives under R. B. Bennett won the 1930 federal election, Murphy was denied a chance to sit in the Senate again in 1931, because the vacancy had been caused by the death of a Catholic senator, and Murphy was a Protestant. (Meat-packer Robert Burns got the seat.) Murphy died in 1933 without fulfilling her dream of sitting in Canada's upper chamber. 
In October 2009, the Senate voted to name Murphy and the rest of the Five Canada's first "honorary senators". 
During the early twentieth century, scientific knowledge emerged in the forefront of social importance. Advances in science and technology were thought to hold answers to current and future social problems. 
The UFA government brought in a eugenics law in 1928, requiring parents' or guardians' approval of the operation. Later, after Murphy's death, William Aberhart's  Social Credit government amended the law to allow forced sterilization. 
Due in part to Murphy's heavy advocacy of compulsory sterilization, thousands of Albertan men and women were sterilized without their knowledge or consent under the Sexual Sterilization Act before its repeal in 1972. 
Her legacy is disputed, with her important contributions to feminism being weighed against her racist and nativist views and her advocation of eugenics. In addition to being against immigration, she was a strong supporter of Alberta's legislation for the Sexual Sterilization of the Insane at a time when compulsory sterilization was practised in some North American jurisdictions. 
Emily Murphy's house in Edmonton, Alberta, is on the Canadian Register of Historic People and Places. She lived in this home from 1919 until her death in 1933.  It is now located on the campus of the University of Alberta and houses the Student Legal Services. 
In 1958, she was recognized as a Person of National Historic Significance by the government of Canada. A plaque commemorating this is installed at Emily Murphy Park on Emily Murphy Park Road in Edmonton. The "National Persons" case was recognized in 1997 as a National Historic Event with a plaque at the same place. 
List of Canada national rugby union players is a list of people who have played for the Canada national rugby union team. The list only includes players who have played in a Test match. 
Note that the "position" column lists the position at which the player made his Test debut, not necessarily the position for which he is best known. A position in parentheses indicates that the player debuted as a substitute. 
The Burundian Ambassador to China is the official representative of the Government of Burundi to the Government of the People's Republic of China, he is concurrently accredited to governments in Hanoi, Pyongyang, Seoul and Bangkok. 
Afton Williamson (born September 7, 1984) is an American actress, best known for the lead role of Police Officer Talia Bishop in the ABC series The Rookie and as Assistant District Attorney Alison Medding in the Cinemax original series Banshee. 
Williamson earned a Bachelor of Fine Arts degree from Eastern Michigan University and a Master of Fine Arts degree from the Alabama Shakespeare Festival. 
In 2016, Williamson was cast in a leading role on the VH1 drama series The Breaks. She starred as Officer Wiggins in the 2016 HBO miniseries The Night Of. 
The Bishop in Europe (full title: Bishop of Gibraltar in Europe) is the ordinary of the Church of England's Diocese in Europe in the Province of Canterbury. 
The bishopric has existed since the union in 1980 of the see of Gibraltar (founded 1842) with the Jurisdiction of North and Central Europe of the see of London (headed by the suffragan Bishop of Fulham). Robert Innes was commissioned and consecrated Bishop in Europe on 20 July 2014. 
(Any dates appearing in italics indicate de facto  continuation of office.  The start date of tenure below is the date of appointment or succession. Where known, the date of installation and ordination as bishop are listed in the notes together with the post held prior to appointment.) 
St. Andrew's Episcopal School is a private school located in Amarillo, Texas, United States, providing education from primer to grade 8. The school was founded in 1951. In December 2010, the Plainview (Texas) Daily Herald described St. Andrew's as "regarded among the [Texas] Panhandle's finest private schools." 
Alder grows in the carrs in the valley, albeit threatened at times by spruce and beech, and in the wet meadows deer fern, milk parsley, yellow flag  and marsh marigold thrive. Cranberries, bog pondweed, tussock sedge, bogbean, cottongrass, water lilies, marsh gentian and bog arum also grow richly here. One feature of the valley is the occurrence of the fungi, alder bracket and lilac milk cap. 
Grass snakes, Alpine newts, Common toads and Common frogs occur in the carrs, and great spotted woodpeckers and red-backed shrike may also be seen there. Dragonflies and damselflies thrive greatly on the brown water ponds; a total of 37 different species have been identified in the valley, including the blue hawker. Other insects living in the valley include the stag beetle, der swallowtail and the large marsh grasshopper. 
Geologically the valley is characterised by depositions of bunter sandstone, which is overlain in places by marsh from the Cenozoic. Occasionally, black peat occurs here. 
Pollex mindanaoi is a moth of the family Erebidae first described by Michael Fibiger in 2007. It is known from Mindanao in the Philippines. 
Edith was born in January 1872 in Ecclesfield, Bradford. Her mother was Grace Procter, a mill worker. Her father was most likely Joseph Fawcett, a local mill owner, who signed an 'Agreement to a Child' to pay Grace a weekly allowance until Edith was thirteen years old. Raised by her aunts, Edith moved to Huddersfield some time before her 10th birthday. She worked in a mill from age 10 and left school at age 13. 
Edith married Frederick Key, a blind musician, in March 1891. Together they opened a music shop in Huddersfield, which they lived above. Frederick was active in socialist politics, and Edith soon became involved in the women's suffrage movement. She was the secretary-organiser of the Huddersfield branch of the Women's Social and Political Union (WSPU), formed in 1906 at a meeting chaired by Emmeline Pankhurst. 
She attended several suffrage demonstrations in London, at one being arrested and held in HM Prison Holloway for several days before being released due to lack of evidence. The WSPU minute book includes a copy of a letter sent by Edith on behalf of the branch to "dear friends" in Holloway Gaol, expressing hope from the branch "that your health and strength and womanly endurance may enable you to complete your sentences". 
Key's name is commemorated in Huddersfield through two organisations: the Edith Key Centre, a base for community and campaigning organisations, opened in 2014; and the Edith Key building at the University of Huddersfield, which houses the Department of Psychology in the School of Human and Health Sciences. 
Mira Rosovskaya was born on April 10, 1909 in Saint Petersburg, Russia. She fled to Switzerland after the Russian Revolution and then Hamburg, Germany, where she began acting. She also acted in Vienna. She moved to France after the rise of the Nazi party, and made it to the United States by way of England. In the U.S., she abbreviated her surname to Rostova. 
Elia Kazan kicked her off the set of the 1960 film Wild River after a single day of filming. In Richard Schickel's 2005 biography of Kazan, he describes how she positioned herself behind the director during filming and would nod or shake her head as Clift was acting, but Kazan was unwilling to have her as a co-director. 
Rostova died at age 99 on January 28, 2009 in a Manhattan nursing home, three months shy of her 100th birthday. 
He was born in Sutton on the Hill, Derbyshire, the son of Charles Eaton (1819-1893) farmer of Etwall and Jane Morley (1822-1886). He was baptised on 30 December 1857 in St Michael's Church, Sutton-on-the-Hill. He was educated at Repton School. He married Mary Elizabeth Morley (1858-1927) on 11 September 1886. They had three children: 
These works were completed after the death of Arthur Eaton. The probable architect for them is his son, George Morley Eaton. 
The women's 3000 metres steeplechase event at the 2015 European Athletics U23 Championships was held in Tallinn, Estonia, at Kadriorg Stadium on 9 and 11 July. 
Dancing in Orbit is a compilation of Swedish singer September's second and third albums, In Orbit and Dancing Shoes, respectively, released on 8 May 2008 in the Netherlands. Following the success of September's first major international hit single, "Cry for You", it was released as September's debut album in the Netherlands and Belgium. 
All songs written by Jonas von der Burg, Anoo Bhagavan and Niklas von der Burg, except "Looking for Love", which was written by Steven Elson and Dave Stephenson, and "Midnight Heartache", which was written by Jonas von der Burg, Anoo Bhagavan, Niklas von der Burg, Donna Weiss and Jackie DeShannon. 
Rock Star Supernova was a reality television-formed supergroup consisting of drummer Tommy Lee, bassist Jason Newsted, guitarist Gilby Clarke, and singer Lukas Rossi. The band was formed during the second season of the Rock Star reality television series, which was titled Rock Star: Supernova. 
Rock Star Supernova band members Tommy Lee, Jason Newsted and Gilby Clarke formed the basis of the second season of the Rock Star television program on CBS in the quest to find a lead singer. The show began online on the Rock Star website on MSN on Monday, July 3 with an Internet exclusive weekly episode and premiered on CBS on July 5, 2006. Votes were cast via the Rock Star website. On September 13, 2006, Lukas Rossi was crowned the winner. 
Lee, Newsted and Clarke were dropped as defendants in late August at the request of the original Supernova's lawyers. 
The decision bars the CBS-created rockers from touring, recording and selling merchandise as "Supernova" once the order takes effect. First, the original Supernova must post bond, the amount of which has yet to be determined by the court. 
Following the litigation, all promotional material generally bore the name "Rock Star Supernova" on it. This was especially evident on the band's MySpace page, which identifies the band as Rock Star Supernova and not Supernova. 
Music critics were negative of the album. Stephen Thomas Erlewine, senior critic of AllMusic, wrote, "At no point does this band make sense ... it's gloriously bad, the kind of music that can only result when three talented musicians are contractually obligated to work with a wannabe singer who would be a laughing stock on a local level." 
Christian Hoard of Rolling Stone thought the album had a few bright spots, "but most of the tunes feel tired, if not retrograde: Opener 'It's On' could have come from Collective Soul, the ballads suck, and there are some dark, sub-Alice in Chains bangers." 
Despite the criticism, the album achieved platinum in Canada and sold moderately well on iTunes.[citation needed] 
On October 23, 2006, Jason Newsted was injured while attempting to catch a falling bass amp head. The accident resulted in a torn anterior labrum in his left shoulder and a rotator cuff and biceps tear in the right. He was scheduled for immediate surgery, and underwent a lengthy rehab process. While Newsted recovered, former The Black Crowes bassist Johnny Colt served as a temporary replacement and was with the band on its national television debut on Jimmy Kimmel Live! on November 21. 
The band went on tour with supporting acts Dilana (the runner-up on Rock Star: Supernova), Juke Kartel (the band of Australian Rock Star: Supernova contestant Toby Rand) and The Panic Channel. 
In January 2007 Gilby Clarke released a best-of album featuring tracks from all of his solo albums as well as two songs from the Col. Parker project and a re-recording of the song "Black", featuring vocals by Rock Star: Supernova runner-up Dilana. 
On April 12, 2007, it was rumoured that Clarke had quit the band. It was subsequently confirmed, though, that he was still part of Rock Star Supernova. 
Pacific Ocean Park was a 28-acre (11-hectare), nautical-themed amusement park built on a pier at Pier Avenue in the Ocean Park section of Santa Monica, California. Intended to compete with Disneyland, it replaced Ocean Park Pier (1926-1956). After it closed and fell into disrepair, the park and pier anchored the Dogtown area of Santa Monica. 
Like Disneyland, it found corporate sponsors to share the expense of some exhibits. Six of the pier's original attractions were incorporated into the new park, including the Sea Serpent roller coaster, the antique Looff carousel, the Toonerville Fun House, the Glass House and the twin diving bells. 
By January 5, 1959, POP had attracted 1,190,000 visitors. Although plans were made to add four new attractions, only two were completed, at a cost of $2,000,000: Space Wheels and Fun Forest. 
The park was used as a filming location for television shows such as The Millionaire, The Fugitive, Get Smart (1968), The Twilight Zoneand The Mod Squad, and films such asGun Crazy(1950), Vicki (1953)and The Chapman Report (1962). 
The Miss Teen USA beauty pageant was held at the park in 1962, with the winner, Linda Henning, 15, of Sioux Falls, South Dakota crowned by television comedian Soupy Sales.  
In 1965, Santa Monica began the Ocean Park urban renewal project. Buildings in the surrounding area were demolished and streets leading to the park were closed. As a result, visitors found it difficult to reach the park, and attendance plummeted to 621,000 in 1965 and 398,700 in 1966. 
Other than a few underwater pilings and signs warning of them, nothing remains of Pacific Ocean Park today. A few miles north, the original Santa Monica Pier features a newer amusement park, similarly called Pacific Park. Today, the rides and attractions of the Santa Monica Pier include the carousel that is featured in the 1973 Academy Award-winning film The Sting. 
The Oradell Public School District is a community public school district that serves students in pre-kindergarten through sixth grade from Oradell, in Bergen County, New Jersey, United States. The district consists of a single school, Oradell Public School. 
The district is classified by the New Jersey Department of Education as being in District Factor Group "I", the second-highest of eight groupings. District Factor Groups organize districts statewide to allow comparison by common socioeconomic characteristics of the local districts. From lowest socioeconomic status to highest, the categories are A, B, CD, DE, FG, GH, I and J. 
Pigritia medeocris is a moth in the family Blastobasidae. It was described by Thomas de Grey, 6th Baron Walsingham, in 1897. It is found in the West Indies. 
This article on a moth of the family Blastobasidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
John Reiner (born 1956) is a cartoonist who collaborates with writer Bunny Hoest on three cartoon series: The Lockhorns, syndicated by King Features, and Laugh Parade and Howard Huge (both for Parade magazine). 
Born in New York City, Reiner was raised on Long Island, where he graduated from Smithtown High School in 1974. He attended the State University of New York at Stony Brook, where he was a contributing artist to Statesman, the student newspaper. He was a psychology major, graduating in 1978. 
Mad cartoonist Mort Drucker, in 1974, encouraged him to consider cartooning as a career, and the following year, he began work on Joe Simon's humor magazines. Along with pages for Marvel Comics, Reiner did freelance advertising art, humorous illustrations and political caricatures. In 1984, he was an assistant[citation needed] on the comic strip Benchley, which Jerry Dumas and Drucker created to satirize the Washington political scene. 
Bill Hoest needed an assistant for his strips and cartoons, and in 1986, he hired Reiner to help on The Lockhorns, Agatha Crumm and What a Guy! Eventually, he was assisting on all the Hoest cartoons and strips. After Hoest's 1988 death, his widow Bunny Hoest kept the family business going, and Reiner remained as the artist, working in the turret studio of the Hoest mansion in Lloyd Neck, Long Island. 
The Lockhorns, Memorial Gallery, Sinclair Hall, Farmingdale State College, September 14-November 14, 2010. 
Kazakhstan women's national under-17 football team represents Kazakhstan in international youth football competitions. 
This football article about a women's national youth team is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
RMS Orontes was a steam ocean liner of the Orient Steam Navigation Company that was launched in 1902 and scrapped in 1925. 
Orontes was a troop ship in the First World War. In 1922 she was sold for conversion into an exhibition ship, but the venture fell through so Orient Line repossessed her. Orontes was scrapped in 1925. 
Orient Line registered her at Glasgow. Her UK official number was 115707 and her code letters were TPWN. 
Orontes began her maiden voyage on 24 October 1902, taking mail and passengers from London via the Suez Canal and Melbourne to Sydney. This was her regular route. 
In 1919 Orontes resumed her Australia service with calls at Gibraltar, Toulon, Port Said, Colombo, Fremantle, Adelaide, Melbourne, Sydney and an extension to Brisbane. 
In 1921 Orontes was laid up in the Thames. In 1922 British World Trade Expeditions Ltd bought her with the intent of converting her to an exhibition vessel. She was to be renamed British Trade, but it is not clear whether her change of name was ever registered. Orient Line repossessed the ship. 
In 1925 Orontes was sold for scrap to Thos W Ward. She arrived at Inverkeithing on 22 October that year to be broken up. 
The upper part of Orontes smoking room was salvaged and installed in the Woodside Hotel, Inverkeithing. It includes a stained glass ceiling and expertly turned ornamental woodwork. This remnant of the ship still survives, and the hotel is now a Category B listed building. 
Grand Mart International Food is a Korean supermarket chain primarily located in the Washington, D.C., metropolitan area, with locations in North Carolina and Georgia. It was owned by Annandale, Virginia-based Man Min Corporation, a family company. It was founded in 2002 by David Min Sik Kang, a Korean-American entrepreneur who originally owned small Korean grocery stores in Washington, D.C. 
Grand Mart has stores in Virginia, Maryland, Washington, D.C., North Carolina, and Georgia, most of which are targeted primarily toward the Korean American community, which is concentrated heavily in Fairfax and Montgomery County. The newest store in the Washington area opened in Frederick in Frederick County in 2013. In mid-2008, Grand Mart closed its Security Square Mall location, the only store it had in the Baltimore area. In October 2014, Grand Mart closed its Frederick location. 
In 2013, the Grand Mart locations in Alexandria and Falls Church, Virginia, were sold to Green Paradise Enterprises, which is operating the stores under the name New Grand Mart. 
Freddie "Fred" McMullan (born 4 June 1950) is a Northern Irish former professional darts player who competed in the 1980s. 
Before all this, McMullan reached the semi-finals of the 1984 Winmau World Masters, beating Angel Ruiz, Christer Pilbald, Ellis Elsevif, Peter Locke, Nicky Skinner Jocky Wilson and Alan Evans before losing to reigning champion Eric Bristow who eventually retained his title. 
This Northern Ireland biographical article related to darts is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A thyroxine-binding protein is any of several transport proteins that bind thyroid hormone and carry it around the bloodstream. Examples include: 
Tume Parish (Latvian: Tumes pagasts) is an administrative unit of Tukums Municipality, Latvia. The administrative center is Tume. 
The Men's Scratch was one of the 10 men's events at the 2010 UCI Track Cycling World Championships, held in Ballerup, Denmark on 25 March 2010. 
Pants on Fire is a 2014 Disney XD Original Movie, starring Bradley Steven Perry, Joshua J. Ballard, Tyrel Jackson Williams and Brittney Wilson. It premiered on November 9, 2014. 
He visits Jennifer, whom he has a crush on, to apologize and promises he will never lie again for now. They soon take off in a limo to Fenway Park, compliments of Danny. 
By June 2014, Disney XD agreed to a multi-picture development deal with Two 4 the Money Media and MarVista Entertainment with MarVista having global distribution rights. The two companies teamed up for the first time for this TV film. 
The film premiered on Disney XD channels in the United States and Canada on November 9, 2014, and in Australia on February 6, 2015. 
Farley was an American comic strip written and drawn by Phil Frank, which appeared daily (except Saturday) in the San Francisco Chronicle. 
Phil Frank died on September 12, 2007, shortly after announcing, on September 9, that he was retiring due to illness. Reprints of the strip had been running for some months before this, as he had been too ill to work. 
Farley is a satire of life in the San Francisco Bay Area and California. The title character is Farley, a reporter for the San Francisco Daily Requirement. The strip poked fun at current events in San Francisco, often lampooning such events as the response to Mayor Gavin Newsom's temporary legalization of gay marriage as well as national events such as the National Do Not Call Registry or Vice President Dick Cheney. 
The strip also kept track of the current situation of the San Francisco Giants baseball team through the actions of Alphonse, one of the urban bears who is obsessed with the team.  Alphonse was often shown leaving a hot dog and a beer at home plate in the middle of the night as an offering to the baseball gods. 
The cast of the strip grew to such an extent that Farley, the title character, appeared infrequently. The usual cast was: 
Twenty-first Dynasty of EgyptSmendes Amenemnisu Psusennes I Amenemope Osorkon the Elder Siamun Psusennes II 
Twenty-third Dynasty of EgyptHarsiese A Takelot II Pedubast I Shoshenq VI Osorkon III Takelot III Rudamun Menkheperre Ini Twenty-fourth Dynasty of EgyptTefnakht Bakenranef 
Seleucid Empire: Seleucus I Antiochus I Antiochus II Seleucus II Seleucus III Antiochus III Seleucus IV Antiochus IV Antiochus V Demetrius I Alexander III Demetrius II Antiochus VI Dionysus Diodotus Tryphon Antiochus VII Sidetes 
This small settlement literally derives its name from the fact it is a small village, as "Thorpe" is Anglo-Saxon for village. 
It seems to have been a community that was originally centred on a farmstead, and most of the buildings appear to be in the Elizabethan style, but are more probably Victorian in age.[citation needed] 
Nordin Musampa (born 13 October 2001) is a Dutch professional footballer who plays as a defender for Jong Ajax. He is a nephew of former Ajax player Kiki Musampa. 
Musampa has played for several national youth teams for the Netherlands. With the under-17 team he won the 2018 UEFA European Under-17 Championship, after beating Italy in the final. 
This biographical article related to association football in the Netherlands, about a defender, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Vadodara - Dahod MEMU is a MEMU train of the Indian Railways, which runs between Dahod railway station in Gujarat and Vadodara Junction railway station in Gujarat. It is currently being operated with 69119/69120 train numbers on weekly basis. 
An Old-Fashioned Christmas is the second Christmas album and posthumous twelfth studio album by American music duo Carpenters, released on October 26, 1984, and after the death of singer and drummer Karen Carpenter. 
The album project had its genesis in several unused tracks from the Carpenters' previous Christmas album, 1978's Christmas Portrait. Richard Carpenter took these tracks and recorded new material around them, and this album was the end result. The album (in its original LP and cassette form) includes the slow version of "Santa Claus Is Coming to Town" (a faster version appeared on the Christmas Portrait album). 
A 1984 expanded CD reissue of Christmas Portrait included several tracks from An Old Fashioned Christmas. In 1996 a two-CD set, Christmas Collection, was issued containing both albums in their original running order. 
All lead vocals by Karen Carpenter, except where noted; all tracks produced by Richard Carpenter except "Santa Claus Is Comin' to Town" by Jack Daugherty, R. Carpenter, and K. Carpenter. 
When Martha's father dies and the inheritance is distributed, she is only left with a cow and a tiny piece of land that is hard to manage. In order to earn at least a minimum income, she asks a rich kulak for some help. She only needs a horse to till her small field. But the hard-hearted man does not even listen to her. Out of sheer despair, Martha wonders if there could be other ways to a promising agriculture. 
At first Eisenstein considered hiring a professional actress for the lead role. But when the first question was asked during casting: "Can you milk cows, plough, guide a tractor?" all of them would confidently reply "No". After this he decided to cast farm worker Martha Lapkina, who had never starred in film, for the role. 
This article related to a Soviet film of the 1920s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The tree's fruit often trap insects, small mammals and birds. This is because the sticky sap of the fruit sticks to the skin, fur or feathers of the animal and renders it immovable. As such, ensnared creatures will often die from starvation or be unable to defend themselves from natural predators. 
There are discrepancies between sources regarding the height of the shrub. Most state that Ceodes umbellifera will grow to between 4 and 12 metres. Some sources suggest the tallest known specimen is 20 metres tall, whilst another reports a height of 28 metres. Once mature, the tree has a spreading, rounded crown which may cover over 20 feet. 
In 1866, Berthold Carl Seemann transferred it to the genus Pisonia as Pisonia umbellifera, along with the other species placed in Ceodes. Subsequent work by Heirmel in 1889 specified Timeroyae as a subcategory of Pisonia, with another new subcategory Prismatocarpae introduced, for specimens with fewer than 15 stamens. Rossetto and Caraballo note that, "in this treatment, Calpidia was listed as a synonym of Pisonia, while Ceodes was not mentioned at all". 
Heirmel revised this in 1913, splitting Calpidia and Pisonia, with the former to include Prismatocarpae and Timeroyae, both of which did not have anthrocarpal glands. Calpidia and Pisonia were distinguished by "the absence of bracteoles, having a reduced perisperm that forms gelatinous traces and starch accumulation in the embryo". 
In 1964, Stemmerik proposed a change which reincorporated Ceodes into Pisonia. Several morphological traits were omitted from this classification, such as "the absence of bracts and bracteoles at the upper portion of the pedicels, presence of starch in the embryo and number of apertures in pollen grains". Stemmerik suggested that since not all of these were constant traits then they should not be regarded in the classification. 
In 2019, a study by Rossetto and colleagues used the molecular data of the species' DNA to reveal that the Pisonia genus was non-monophyletic. It was suggested to resurrect the genera Rockia and Ceodes in replacement of Pisonia. This rendered the genera monophyletic. In 2020, it was generally accepted that Ceodes should be restored, including Ceodes umbellifera. This placement is accepted by Plants of the World Online, as of May 2021. 
Ceodes umbellifera may be found in a diverse range of climates worldwide. The plant is native to Australia, Southern China, Thailand, Vietnam, Taiwan, Malaysia, Philippines, Indonesia, Hawaii and many Polynesian islands. It is also naturally occurring in some parts of Africa and Madagascar. 
In Australia, the species is found along the east coast in the states of New South Wales and Queensland, where it is 'widespread, but not common'. In NSW, it is found along the North Coast and Central Coast regions. It mostly grows in rainforests north of the Shoalhaven region. 
Generally, its ideal growing conditions are between about 16 and 20 degrees Celsius. It may only be grown in frost-free environments and gardens, and similarly will not tolerate sustained heat. However, some rare accounts describe the tree surviving to as cold as 26 degrees Fahrenheit. 
The plant requires high humidity and moderate moisture, although "established plants are drought tolerant". Most often, reliably moist soil with high potassium is needed, but the species will survive dry soil with occasional watering. 
Moderate amounts of sunlight are needed, with most growing instructions designating part shade or full sun. When grown as an indoor plant, gardeners suggest "four hours of direct sunlight ... bright light the rest of the time". 
In the wild, Ceodes umbellifera is often found in rainforests, on islands and along coastlines and in shady, moist gullies. Therefore, it is largely found in countries with tropical regions. 
The fruit of Ceodes umbellifera exude a sticky sap, which often sticks to wildlife passing by the tree. Small animals, such as birds, reptiles and insects are often trapped in the substance and starve to death. 
Largely it is seabirds, dwelling on off-shore islands, that die in the fruits of the shrub. However, there are some accounts of mainland birds becoming stuck. Scientists in the Goldsborough Valley, south of Cairns in Queensland, Australia, discovered a female Buff-breasted Paradise Kingfisher who was "completely immobilised, unable even to flap her wings". 
In Hawaii, the tree was used for a variety of purposes by early indigenous people. Leaves of Ceodes umbellifera is used as a general purpose medicine for digestive issues and childhood disease. It was similarly used in Chinese culture by Li folk of the Hainan province. 
HMS Fisgard was a shore establishment of the Royal Navy active at different periods and locations between 1848 and 1983.  She was used to train artificers and engineers for the Navy. 
HMS Fisgard was a 46-gun fifth rate Leda class frigate.  She had been a depot ship and harbour flagship for Woolwich since 1848, and was used to train engineers and support those working onshore.  The facility closed in 1872 and Fisgard herself was broken up in 1879. 
ISEA is a comprehensive global database of international treaties dealing with, or relevant to, the following energy categories, inter alia: conventional sources of energy such as oil, natural gas, and coal; renewable energy, such as wind, biomass, solar, geothermal, and hydro; energy efficiency and energy conservation; nuclear power; carbon capture and sequestration; and transportation. ISEA 
CAD contains U.S. policy proposals directed at climate change. CAD Primary document types contained in CAD include: 
As the parent organization of EESI, the University of Colorado Law School is well known for its strength in the area of environmental law. The U.S. News & World Report's 2008 edition of America's Best Graduate Schools (reporting on 2005-6 academic-year data) ranks the law school's environmental law program as 4th in the United States. 
The main feature of the carnival is a parade along Saint-Catherine Street with people representing various countries in the Caribbean. Flatbed trucks carry disk jockeys playing turntables. Soca music and calypso music are played on speakers. The participants in the parade, dressed in colorful costumes, wave flags, blow whistles, and dance. Carifiesta has been named the largest North-American Running Caribbean Street Parade.  culture, music, art, and  Carnival costumes. 
 Carifiesta does not celebrate any singular Caribbean culture, rather it is meant to celebrate them all coming together. The carnival celebration is simply just "Caribbean" in nature. Many Caribbean people or people of Caribbean descendants find that Carifiesta is a way for them to celebrate their heritage away from home. 
In more recent times the life in the village has changed. Since the end of the Second World War the village has had only one public house, The Crown. The village still retains a church that remains open. However the school closed in the 1980s and the Post Office closed in the 2000s. 
Smallburgh Methodist Church is on Norwich Road. The church was built in the 17th century but the interior is recent and of no great interest. 
The Crown Inn is situated on the eastern side of the A149 road that runs through the centre of the village. It is a 15th-century coaching inn with a great deal of history. It is of timber-framed construction and has a thatched roof hipped on the eastern side and gabled on the western end. The once-large upper room above the bar has now been divided into rooms by stud walls, but was once used for public occasions. The Crown was enlarged with an extra wing in the 18th century. 
Starting in Lima, Velasco succeeded in crossing the Andes and arrived in Cusco on August 31, 1925. His next flight on September 28 took him to Puno where many spectators had gathered. When he tried landing without hitting them, the plane crashed. Velasco died soon after that. He was pronounced dead on September 28, 1925. 
The Alejandro Velasco Astete International Airport in Cusco and a street near the airport have been named after him. 
Leimiswil is a former municipality in the Oberaargau administrative district in the canton of Bern in Switzerland. On 1 January 2011 Kleindietwil and Leimiswil were merged with the municipality of Madiswil. 
Of the built up area, housing and buildings made up 3.2% and transportation infrastructure made up 1.7%.  17.0% of the total land area is heavily forested and 1.7% is covered with orchards or small clusters of trees.  Of the agricultural land, 37.8% is used for growing crops and 35.5% is pastures, while 2.2% is used for orchards or vine crops. 
Leimiswil has a population (as of 31 December 2010) of 398. As of 2007[update], 1.7% of the population was made up of foreign nationals.  Over the last 10 years the population has decreased at a rate of -9.1%.  Most of the population (as of 2000[update]) speaks German  (95.9%), with Albanian being second most common ( 2.0%) and Portuguese being third ( 0.9%). 
In the 2007 election the most popular party was the SVP which received 54.5% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were the FDP (12.5%), the Small right-wing parties (10.4%) and the SPS (10.1%). 
Leimiswil has an unemployment rate of 0.8%.  As of 2005[update], there were 97 people employed in the primary economic sector and about 36 businesses involved in this sector.  89 people are employed in the secondary sector and there are 8 businesses in this sector.  50 people are employed in the tertiary sector, with 12 businesses in this sector. 
KJTX (104.5 FM) is a radio station  broadcasting a Gospel music format. Licensed to Jefferson, Texas, United States, the station serves the Longview-Marshall area.  The station is currently owned by Wisdom Ministries, Inc. 
Briggs retired on 2 February 1973, with the rank of lieutenant, settled in the south of England and worked in Fareham as a furnished lettings manager. In the year he retired, at the Queen's Birthday Honours he was appointed a Member of the Order of the British Empire. In 1975, Briggs joined the HMS Hood Association as one of its youngest members and was elected as its first President. In 1995, Briggs again served as president of the organisation. 
This article about a location in Hama Governorate, Syria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Tshuutheni Emvula(born October 19, 1981 in Berlin, Germany),sometimes known as Becoming Phill is an entrepreneur, hip hop record producer, DJ, composer, and video editor from Windhoek, Namibia. He has produced for various Namibian and international artists including Ricky Rick, Gazza (musician), Black Vulcanite, Sunny Boy (rapper), TeQuila, Qonja, RUN N.A.M.S., Lize Ehlers, Zeus (musician). 
Has composed music, conducted sound design and supervised soundtrack music placement for  the Namibian films 100 Bucks, Love Is...  (Won Best Director at Namibian film awards 2012), My Beautiful Nightmare  (Won Best Independent Film at Luxor Film Festival Egypt 2012), Try (Won Best Film at Namibian Film Awards 2012[permanent dead link]), Eembwiti., Katutura (2015) and The Unseen (2016). 
Becoming Phill has various production styles. He attributes his style to DJ Premier, Pete Rock and J Dilla and also artists like Kanye West, Brenda Fassie, Cameo, Osunlade and others. 
Becoming Phill has been producing for over a decade, producing works with artists across southern Africa and US. He began when his older sister gave him a copy of the then just released Fruity Loops in 1998. He went on to work in a full studio environment becoming an understudy of French guitarist/producer Christian Polloni at Discogs from 2005 til 2009. He is currently working on several anticipated projects. In 2016 he released his first official solo album, Electrum  
Vernon Township is a township in Lake County, Illinois, USA. As of the 2010 census, its population was 67,095. The name "Vernon Township" comes from George Washington's estate, Mount Vernon. 
The township contains eight cemeteries: Diamond Lake, Gridley, Knopf, Long Grove, Lutheran, Vernon, Willow Lawn and Zion City. 
The district is located in the northern foothills of the Alps. The Chiemsee is located in the west of the district. 
In 1972 the district was merged with parts of the former district Laufen, and the previously independent urban district Traunstein. 
The coat of arms shows a blue panther to the left, the symbol of the Spanheim dynasty of the Counts of Krainburg-Ortenburg, who owned part of the area in medieval times. The eagle in the top-right derives from the diocese of Chiemsee. In the bottom right there are the Canting Arms of Baumburg Abbey (Baumburg translates to tree-castle), which ruled most of the northern part of the district. 
In August 1962, she assisted composer Luciano Berio at a two-week summer school at Dartington Hall, for which she borrowed several dozen items of BBC equipment. One of her first works, and most widely known, was her 1963 electronic realisation of a score by Ron Grainer for the theme of the Doctor Who series, one of the first television themes to be created and produced entirely with electronics. 
In 1966 while working at the BBC, Derbyshire, fellow Radiophonic Workshop member Brian Hodgson and EMS founder Peter Zinovieff set up Unit Delta Plus, an organisation which they intended to use to create and promote electronic music. Based in a studio in Zinovieff's townhouse in Putney, they exhibited their music at experimental and electronic music festivals, including the 1966 The Million Volt Light and Sound Rave, at which The Beatles' "Carnival of Light" had its only public performance. 
In 1966, she recorded a demo with Anthony Newley entitled Moogies Bloogies, but Newley moved to the United States and the song was never released. After a troubled performance at the Royal College of Art, in 1967, the unit disbanded. 
The trio, under pseudonyms, contributed to the Standard Music Library. Many of these recordings, including compositions by Derbyshire using the name "Li De la Russe" (from an anagram of the letters in "Delia" and a reference to her auburn hair) were used on the 1970s ITV science fiction rivals to Doctor Who: The Tomorrow People and Timeslip. 
In 1973, Derbyshire left the BBC and worked briefly at Hodgson's Electrophon studio, where she contributed to the soundtrack to the film The Legend of Hell House. 
In 1975, she stopped producing music. Her final works included two soundtracks for video pioneers Madelon Hooykaas and Elsa Stansfield on their short films Een Van Die Dagen ("One Of These Days") in 1973 and Overbruggen ("About Bridges") in 1975. 
Derbyshire's later life was chaotic due to struggles with alcoholism. She died of renal failure brought on by cancer, aged 64, in July 2001. 
In 2002, BBC Radio 4 broadcast a radio play entitled Blue Veils and Golden Sands as part of its Afternoon Play strand, telling the story of Derbyshire and her pioneering musical work. The play starred actress Sophie Thompson as Derbyshire and was written by Martyn Wade. 
In October 2004, the Tron Theatre in Glasgow hosted Standing Wave, a play written by Nicola McCartney focusing on the life of Derbyshire. This was produced by Reeling and Writhing, directed by Katherine Morley, score by Pippa Murphy. 
In 2009, Canadian filmmaker Kara Blake released The Delian Mode, a short documentary film about Derbyshire. The film won the Genie Award for Best Short Documentary Film in 2010. 
In 2013, the BBC showed a television docudrama depicting the creation and early days of Doctor Who in 1963, called An Adventure in Space and Time, as part of the celebrations for the programme's 50th anniversary. Derbyshire appeared as a character in it, portrayed by actress Sarah Winter. 
Episode 5 "Derbyshire" of the BBC children's science TV programme Absolute Genius with Dick & Dom is an exploration of Derbyshire's creation of the Doctor Who theme recording using her techniques on equipment archived from the Radiophonic Workshop. 
Coventry-based theatre company Noctium Theatre produced a play named Hymns for Robots about Derbyshire's working life, which played at the 2018 Edinburgh Fringe festival.[citation needed] 
In 2017, a short film by Caroline Catz, Delia Derbyshire: The Myths And The Legendary Tapes (2017) was screened at the BFI London Film Festival. It has been expanded into a feature-length movie that debuted in October 2020. 
The 2020 documentary Sisters with Transistors touches on Delia Derbyshire's work in electronic music and the composing of the Doctor Who soundtrack. 
A blue plaque was unveiled at Derbyshire's former home of 104 Cedars Avenue, Coventry, on 15 June 2017 as part of a BBC initiative celebrating important musicians and venues. The ceremony was performed by former Doctor Who actors Colin Baker and Nicola Bryant along with BBC Coventry & Warwickshire presenter Vic Minett. 
On 20 November 2017, Derbyshire was awarded a posthumous honorary doctorate for her pioneering contributions to electronic music, by Coventry University, who also erected a plaque honouring Derbyshire, on their Ellen Terry Building. Adjacent to it is a mural depicting Derbyshire. 
The show Piaf: Her Story, Her Songs was made into a film which won first place at the 25th Classic Telly awards, and received the Special Jury Award for most moving film experience at the Fort Lauderdale International Film Festival. It was released on DVD by Lionsgate Films. 
"Raquel Bitton's voice is warm and seductive and she has the full measure of Latin rhythms...Rafa Sardina, an 14-time Grammy Award winner, co-produced and engineered the album, and Rhythm of the Heart might put him up to an even dozen. Everything is exactly right, every balance perfect. The overall sound is lush, warm, and seductive, as it must be for this literature, but there is absolutely no lack of detail," says critic Rad Bennett of her latest album. 
Critic L. Pierce Carson of the Napa Register wrote, "...From the beloved bolero of Osvaldo Farres, "Plus Je Vous Aime," to the pulsating bandoneon of "Tango Melodie," from the classic love song, "Tout Bleu," of French composer Henri Bourtayre to the ultimate payback song, "Il Est Trop Tard," "Rhythm of the Heart" is a gem. All sung in French, the songs are as seductive as they are stirring." 
Golden West Broadcasting Ltd. is a Canadian radio and digital media company based in Altona, Manitoba. It is the largest independent radio broadcaster in Canada. The company primarily operates small-market radio stations and internet portals in the Prairie provinces of Alberta, Saskatchewan and Manitoba, as well as parts of Northwestern Ontario. 
On October 28, 2004, Canadian Satellite Radio announced a partnership with both Golden West Broadcasting and Rawlco Communications that would give the two broadcasting companies the option to acquire an ownership interest in CSR should its satellite radio application be approved by the CRTC. 
CSR's application and two others were approved on June 16, 2005; CSR's service, XM Radio Canada, launched on December 1, 2005. 
Technocapitalism or tech-capitalism refers to changes in capitalism associated with the emergence of new technology sectors, the power of corporations, and new forms of organization. 
Tech capitalism can take many forms such as: IP based financing where patents and registered IP of new technology is an instrument for building capitalism. Debt based equity where new and innovative technology is used as the security interest for securing financing or leasing. Tech capitalism in the form of ICOs such as Blockchain capital 
"Tremble for My Beloved" is a song by the American rock band Collective Soul. It is the fourth and final single from their fourth studio album Dosage. 
In 2008, over nine years after the song's release, "Tremble for My Beloved" was featured in the film Twilight as well as on its accompanying soundtrack. Following the film's success, the song's exposure earned Collective Soul new popularity among a younger audience. 
In December 2010, a re-recorded version of "Tremble for My Beloved" was released as both a single and a music video on iTunes. The music video was also included on the DVD Music Videos and Performances from The Twilight Saga Soundtracks, Vol. 1. The video was shot in August 2010 during a performance in Arequipa, Peru. 
Vitamin String Quartet recorded a cover version for their Twilight tribute album, Vitamin String Quartet Performs Music from Twilight (2008). 
Labidiosuchus is an extinct genus of notosuchian mesoeucrocodylian from Minas Gerais State, southeastern Brazil. Labidiosuchus had a very bizarre dentition and its lower jaw had a Y-shaped outline. 
Born in August 1943, he was the son of Conservative MP Roy Wise. He was educated at university[which?] (receiving a BA), and the RAF College Cranwell from late 1964.[citation needed] 
Wise qualified as a First Class Interpreter, and attended the Joint Service Defence College. He was promoted Squadron Leader on 1 January 1978, and posted to command the University of Wales Air Squadron until 1983, flying Scottish Aviation Bulldogs. 
From 30 March 1988 he was on the staff of the RAF College, Cranwell, and on 17 November 1989 became Director of the University Air Squadrons. He was promoted to Group Captain on 1 July 1990, and was Station Commander of RAF Benson from 1992 to 1994. On 18 November 1991, he was appointed Aide-de-Camp to The Queen a role he fulfilled until 10 December 1993. 
He served as a company director at 16 SUTHERLAND STREET LIMITED from 31 January 1992 to 14 February 2008. 
He attended Rio Mesa High School in Oxnard, California.  In football, he was a two-way player at safety and tight end. As a senior, he tallied 188 tackles, 4 sacks, 5 interceptions, 15 receptions for 350 yards and 6 touchdowns. 
In basketball, he averaged 15 points and 10 rebounds per game as a senior. He received first-team Channel League and Ventura County honors in both sports as a senior. He also competed in the long jump, triple jump and high jump. 
Fujita walked on at the University of California, Berkeley. As a redshirt freshman, he was converted from a safety into an outside linebacker. He played mostly on special teams, while collecting 8 defensive tackles as a backup. 
As a sophomore, he made his first 2 starts. He had 15 tackles at the end of the season, but needed to have offseason neck surgery in the spring of 2000. As a junior, he started 11 games, making 41 tackles (13 for loss) and 4 sacks. 
As a senior, he started 11 games at weakside linebacker, posting 60 tackles, 2.5 sacks and 2 forced fumbles. He finished his college career after appearing in 39 games with 24 starts, while registering 124 tackles, 7 sacks, 2 forced fumbles and one fumble recovery. 
Fujita was selected by the Kansas City Chiefs in the fifth round (143th) of the 2002 NFL Draft. As a rookie, he started 9 of 16 games, recording 63 tackles, 6 passes defensed, one sack and 15 special teams tackles (tied for second on the team). He made 9 tackles against the Buffalo Bills. He had 8 tackles and 2 passes defensed against the Seattle Seahawks. 
In 2003, he started all 16 games and led the team with 151 tackles (fifth most in club history), while also registering 4 sacks, 6 passes defensed, one forced fumble and one interception. He had 15 tackles against the Houston Texans. 
In 2004, he posted 112 tackles, 4.5 sacks and 3 passes defensed. His devastating hit against LaDainian Tomlinson, is remembered as a turning point in the game, when Fujita also recovered the ball before it went out of bounds. 
In 2005, after the Chiefs selected linebacker Derrick Johnson with its first-round pick and also signed linebacker Kendrell Bell, Fujita asked to be traded. On September 3, he was sent to the Dallas Cowboys in exchange for a 2006 sixth round selection (#186-Tre' Stallings) and a 2007 conditional selection (not exercised). In three seasons, he registered 326 tackles and 9 1/2 sacks. 
In the 2005 season, he played in 16 games and became the strongside linebacker starter for the last 8 contests, after Al Singleton was placed on the injured reserve list. He recorded 58 tackles, 2 sacks, one pass defensed, 2 forced fumbles and 9 special teams tackles. He was declared a free agent at the end of the season. 
On March 13, 2006, he signed with the New Orleans Saints, reuniting with former Dallas Cowboys offensive coordinator, now head coach Sean Payton. He was the first free agent to join the Saints when they returned to New Orleans after their year-long absence in the aftermath of Hurricane Katrina. 
Fujita was named defensive captain of the 2007 Saints. In Week 1 of the 2008 season, Fujita caught a crucial game-winning interception in the very end against the Tampa Bay Buccaneers. In the 2009 season, he earned a Super Bowl ring as a member of the Saints team that won Super Bowl XLIV on February 7, 2010, defeating the Indianapolis Colts 31-17 to win the team's first league championship. 
On December 11, 2012, it was announced in the media that former commissioner Paul Tagliabue exonerated Fujita of all culpability and wrongdoing in the Saints pay-for-play scandal, vacating his suspension and clearing his record. On April 22, 2013, he announced his retirement. 
On April 22, 2013, Fujita signed a one-day contract with the New Orleans Saints while in Machu Picchu with his former teammate Steve Gleason, announcing his retirement immediately after.  In August 2013, Fujita joined the new Fox Sports 1 sports network as an analyst on its Fox Football Daily program. 
In 2018 Fujita became the Athletic Director of All Saints Day School, in Carmel, California, where he had been a parent for years. In 2019 he was selected and currently serves as Head of School after entering the vetting process with 38 candidates from across the United States. 
On January 30, 2019, All Saints' Day School announced Fujita as its Head of School. Fujita holds a Bachelor of Arts in Political Science with a minor in Business Administration, and a Master of Arts in Education from the University of California, Berkeley, where he graduated with honors. 
Fujita is married with three children; he and his family have a home in Carmel Valley, California.  He is politically liberal, and has gone on record as a supporter of women's rights and gay rights as well as an advocate for adoption, wetlands preservation, and other causes; he was named the Saints "Man of the Year" in 2009 for his charitable activities. 
 Raphael Finkel (born 1951) is an American computer scientist and a professor at the University of Kentucky.  He compiled the first version of the Jargon File. He is the author of An Operating Systems Vade Mecum, a textbook on operating systems, and Advanced Programming Language Design, an introductory book on programming paradigms. Finkel and J.L. Bentley created the data structure called the quadtree. 
Finkel was born in Chicago. He entered the University of Chicago, where he earned his BA in mathematics and MA in teaching. He then earned a PhD at Stanford University under the supervision of Vinton Cerf. 
Finkel is also an activist for the survival of the Yiddish language, promoting its use and providing fonts, various texts, and tools for writing Yiddish in personal computers. 
Charlie Gaddy (born September 17, 1931), is a former television anchorman for WRAL-TV from Raleigh, North Carolina. He anchored the evening news for over 20 years.  He retired in 1994. 
The Charlie Gaddy Center for Children was named in honor of Gaddy's public service in support of United Cerebral Palsy of North Carolina. 
This biographical article related to television journalism in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Kevit Desai is a fan of classic and vintage cars and is a patron on the African Concours D'elegance  
Crocker, who specializes in the butterfly, has received five Olympic medals in his career. In addition to his accomplishments at the Olympics, Crocker was the first man to ever swim under 51 seconds in the 100-meter butterfly. Crocker improved his world record of 50.98 twice, down to a time of 50.40 set at the 2005 World Aquatics Championships in Montreal, before being bested by Michael Phelps in 2009. 
At the 2000 Summer Olympics in Sydney, Crocker was a member of the gold medal-winning 400-meter medley relay team and barely missed winning a bronze in the 100-meter butterfly. 
In the third quarter of 2011, Ian Crocker returned to the USADA drug-testing pool. This fueled speculation that he might be considering a return to competitive swimming after more than three years away from the sport. 
Following the 2008 Beijing Olympic Games, he has taken a break and started a swim school with former Longhorn teammate Neil Walker. 
He is now the head coach for a swim club in Austin, Texas, called the Western Hills Athletic Club (WHAC). 
She has a career-high singles ranking by the WTA of 264, reached on 19 March 2001. Kozhokina also has a career-high doubles ranking of world No. 170, achieved on 8 July 2002. Kozhokina won four singles titles and six doubles titles on tournaments of the ITF Circuit. 
Kozhokina made her WTA Tour main-draw debut at the 2003 Kremlin Cup in the doubles event, partnering Maria Kondratieva. 
This biographical article relating to Russian tennis is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"I Can't Sleep" is a song co-written and recorded by American country music singer Clay Walker.  It was released in January 2004 as the second single from his album A Few Questions, it peaked at #9 on the Hot Country Singles & Tracks (now Hot Country Songs) chart, and features Chely Wright (with whom Walker co-wrote the song) on background vocals. 
In an interview with Country Weekly, Walker said, "It's an R&B kind of song I started one day at the beach. Not long after that, Chely Wright and Lonestar's Richie McDonald came on my bus at a show in Colorado and we played songs we'd each started writing. When I played a piece of 'I Can't Sleep,' Chely said she could help me finish it. And when we played it at Chely's annual charity fundraiser during Fan Fair last June, it got a standing ovation." 
Wright told Jam!, "The most creative thing happened the other night when we were in Colorado and Clay Walker was on the show as well. I popped up on his bus to say hi ... we got to talkin' about songs and we passed the guitar back and forth a couple of times and played some new stuff we'd written. We sat there and wrote a brand new song.  It's moments like that which are the most exciting ... a song just pops out because you love music." 
In the second verse of the song, the narrator looks back at when his wife said, "We couldn't last / [He] couldn't swallow [his] pride", and that losing her wakes him up in the middle of the night. 
Mandy Davis of the St. Louis Post-Dispatch commented in her review of "A Few Questions", "On "I Can't Sleep," you can almost hear Walker pleading for the crossover success of Garth Brooks or Tim McGraw.". 
The music video was directed by Trey Fanjoy. It features Clay wandering the streets of a foreign city looking for the one he loves. Some scenes also feature him sitting on his bed singing the song. The music video premiered on CMT's "Most Wanted Live" on January 24, 2004. 
This song debuted at number 55 on the U.S. Billboard Hot Country Singles & Tracks chart dated December 13, 2003. The song charted for a total of 29 weeks, and finally peaked at number 9 on the chart dated June 19, 2004. Additionally, it peaked at number 61 on the U.S. Billboard Hot 100. 
Jaeger championed the work of the young composer Samuel Coleridge-Taylor, claiming to Elgar that Coleridge-Taylor was "a genius". 
In 1898 Jaeger married Isabella Donkersley of Magdale, Honley near Holmfirth in West Yorkshire, an accomplished violinist and pupil of Henry Holmes in the Royal College of Music, and they had two children. 
At the beginning of 1905 Jaeger was ill with tuberculosis and went to Davos in Switzerland, but he was still receiving a pension from Novellos. After the long and depressing illness, during which he and Elgar still corresponded about musical matters, Jaeger died in Muswell Hill on 18 May 1909. 
Kevin Alderman, founder of Eros LLC,  is the creator of the avatar of Stroker Serpentine in the virtual world of Second Life. 
Alderman, originally a plumbing contractor, first created a presence in the adult-only virtual world of Seducity as "Stroker". Motivated by the sale of virtual goods between residents and the ability to retain intellectual property rights, Alderman registered a user account in Second Life in November 2003 and created his avatar. 
On May 2, 2011, Alderman and his family were featured in the National Geographic Channel series Taboo episode "Fantasy Lives". 
Currently, Alderman has returned to Second Life to attempt to rebuild his business. He is asking for collaborations in work even with his past distribution of other creators content against their initial agreement with those people. 
Near the weekend of July 4, 2007, Alderman's company Eros LLC filed a copyright infringement lawsuit against a Second Life avatar named  Volkov Catteno, temporarily named "John Doe" in court documents, for copying and reselling his virtual SexGen beds. Through several subpoenas served to Linden Lab, PayPal, AT&T, and Charter Communications,  Volkov Catteno  was identified as Robert Leatherwood of Azle, Texas. 
Later that same year, in October 2007, Alderman spearheaded a six-person lawsuit against New York native Thomas Simon (aka Raze Kenzo in Second Life) for unauthorized copying, resale, and distribution of the plaintiffs' virtual products. The suit alleged that Simon duplicated and resold various types of content from several different Second Life content creators. 
Eros LLC and Shannon Grei brought forth a class action suit in US District Court in Northern California against Linden Research, Inc on September 15, 2009 (Case4:09-cv-04269-PJH). Court papers allege the defendants knowingly and profitably turned a blind's eye to copyright and trademark violations within the Second Life service. 
On Sept 28, 2011, Stroker released his Sexgen v5.0 bed for free, with full permissions, meaning that anyone can copy it for any use including resale. This act was done without the consent of several parties involved in the creation of the Sexgen v5.0. Although there was mention of filing a DMCA Takedown order, there is no mention in the article of any being filed. 
In September 2008, Alderman partnered with developer OhMibod to create an interface that would allow avatars within the virtual world of Second Life to remotely actuate the OhMiBod device of another Internet partner. The teledildonic application utilized a heads up display or  HUD  to play customized soundtracks to enhance avatar to avatar cybersex. The OhMiBod interface has since been abandoned for use in Second Life due to aggressive enforcement of the broad teledildonics patent. 
Alderman expanded his interests in virtual world development by founding StroCap Studios in 2007 as a subsidiary of Eros LLC. By combining the resources of StroCap and Motionwerx, Alderman utilizes innovative gyroscopic inertial systems and motion capture optical systems to provide platform developers and virtual world entrepreneurs with realistic character animations. 
Between 1985 and 1986, Kuwa was sent for military training in Ethiopia. He was then appointed to join the SPLM/SPLA Political-Military High Command, and was sent to Cuba for advanced political and military training. 
Upon return, he became a commander in the SPLA, 10th in rank after John Garang, Kerubino Kuanyin Bol, William Nyuon Bany, Salva Kiir, Arok Thon Arok, Nyaciluk Nyachigak, John Kulang, Riek Machar and Lam Akol. Others in the SPLA High Command included James Wani Igga, Daniel Awet Akot, and Kuol Manyang Juuk. 
When the SPLA-Nasir split from the SPLA in 1991, Kuwa rose in rank because he was one of those who stood with Garang's dominant faction. 
Kuwa returned to Sudan in 1987, and was assigned, with a battalion of about 1,000 SPLA guerilla fighters, to penetrate the Nuba Mountains. 
Soldiers abusing civilians risked the firing squad, and in 1990, Kuwa, now the SPLA-appointed governor of the Nuba Mountains, introduced self-government, where the Nuba elected their village leaders, district representatives and county administrators. Kuwa became very popular among the Nuba, who did not fear him, but revered him for his charisma and wisdom. 
Unable to defeat the SPLA in direct confrontations, the Khartoum military directed its violence against the civilian population and sealed off the Nuba Mountains. For 16 years, the Nuba suffered relentless attacks from government forces. Warplanes bombed the area sporadically, hundreds of villages were shelled or burned, thousands were killed and tens of thousands subjected to famine. 
Yousif Kuwa was diagnosed with prostate cancer in 1998 and died on 31 March 2001 while undergoing treatment in Norwich, England. He died before witnessing the signing of a Comprehensive Peace Agreement that finally ended the South Sudan conflict. 
Although the SPLM/A was predominantly Christian, Kuwa remained a Muslim all his life. The Yousif Kuwa Teachers Training Institute (YKTTI), which was established in the Nuba Mountains with the support of the Koinonia Community, is named after him. 
Let me tell you, Despite all the talk about my Arabism, my religion, and my culture. I am Nuba. I am black. I am an African. 
Africaness is my identity, It is entrenched in my appearance, It is engraved in my lips and manifested in my skin. My africaness is in the sound of my footsteps, it is my bewildered past and in the depths of my laughter. 
Brothers, with Thousands of my apologies forgive me! forgive me for my frankness and courage! Despite my grandfather's humiliation, Despite my grandmother's sale into slavery. Despite my ignorance, my backwardness and my naivety. My tomorrow will come. 
I shall light my candle. In its light I Shall build my civilization. At that time I shall extend my hand. I shall forgive Those Who tried to destroy my identity, because love and peace is my aspirations.  
Scott played as a teenager with his brother, drummer Lloyd Scott. They played together as co-leaders through the end of the 1920s, holding residencies in Ohio, Pittsburgh, and in New York City at the Savoy Ballroom. Among the members of this ensemble were Dicky Wells, Frankie Newton, Bill Coleman, Roy Eldridge, Johnny Hodges, and Chu Berry. Cecil took full control over the group in 1929, though Lloyd continued to manage the group. 
In 1950, he disbanded the group, and worked with Jimmy McPartland as a sideman. He occasionally led groups and continued to play as a sideman up until the time of his death in 1964. He is credited on some 75 albums. 
Centropogon zamorensis is a species of plant in the family Campanulaceae. It is endemic to Ecuador.  Its natural habitat is subtropical or tropical moist montane forests. It is threatened by habitat loss. 
A Seven Hills junior, Glover made his debut for Parramatta in 1975. The following year Parramatta reached the grand final which was played against Manly-Warringah. With ten minutes of the match remaining and 15 metres out from a wide-open try line Glover dropped ball over the line after Parramatta started a sweeping move from one side of the field to the other. 
Speaking in 2008 about the game, Glover said "Mate I'm at a prosecutors conference today and the dropped ball thing has already been mentioned twice, I wouldn't say it gets brought up daily but certainly once a week it gets a mention". Glover dropped the pass which could have given the Eels the match-winning try. 
In 1978, Glover made his Australian test debut in Brisbane against a touring New Zealand side in the second of a three-test series. He scored the first of his two tries of the match after being on the field for only two minutes. He is listed on the Australian Players Register as Kangaroo No. 511. Glover also represented New South Wales in 1979 against Great Britain. 
Following a grand final loss in reserve grade, Glover left Parramatta. He played one more season with Penrith in 1983. 
In 2002, a team of the greatest Parramatta players, known as the Parramatta Legends, were selected based on a public vote of fans.  Glover was selected on the wing. 
After playing, Glover went into coaching and later became a police officer.  Glover became the senior sergeant in charge of all Hunter Region police prosecutors. 
In 1836, Sherwood was elected to the 13th Parliament of Upper Canada representing the town of Brockville.  This was the last Parliament of the province of Upper Canada, which in 1841 was united with the province of Lower Canada into the new Province of Canada by the Act of Union 1840, enacted by the British Parliament. 
In 1843, Dunn resigned from the Legislative Assembly to protest Governor Metcalfe's refusal to consult the Executive Council on patronage appointments.  In the resulting by-election, Sherwood again stood for election and was successful.  He was re-elected to the second Parliament in 1844, and the third Parliament in 1848.  He was not originally elected to the fourth Parliament in 1852, but was elected in 1853 in a by-election. 
From May 28, 1847, to March 11, 1848, Sherwood served as Joint Premier of the Province of Canada for Canada West along with his counterpart Denis-Benjamin Papineau who represented Canada East. 
At the same time, Sherwood was involved in municipal politics in Toronto.  He was alderman of St. David's Ward when chosen as the seventh  Mayor of Toronto from 1842 to 1844, succeeding Munro. 
He was a successful mayor. Credit belongs to the committees, but he was the mayor that oversaw the regulation of the market, paving the streets and collecting taxes. In 1842, 94 gas lights illuminated King and Yonge Streets and a waterworks was underway. 
Mayor Sherwood saw that the Town Hall was too small for the growing civic government and the plans were drawn for Toronto's first municipal offices. Construction began on the new City Hall (now St. Lawrence Market South) in the summer of 1844 at Jarvis and Front Streets. 
Sherwood's brother and tavern owner, Samuel, would serve as the city's police chief from 1852 to 1859. 
Indigenous Australian sport was discouraged by the British colonisers, and Aboriginal Australians and Torres Strait Islander people have faced discrimination when participating in mainstream Australian sports. Sports such as cricket, rugby, netball, soccer and field hockey were introduced into Indigenous communities so they could socialise with and assimilate into white Australian culture. 
The British discouraged Indigenous Australians from continuing their existing sporting traditions. Aboriginal people faced discrimination when participating in mainstream white Australian sports. Cricket, rugby, netball, soccer and field hockey were introduced into Aboriginal communities as a way of encouraging socialisation with and assimilating Aboriginal people into greater Australian culture.  Cricket was specifically used to teach "white values". 
While sport has provided some opportunities for Aboriginal people, it has not provided a framework for enabling community-wide benefits as it relates to wider Australian culture. Male Indigenous Australians have largely been under-represented at the highest level of Australian sport, with a few exceptions, notably Australian rules football, boxing and in the rugby league. 
The Aboriginal Sports Foundation was created in 1969, and The National Aboriginal Sports Awards were first given in 1986. At the 1986 National Aborigines' Day, more than 70 members of the Australian Indigenous community had their sporting achievements recognised. 
The International Aboriginal Cup, a women's competition between Aboriginal Australians and First Nations Canadians, took place for the first time in 1990. 
At the 1994 Commonwealth Games, Cathy Freeman carried an Australian and Aboriginal flag, following her victory. 
In 2001, sport facility access was available to 85% of Indigenous Australians living in Indigenous communities of 50 or more people. Aboriginal Australians sought out sports like athletics and swimming in part because they had aspects of traditional sports from their community. Traditional sports included boomerang throwing and running. 
Most Indigenous sports at the time of European arrival were for enjoyment. These sports were not absorbed into European sports, and sporting traditions began to fade during the same time when other Indigenous traditions were facing. 
The Australian Sports Commission has taken steps to try to preserve knowledge about Indigenous sporting traditions. In 1868, an all-Australian Aboriginal team toured England. 
Drafted by the Detroit Lions early in the fourth round of the 1973 NFL draft, Hennigan played three seasons at linebacker for the Lions. After the 1975 season, in which he played only four games for Detroit, Hennigan joined the New York Jets. He played three more NFL seasons for the Jets before a knee injury ended his playing career. 
Mike Hennigan earned a bachelor's degree in Health and Physical Education from Tennessee Tech in 1973. He and wife Leslie are the parents of four children. Hennigan was named to the Tennessee Tech Sports Hall of Fame in 1986. Youngest son Taylor also played his college football for Tennessee Tech. 
The Desert Biosphere Reserve and Experimental Range  is a biosphere reserve and experimental range in western Millard County, Utah, United States, that is listed as a historic district on the National Register of Historic Places. 
In mathematics, the discrete Laplace operator is an analog of the continuous Laplace operator, defined so that it has meaning on a graph or a discrete grid. For the case of a finite-dimensional graph (having a finite number of edges and vertices), the discrete Laplace operator is more commonly called the Laplacian matrix. 
The discrete Laplace operator occurs in physics problems such as the Ising model and loop quantum gravity, as well as in the study of discrete dynamical systems. It is also used in numerical analysis as a stand-in for the continuous Laplace operator. Common applications include image processing, where it is known as the Laplace filter, and in machine learning for clustering and semi-supervised learning on neighborhood graphs. 
There are various definitions of the discrete Laplacian for graphs, differing by sign and scale factor (sometimes one averages over the neighboring vertices, other times one just sums; this makes no difference for a regular graph). The traditional definition of the graph Laplacian, given below, corresponds to the negative continuous Laplacian on a domain with a free boundary. 
In addition to considering the connectivity of nodes and edges in a graph, mesh Laplace operators take into account the geometry of a surface (e.g. the angles at the nodes). For a manifold triangle mesh, the Laplace-Beltrami operator of a scalar function     u   {\displaystyle u}   at a vertex     i   {\displaystyle i}   can be approximated as 
Approximations of the Laplacian, obtained by the finite-difference method or by the finite-element method, can also be called discrete Laplacians.  For example, the Laplacian in two dimensions can be approximated using the five-point stencil finite-difference method, resulting in 
Multidimensional discrete Laplacians on rectangular cuboid regular grids have very special properties, e.g., they are Kronecker sums of one-dimensional discrete Laplacians, see Kronecker sum of discrete Laplacians, in which case all its eigenvalues and eigenvectors can be explicitly calculated. 
For one-, two- and three-dimensional signals, the discrete Laplacian can be given as convolution with the following kernels: 
      D   x y   2     {\displaystyle \mathbf {D} _{xy}^{2}}   corresponds to the (Five-point stencil) finite-difference formula seen previously. It is stable for very smoothly varying fields, but for equations with rapidly varying solutions more stable and isotropic form of the Laplacian operator is required, such as the nine-point stencil, which includes the diagonals: 
Note that the nD version, which is based on the graph generalization of the Laplacian, assumes all neighbors to be at an equal distance, and hence leads to the following 2D filter with diagonals included, rather than the version above: 
It can be shown that the following discrete approximation of the two-dimensional Laplacian operator as a convex combination of difference operators 
If the graph is an infinite square lattice grid, then this definition of the Laplacian can be shown to correspond to the continuous Laplacian in the limit of an infinitely fine grid.  Thus, for example, on a one-dimensional grid we have 
This definition of the Laplacian is commonly used in numerical analysis and in image processing. In image processing, it is considered to be a type of digital filter, more specifically an edge filter, called the Laplace filter. 
If the number of edges meeting at a vertex is uniformly bounded, and the potential is bounded, then H is bounded and self-adjoint. 
The spectral properties of this Hamiltonian can be studied with Stone's theorem; this is a consequence of the duality between posets and Boolean algebras. 
On regular lattices, the operator typically has both traveling-wave as well as Anderson localization solutions, depending on whether the potential is periodic or random. 
Certain equations involving the discrete Laplacian only have solutions on the simply-laced Dynkin diagrams (all edges multiplicity 1), and are an example of the ADE classification. Specifically, the only positive solutions to the homogeneous equation: 
are on the extended (affine) ADE Dynkin diagrams, of which there are 2 infinite families (A and D) and 3 exceptions (E). The resulting numbering is unique up to scale, and if the smallest value is set at 1, the other numbers are integers, ranging up to 6. 
The ordinary ADE graphs are the only graphs that admit a positive labeling with the following property: 
The resulting numbering is unique (scale is specified by the "2"), and consists of integers; for E8 they range from 58 to 270, and have been observed as early as 1968. 
Panjgur Airport (IATA: PJG, ICAO: OPPG) is a domestic and partially International airport, located at Panjgur, Balochistan, Pakistan. 
Eulepidotis dives is a moth of the family Erebidae first described by Art